text:what text:languag text:and text:cultur text:differ text:imped text:the text:integr text:of text:foreign text:minor text:in text:germani
Language: Czech Article Type:BFN [Interview with President Arpad Goncz by Kveta Kovacsova in Budapest; date not given: "Hungarian President Goncz: We Are One Family"] [Text] Budapest -- Hungarian President Arpad Goncz granted MLADA FRONTA DNES an exclusive interview prior to the meeting in Prague between the representatives of the Visegrad Four states and U.S. President Bill Clinton. [Kovacsova] How do you view the status of the small democratic countries in Central Europe at a time when a new strategic balance is being sought on the U.S.-Russia-NATO level? Is there any future for a joint course of action by these small countries? [Goncz] Economic and political integration, as well as integration in the security policy sphere, is not only in the common interest of the Central European countries, but is also in the interest of West Europe. This contributes to stability in the region. We are aware that all four states are coping with more or less the same problems in the economic and, to a certain extent, social spheres. Integration could alleviate the negative impact of transformation. It is also important for our states to infiltrate West European markets, something that is becoming more and more difficult due to the current economic recession affecting our partners there. If we are successful in this, we can reckon with the modernization and development of our own economies. In my opinion, this would also improve our market's importing capability. The Visegrad Four states together represent a 100-million-strong, demanding, and unsaturated market. We are situated conveniently close to West Europe. We can also participate in developing partnership relations between other states in Central, East, and West Europe. Cooperation among our four states is always more advantageous than an individual course of action. We have countless opportunities for mutual integration. Despite the different geographic location of the individual countries, the region forms a coherent unit. A community involving the Visegrad Four states is far more attractive for the West than each state is individually. When integrating with Europe, it is unnecessary to proceed in the same way and enter into the organizations there at the same time. We tried this before, and I would prefer not to talk about the outcome. We face similar tasks in the integration processes, but we are at various stages of development, whether this involves legislation, economic relations, or national security policies. We are also keen on cooperation in human rights issues, environmental protection, and guaranteeing social stability. The essence lies in not formalizing our relations, but in keeping each other informed and -- where possible -- in coordinating our points of view together and bilaterally and not throwing spanners in each others works. I am always glad if Prague succeeds in doing something first and I would be pleased if Prague were to express its pleasure at something we succeed in first. [Kovacsova] We would be interested in hearing Hungary's point of view regarding the United States and Russia and also regarding relations between the Hungarians and the Americans and between the Hungarians and the Russians in the political, cultural, economic, or other spheres. [Goncz] Apart from the United States and Russia, Germany is no less an important partner for Hungary. In my opinion, it will be important to forge close economic ties in parallel with all three of the aforementioned states. To date, U.S. investments in Hungary amount to around $3 billion. Influential American-Hungarians, who play a similar role in cultural relations with the United States, have been of assistance in the influx of U.S. capital. There are numerous experts of Hungarian origin at U.S. universities who can partially influence public opinion and ferment ideas together. Germany is an important and traditional economic partner and it is -- as it is to you -- favorably inclined toward us. This stems from German knowledge of the conditions in our region. As far as our relationship with Russia is concerned, since the last Soviet soldier withdrew from our country, there have been no obstacles preventing the formation of friendly -- I emphasize friendly -- relations. Our political contacts are perfect. I have met three times with President Yeltsin and our meetings have always led to specific and matter-of-fact agreements. Although our foreign trade with Russia now only amounts to 20-25 percent of its former volume, this country is still a vitally important trading partner for us. It purchases agricultural products, including apples and wine, from northern Hungary; Russia is one of the largest importers of wheat, medical supplies, and Ikarus buses. Therefore, it is in Hungary's interest to ensure not only that the Russian market is open but also that it is sufficiently solvent. Undoubtedly, it is in Hungary's crucial interest to ensure that the democratization process in Russia is not halted. We are keen for the United States to assist and support this process. We have the same view regarding Russia's incorporation into the system of European cooperation and organizations. [Kovacsova] Regarding European security, what is your country's stance toward the Balladur plan, a plan aimed at greater stability? [Goncz] The plan appeals to me very much. I think it can be further adapted. I consider the goal to improve this region's internal stability to be extraordinarily important. The issue of ethnic minorities -- one of the priorities of Hungarian foreign policy -- is of particular concern to us. Hungary is not striving for unilateral advantages for the Hungarian minorities, but for all the minorities living in the states in our region, which is like an ethnic mosaic. Ethnic minorities are a problem for every state and, therefore, we have to seek standard principles and a common denominator that would define equal commitments. Ethnic Hungarians have been living since 1920 in more states under various circumstances and have different experiences. Such minorities always bear a dual responsibility. They should assist the overall development of the majority state where they will enjoy success only if they are loyal to it. However, they also have moral ties to their own community and to their mother state with which they have cultural and linguistic links. The two states involved can always assist in this. This reasoning is purely positive, and is definitely not directed against anyone. Implementing it could help a great deal in the interest of an internal settlement for this region. That is, at least until the common borders are absolutely permeable. [Kovacsova] In your opinion, in what way could mutual relations between Hungary and Slovakia, Hungary and the Czech Republic, or Hungary and Poland change following the Prague meeting with President Clinton? [Goncz] At the moment, we do not know exactly what the talks on 12 January will concern, because we do not know the conclusions to be reached at the NATO summit from where President Clinton will travel to Prague. Afterwards, he will hold talks in Russia. Independently of this, it is important for the Visegrad Four states to consider the development of their economic relations. We have a free trade zone agreement. This is an important plus. The problem is that the Visegrad Four states have virtually the same deformed economic structure. I think, however, that it is possible to find together the means of expanding mutual trade. It is pointless to compete with each other on third markets. I attach no less importance to a systematic exchange of political information and to coordination. We could quite easily slip up without them. We do not have conflicting interests, our friendship has not been impaired by anything, and our cultural traditions and ways of thinking are similar. We also speak the same language politically and the development in our societies is identical. It is essential to expand and intensify regional cooperation and I emphasize that we will get by without establishing administrative structures. If the need arises, the foreign ministers, the prime ministers, and even the heads of state can contact each other for a personal exchange of views. If a certain issue becomes acute or if a difficulty crops up in the system of relations, it is sometimes enough merely to life the telephone. [Kovacsova] What kind of role could the endeavor to become a full-fledged partner for the advanced parts of Europe and the United States play for our region? [Goncz] Our integration with Europe will be considered at the end of the century. I think it could be sooner. Perhaps not for all of us at the same time. It could happen that we will dispatch the Czech Republic as our avantgarde. Or, it will send us into Europe as a vanguard. Whoever is first will reserve a place for the second. It is essential that he does not slam the door in the other's face. We perceive the significance of Euro-Atlantic cooperation as our incorporation into the European security system on a pancontinental scale. At the moment, I cannot say what role the reformed NATO and the Western European Union will play and I cannot say at what pace we will proceed in modernizing our economies. I consider these three elements to be the most important, while I reckon that they can be intensified at a different pace. I propose that we think about which of them we want to cooperate in and how, even without written treaties. After all, we are one family. If we do not realize this, then we are real dimwits.

text:what text:is text:happen text:in text:the text:field text:of text:behavior text:genet text:the text:studi text:of text:the text:rel text:influenc text:of text:genet text:and text:environment text:factor text:on text:an text:individual' text:behavior text:or text:person
A landmark study on identical twins raised apart offers new reassurance to parents who worry about the adequacy of their child-rearing efforts and rekindles the age-old debate of nature vs. nurture. The long-awaited study, the most definitive in a long series trying to separate the effects of genetics and environment in a child's development, comes down heavily on the side of genetics. It indicates that the broad outlines of personality and behavior are put in place in the brief instant when the mother's and father's genes mix during conception, establishing the basic route that the child will take during the rest of its life. Nurture -- the family environment -- plays a much smaller role, according to the study, published today in the journal Science. "For most every behavioral trait so far investigated, from reaction time to religiosity, an important fraction of the variation among people turns out to be associated with genetic variation," wrote the University of Minnesota researchers, led by psychologist Thomas J. Bouchard Jr. This work "does not show that parents cannot influence those traits, but simply that this does not tend to happen in most families." Psychologist Robert Plomin of Pennsylvania State University called the Minnesota twin study "the single most important finding in behavioral genetics in the last decade." The results in general agree with many previous studies of the role of genetics in producing behavior. But the new research finds a stronger connection between genetics and behavior than the previous studies, said Norman Krasnegor of the National Institute of Child Health and Human Development. "It's a powerful statement and one which people will debate for a long time," he said. "It will cause some good controversy and make people work to come up with new data or alternate explanations." Psychologist David Rowe of the University of Arizona agreed heartily with the new study. "Parents probably deserve less credit for when things go well, and much less blame for problems," he said. But the study "does not imply that parenting is without lasting effects," the group wrote. "Parents can produce . . . effects if they grossly deprive or mistreat all their children. It seems reasonable that charismatic, dedicated parents determined to make all their children share certain personal qualities, interests, or values, may sometimes succeed." The researchers found that 70% of the intelligence quotient -- IQ -- is accounted for by genes, the strongest correlation found for any characteristic. Genetics also accounts for about 50% of personality differences, including traits such as extroversion; 50% of religiosity, including how often someone attends religious events, and about 40% for job interest variations. Environment accounts for the rest of the differences, but the researchers note that even two children in the same family may not share the same environment. "The environment molds your personality, but your genes determine what kind of environment you . . . seek," said Minnesota psychologist David T. Lykken, one of the study's authors. Studies of genetically identical twins -- which occur about once in every 240 births when a fertilized egg splits into two embryos during development -- are especially valuable to researchers. If the twins are adopted into different families at birth and raised separately, then the study provides a unique tool to separate the closely entwined effects of nature and nurture. Three previous studies of such twins have been conducted, but the Minnesota study, begun in 1979, is by far the largest, now enrolling more than 100 sets from around the world. The study has been widely profiled in the news media because of the eerie similarities that have been observed in reunited twins. Jerry Levey and Mark Newman, for example, were twins who did not meet until the age of 30. When they were reunited, both had similar mustaches and hairstyles, aviator glasses, big belt buckles and big key rings. Each was a volunteer firefighter and made his living installing safety equipment. Each drank Budweiser and crushed the cans when he finished. Levey and Newman are the rule, not the exception, Bouchard has found. "We think of each pair of identical twins as one piece of music played by two different musicians," Bouchard said. "The music can be played fantastically, or it may not run right. But you'll always be able to recognize the piece. That's because nature writes the score. Environment is responsible for the playing technique." Now, the Minnesota researchers report in today's Science paper, they have been able to quantify the contribution of genetics. But Bouchard also cautions: "Just because something's genetically influenced doesn't mean it's chiseled in stone. . . . If I see a child who has problems with aggression, I don't curse genetics. I recommend a therapist."

text:find text:inform text:on text:the text:effect text:of text:the text:dietari text:intak text:of text:potassium text:magnesium text:and text:fruit text:and text:veget text:as text:determin text:of text:bone text:miner text:densiti text:in text:elderli text:men text:and text:women text:thu text:prevent text:osteoporosi (text:bone text:decai)
Calcium supplements can retard bone loss associated with osteoporosis, but only in older women who have been postmenopausal for at least five years and who have calcium-deficient diets, a study published in Thursday's New England Journal of Medicine reveals. Among women who have been postmenopausal five years or less, calcium supplements appear ineffective in preventing a very rapid phase of bone loss, said Dr. Bess Dawson-Hughes, chief of the calcium and bone metabolism laboratory at the USDA Human Nutrition Research Center on Aging at Tufts University in Boston. But after about five years, calcium supplements appear to kick in, preventing further bone deterioration. "That's where the good news is. If you are out of that rapid dip period, and if you have a low dietary intake, then increasing your calcium to the recommended dietary allowances has a very substantial benefit," she said. Past research on the effectiveness of calcium supplements has yielded mixed results because most studies have failed to distinguish between women who are recently postmenopausal and those who are well beyond menopause, Dawson-Hughes said. As a result, calcium is widely held as important in preventing bone loss, but medical experts have not agreed on the need for supplements. "You have to look at subsets of the postmenopausal population," Dawson-Hughes said. "We had enough people here that we could partition them into subsets and thereby develop more of an idea of what was going on." The study is clear on two other points. Women who already achieve high calcium intake through their diets do not need supplements. And supplements of calcium citrate malate, a form patented by Procter & Gamble and found in Citrus Hill Plus Calcium orange and grapefruit juices, appeared to be better absorbed than calcium carbonate, the more popular form found in over-the-counter products such as Tums, Dawson-Hughes said. The study examined 301 healthy, postmenopausal women ages 40 to 70 for two years. Half of the women had a usual dietary calcium intake of less than 400 milligrams a day -- about two servings of calcium-rich food. Women with dietary calcium intakes of 400 to 650 milligrams a day made up the second group. The Recommended Daily Allowance for adults ages 25 and older is 800 milligrams a day, about four servings of a calcium-rich food. American women, however, rarely achieve the RDA for calcium through diet alone, Dawson-Hughes said. Calcium is found in milk, yogurt, cheese, canned salmon and sardines, and dark green leafy vegetables such as broccoli, collard greens and kale. Each group was randomly divided into three subgroups: those who received 500 milligrams of calcium carbonate, those who received 500 milligrams of calcium citrate malate and those who received a placebo. Bone measurements were taken in the neck, spine and forearm. The results showed that women who had undergone menopause five or fewer years earlier had significant bone loss that was unaffected by supplements in any form. At menopause, the female hormone estrogen, which helps protect against bone loss, begins to decline rapidly. "Among recently postmenopausal women, we found that the calcium supplementation didn't seem to matter," Dawson-Hughes said. "The bone seems to be under such strong influence of the body's dropping estrogen level." But after about five years, the supplements appeared to prevent further bone loss in women deficient in calcium. "The study is encouraging because it suggests that calcium can help prevent bone loss, which has been disputed by some researchers," said Bonnie Liebman, a nutritionist for the Center for Science in the Public Interest in Washington. "I don't think women who have recently undergone menopause should say, 'I'm not going to worry about calcium for five years.' " But Liebman said the study's findings that calcium citrate malate was more effective than calcium carbonate deserves follow-up study because the former is generally more costly and available only in Citrus Hill Plus Calcium fruit juices. The study does not reveal whether calcium carbonate would be more effective in higher doses or if taken with food, Liebman said (the subjects took the supplements without food). The study found women with lower dietary calcium intake who consumed calcium citrate malate had no significant bone loss. Women who received calcium carbonate maintained bone density in the hip and forearm but lost bone in the spine. The women on the placebo lost 2% to 3% of bone density at the hip, forearm and spine over two years. Among women with higher dietary calcium intake, there were no differences among subjects taking either form of calcium supplement or the placebo. "This fits with the idea that (supplementation) benefits those who are deficient," Dawson-Hughes said. "But more and more and more is not better and better and better. "Women in America, in this age range, have an intake of 475 milligrams a day. That's very little -- just over half the RDA -- of what they need," Dawson-Hughes said. "I would promote the use of calcium-rich foods as a first priority. When a woman is unable to meet the requirements by doing that, using supplements would be your second preferred route."

text:how text:often text:were text:the text:peac text:talk text:in text:ireland text:delai text:or text:disrupt text:as text:a text:result text:of text:act text:of text:violenc
JANUARY 11 1993: Sir Patrick Mayhew says that pressure within the IRA for an end to violence is mounting FEBRUARY 22: Oral message from Provisional Movement leaders: The conflict is over but we need your advice on how to bring it to a close. We wish to have an unannounced ceasefire in order to hold dialogue leading to peace. We cannot announce such a move as it will lead to confusion for the volunteers because the press will misinterpret it as a surrender. We cannot meet secretary of state's public renunciation of violence, but it would be given privately as long as we were sure that we were not being tricked. FEBRUARY 26: Warrington bomb explodes gasworks. A British government message: We understand and appreciate the seriousness of what has been said. We wish to take it seriously and at face value. That will of course be influenced by events on the ground over the coming days and weeks . . . It is not possible to give a substantive reply immediately. MARCH 5: Message from Provisional leaders: We would like two representatives, Martin McGuinness and Gerry Kelly, to have an exploratory meeting with you as soon as possible. MARCH 7: IRA bomb injures 4 policemen in Bangor MARCH 11: British message: In the light of the continued violence of recent days since the first response we are not yet able to send a substantive response. MARCH 19: British message: 1. The importance of what has been said, the wish to take it seriously, and the influence of events on the ground, have been acknowledged. 2. It is essential that there should be no deception on either side. 3. The position of the British government on dealing with those who espouse violence is clearly understood . . . We confirm that if violence had genuinely been brought to an end, whether or not that fact had been announced, then dialogue could take place. 4. Once a halt to activity became public, the government would have to acknowledge and defend its entry into dialogue. It would do so by pointing out that its agreement to exploratory dialogue . . . had been given because . . . it had received a private assurance that organised violence had been brought to an end. 5. The British government has made clear that: No political objective which is advocated by constitutional means alone could properly be excluded from discussion. The commitment to return as much responsibility as possible to local politicians should be seen within a wider framework. New political arrangements would be designed to ensure that no legitimate group was excluded from eligibility to share in the exercise of this responsibility. In the event of a genuine and established ending of violence, the whole range of responses to it would inevitably be looked at afresh. 6. The British government . . . wants to see included in this process all main parties which have sufficiently shown they genuinely do not espouse violence. 7. The British government cannot enter a talks process . . . with the purpose of achieving a predetermined outcome. It has accepted that the eventual outcome of such a process could be a united Ireland, but only on the basis of the consent of the people of Northern Ireland. But unless the people of Northern Ireland come to express such a view, the British government will continue to uphold the union. 8. Evidence on the ground that any group had ceased violent activity would induce resulting reduction of security force activity. 9. It is important to establish whether this provides a basis for the way forward. We are ready to answer specific questions or to give further explanation. MARCH 20: Warrington bomb explodes in shopping centre. MARCH 22: Oral message from Provisional leaders: The last thing we needed at this sensitive time was what has happened. It is the fate of history that we find ourselves in this position, all we can think of at this time is an old Irish proverb: 'God's hand works in mysterious ways.' Our hope is that this hand will lead to peace and friendship. APRIL 10: SDLP leader John Hume meets Sinn Fein's Gerry Adams. APRIL 24: Bishopsgate bomb explodes in City of London. MAY 10: Message from Provisonal leaders: We welcome face-to-face exchanges with your representative . . . We wish now to proceed without delay to the delegation meetings . . . We would like to nominate someone to liaise with Martin McGuinness on this. We also have a number of questions: (a) Who will represent you? (b) When will the British government be politically represented in this process and by whom? (c) We need clarification of the phrase 'progressive entry into dialogue'. (d) When will this start? (e) Where is the proposed venue? It would be more practical and quicker if these details could be agreed directly with Mr McGuinness. UK government note: The 'face-to-face exchanges with your representative' referred to in the first sentence was the unauthorised meeting between Mr McGuinness and a British official. MAY 20: 1,000lb bomb explodes in Belfast, injuring 20. JUNE 1: Message from Provisional leaders: The Provisional leadership is dismayed that it has not yet received a formal reply to its offer. JULY 22: Message from Provisional leadership: 4. British sovereignty over the six counties, as with all of Ireland before partition, is the inherent cause of political instability and conflict. This must be addressed. 5. We seek to assist the establishment of, and to support, a process which . . . culminates in . . . the end of your jurisdiction. 6. We believe that the wish of the majority of the Irish people is for Irish unity. 7. Your disavowal of any prior objective is contradicted by your commitment to uphold the unionist veto. The consequence of upholding the veto is, in effect, to set as your objective maintenance of partition and the six-county statelet . . . The potentially historic opportunity which this represents for the cause of peace in Ireland should not be lost. We have outlined our position. You have outlined yours. It is now time to move on. You should arrange for us to do so as speedily as possible. JULY 17: British message: There was no ulterior motive in any delay . . . Although it was absolutely clear from the attacks which took place in March that events on the ground could halt progress, these attacks following the May elections went ahead . . . Does the ending of conflict remain your objective, and is there a way forward? JULY 23: Major wins vote of confidence. AUGUST 14: Message from Provisional leadership: You asserted the belief that a two-week suspension to accommodate talks would result in republicans being persuaded that there is no further need for armed struggle. Because of our commitment to a lasting settlement . . . we sought and received a commitment to facilitate that step. You failed to grasp that opportunity. As for events on the ground. The greatest number of fatalities for some time now in the conflict have resulted from the actions of loyalist groups acting both on their own agenda and as surrogates for British intelligence . . . SEPTEMBER 3: British message: The importance of clear mutual understanding has already been recognised. Minds do not seem to be meeting at the moment. This needs to be over-come. The note you sent on August 14 did not . . . confirm that you envisage a peace process which is aimed at an inclusive political process and that a lasting end to violence does not depend on your analysis being endorsed as the only way forward . . . On a further point in it, the government side has not asserted a belief that a two-week suspension would have the result described . . . Can you confirm that you want a peace process which is aimed at an inclusive political process and that a lasting end to violence does not depend on your analysis being endorsed as the only way forward? OCTOBER 23: IRA bomb in Protestant Shankhill Road kills 10 inlcuding one bomber. OCTOBER 27: Gerry Adams helps carry the bomber's coffin. OCTOBER 29: John Major and Albert Reynolds set out six guiding principles for a settlement at Brussels summit. OCTOBER 30: Seven murdered by loyalist Ulster Freedom Fighters in Greysteel. NOVEMBER 2: Message from Provisional leaders: This problem cannot be solved by the Reynolds-Spring situation, although they're part of it. You appear to have rejected the Hume-Adams situation though they too are part of it . . . Now we can't even have dialogue to work out how a total end to all violence can come about. We believe that the country could be at the point of no return. In plain language please tell us though as a matter of urgency when you will open dialogue in the event of a total end to hostilities. We believe that if all the documents involved are put on the table - including your nine-paragrapher and our May 10 - that we have the basis of an understanding. NOVEMBER 5: British message: 1. Your message of November 2 is taken as being of the greatest importance and significance. 2. We hold to what was said jointly and in public by the prime minister and the Taoiseach in Brussels on October 29. A copy of the statement is annexed. 3. Any dialogue could only follow a permanent end to violent activity. 4. If, as you have offered, you were to give us an unequivocal assurance that violence has indeed been brought to a permanent end, and that accordingly Sinn Fein is now committed to political progress by peaceful and democratic means alone, we will make clear publicly our commitment to enter exploratory dialogue with you. Our public statement will make clear that, provided your private assurance is promptly confirmed publicly after our public statement and that events on the ground are fully consistent with this, a first meeting for exploratory dialogue will take place within a week of parliament's return in January. 5. Exploratory dialogue will have the following purposes: (i) To explore the basis upon which Sinn Fein would come to be admitted to an inclusive political talks process . . . but without anticipating the negotiations within that process. (ii) To exchange views on how Sinn Fein would be able over a period to play the same part as the current constitutional parties in the public life of Northern Ireland. (iii) To examine the practical consequences of the ending of violence. 6. The attached Annex summarises the sequence of events and provides answers to the procedural questions concerning exploratory dialogue which have been raised. 7. If, in advance of our public statement, any public statement is made on your behalf which appears to us inconsistent with this basis for proceeding it would not be possible for us then to proceed. 8. If we receive the necessary assurance, which you have offered, that violence has been brought to an end, we shall assume that you are assenting to the basis for proceeding explained in this note and its attachment. The procedural annexe included the following points: 2. The sequence of events would be as follows: (i) There is an unequivocal private assurance that violence has been brought to a permanent end, and accordingly that Sinn Fein has affirmed that it is henceforth committed to political progress by peaceful and democratic means alone. (ii) Soon after receiving the necessary satisfactory assurance, and on the assumption that events on ground are consistent with this assurance, we will make a public statement indicating our agreement in principle to enter exploratory dialogue in January provided the private assurance is promptly confirmed publicly and continues to be demonstrated on the ground. (iii) If a genuine end to violence is brought about within the next few days, a first meeting for exploratory dialogue would take place within a week of parliament's return in January. 3. At the first meeting of exploratory dialogue each party could field up to three delegates to be seated at the table. The possible need for the additional presence of advisers on each side is something which could be addressed at the logistical meeting. 4. It is for each party to decide who should represent it at this and at subsequent meetings . . . It is assumed that each party will wish its representatives to have the seniority appropriate to its authorised representatives. The British side will be represented by senior officials acting under political authority and direction . . .

text:what text:unexpect text:or text:unexplain text:cosmic text:event text:or text:celesti text:phenomena text:such text:as text:radiat text:and text:supernova text:outburst text:or text:new text:comet text:have text:been text:detect
Lo, the Star, which they had seen in the east, went before them, till it came and stood over where the young child was. - St. Matthew, chapter 2, verse 9. Comet? Supernova? Conjunction of planets? Myth? Or miracle? Those, broadly speaking, are the five favourite explanations for the Star of Bethlehem - an apparition whose identity has attracted much speculation from astronomers, amateur and professional, over the years. Of course the atheist who regards the Bible as superstitious nonsense can dismiss the Star as a figment of the imagination of whoever wrote Matthew's gospel. At the other extreme, the fundamentalist who regards the Bible as literal truth can claim the Star simply as a miracle; if so, there is no point in trying to relate a divine sign to known astronomical events. However, there are many Christians who would be prepared to believe that God made use of natural events to give a sign of his Son's coming. And there are many non-Christians who accept that there could be historical - though not supernatural - explanations for some stories in the Bible. So, what natural phenomena could account for the Star of Bethlehem? Anyone who has seen the planet Venus shining bright in the western sky on a crisp winter evening may feel that no further explanation is needed. But Venus could not really be the answer. Nor could any other regular feature of our night sky. Surely only a really remarkable portent would have drawn the wise men or Magi several hundred miles west to Palestine from their presumed homes in Persia. If we are looking for a special astronomical event, we need to know its date as accurately as possible. Our current system of numbering years, supposedly starting from Christ's birth, was not fixed until the 6th century AD, when the historical record was far from clear. Modern Bible scholars believe that the date of the nativity was somewhere between 8 BC when the Emperor Augustus ordered his great tax census and 4 BC when King Herod died. They have no clues about the time of year. Three or four centuries later, people began to celebrate Christmas just after the winter solstice, to take advantage of existing pagan festivals. Although no reliable astronomical chronicles survive from the Roman Empire, we do have such records from ancient China. They provide no clear evidence that a brilliant new star appeared in the sky between 8 and 4 BC. This seems to rule out the most obvious explanation for the Star of Bethlehem - a supernova or gigantic cosmic explosion elsewhere in our galaxy. However, Chinese observers did describe a bright comet which appeared in the spring of 5 BC and remained visible well into the summer. A comet with a vertical tail might fit Matthew's description of a Star that 'stood over' Bethlehem. Although some historians have rejected this theory on the grounds that a comet was usually regarded as an ill omen, others maintain that a comet could equally well portend good news in the ancient world. A different line of argument moves away from the Christmas card image of the Star as something spectacularly bright and beautiful. After all, St. Matthew tells us that Herod, his chief priests and scribes failed to notice it until the wise men appeared in Jerusalem. Perhaps the Magi saw a more subtle astrological sign. This would not have been obvious to the contemporary Jewish court, which paid little attention to astrology, but could have been a powerful portent for the wise men, who were probably Zoroastrian priests from Persia. The most likely event of this sort occurred in 7 BC - a 'triple conjunction' of the planets Jupiter and Saturn in the constellation Pisces. The planets appeared close together in the sky on three occasions during the year, most dramatically on September 15 when they rose simultaneously above the horizon at sunset. David Hughes, an astronomer at Sheffield University, believes that the wise men took this as the moment of Christ's birth. Jupiter was king of the gods, Saturn represented justice and Pisces was the sign of the Jews, giving the event an astrological potency that is hard to imagine today. Whatever happened, the Star is a romantic addition to the Christmas story, not an essential part of its message. But for some astronomers it is the most fascinating mystery in the Bible - all the better because there is little prospect of anyone ever coming up with a definitive solution.

text:what text:is text:be text:done text:to text:treat text:the text:symptom text:of text:parkinson' text:diseas text:and text:keep text:the text:patient text:function text:as text:long text:as text:possibl
Although Alzheimer's is the most common cause of dementia, there are more than 70 others. Dementia may be triggered by strokes, high blood pressure, alcoholism, medications, brain tumors and infections, depression and rare diseases that cause brain damage, including Pick's, Huntington's and Parkinson's. ALZHEIMER'S DISEASE The disease most closely associated with aging, Alzheimer's causes the progressive deterioration of the brain to such an extent as to render victims unable to recognize their spouses and immediate family. The patient may become confused, unable to concentrate and have trouble finishing sentences. More than 70% of the patients had behavioral disorders, such as unprovoked aggressiveness. Over time, Alzheimer's leaves victims as helpless (and just as needing) as children. No treatment is available to stop or reverse its degenerative effects. MULTI-INFARCT DEMENTIA Multi-infarct dementia, or vascular dementia, is caused by multiple strokes (infarcts) in the brain. Because the strokes usually occur before the symptoms of dementia appear, the onset of the dementia seems sudden. The strokes affect the part of the brain responsible for specific functions, such as calculations, and create the more generalized symptoms of disorientation and behavioral changes. Because of multi-infarct dementia's similarity to Alzheimer's, the two coexist in 15% to 20% of dementia patients. No cure or reversing process exists, but early assessment of cause can halt the progression of the disease. PARKINSON'S DISEASE Those with Parkinson's lack dopamine in their systems. This neurotransmitter helps control the tremor, stiffness and slowness characteristic of the disease. In late stages, some patients develop dementia. Parkinson's patients often develop Alzheimer's and, at times, Alzheimer's patients develop Parkinson's symptoms. Drugs can treat the motor symptoms associated with Parkinson's but do not improve any mental deterioration. Parkinson's is considered a model for drug research on Alzheimer's disease.  Dollars and Financial Impact Fewer research dollars go toward studying Alzheimer's disease, and other dementing illnesses, than heart disease, cancer or AIDS. Yet, Alzheimer's, the fourth-leading cause of death among adults in the country, claims more than 100,000 lives annually. An estimated 4 million seniors suffer from the disease nationally, while Orange County has 40,000 Alzheimer's victims who struggle to cope with the mysteriously debilitating brain disorder. There is no known reason why the disease strikes people over the age of 60, and there is no known cure for this ultimately fatal disease. Further, total costs, which include diagnosis, treatment, long-term care and lost wages, is estimated to be more than $88 billion each year. The federal government covers $4.4 billion of these costs and state coffers are dipped into for another $4.1 billion. But the remaining $79 billion is borne by Alzheimer's patients and their families. RESEARCH DOLLARS AND THE FINANCIAL IMPACT OF DEMENTIAS ON SOCIETY   Differences Between AAMI and Alzheimer's Disease The term age-associated memory impairment (AAMI) refers to the minor memory difficulties that come with age, or are often brought on by stress. AAMI differs from Alzheimer's disease, and other related dementias, in that AAMI is neither debilitating nor progressive. Commonly thought of as "forgetfulness," AAMI can be brought on by grief, depression, illness, stress, medication, alcohol, fatigue, lack of concentration or just attempting to remember too many details at once.   Alzheimer's Disease Alzheimer's disease, often mistakenly thought to be the definition of dementia, is the most commonly known of the 60 possible causes of senile dementia. Declines in intellectual functions and in the ability to perform routine activities often renders dementia victims virtually without memory, as dependent as infants on the support of others to feed, clothe and bathe themselves. A steady loss of brain cells intensifies the symptoms of deteriorating memory, impaired judgment, depression, a lack of concentration and restlessness. In 1989, people 75 years and older ran the greatest risk of falling victim to the debilitating and often incurable symptoms of senile dementia. And, within the next 50 years, as the nation's senior population grows, the number of dementia patients is expected to triple. At what age are you most likely to fall victim to dementia? Age Range: Percentage 55-64: 5 % 65-74: 16 % 75-84: 42 % 85 and older: 37 % Source: Source: National Institute on Aging  What Is Dementia? Dementia is a term applied to a group of progressively debilitating symptoms, including the inability to learn or remember information, repetitive behavior, inarticulateness and personality and behavioral changes. Even at advanced ages, memory loss that interferes with everyday life is not normal. Any person exhibiting an increased inability to think or reason should contact one of the local assessment centers in Orange County or consult a neurologist to determine the cause of the dementia. Progression rates of dementia vary, and depending on the condition causing the brain cells to deteriorate, often the symptoms can be minimized to slow progress of the disease. FACTS ABOUT DEMENTIA YOU SHOULD KNOW: * Nearly 20% of the causes of dementia can be corrected. Thyroid imbalances, brain tumors, drug intoxication, alcoholism and infections are just a few of the many treatable, and reversible, causes of dementia. * Alzheimer's disease is not a generic term for forgetfulness. Rather, Alzheimer's is the most common form of the progressive, degenerative and, ultimately, fatal diseases that produce dementia. Parkinson's disease, multi-infarct dementia, Huntington's disease, Lou Gehrig's disease and multiple sclerosis are other well-known diseases whose link to dementia are irreversible. * Early signs of dementia include memory problems, depression, anxiety and an inability to concentrate long enough to read or follow the plot of television shows. * In Orange County, there are more than 40,000 victims of Alzheimer's disease. Nationally, an estimated 4 million seniors are affected by the disease. By the year 2040, the total number of Alzheimer's disease victims is expected to triple. * Over 50% of all nursing home patients suffer from dementia-related disorders. The annual cost of nursing facility care ranges from $24,000 to $36,000. * An estimated 70% of all Alzheimer's victims are cared for at home, by their families. Annual costs of home care are approximately $18,000. * Congress is considering increasing the amount in federal spending allotted for Alzheimer's disease research to $132 million in fiscal year 1990, an increase that would average out to a little more than $50 per patient. By comparison, the National Institutes of Health invests 10 times that amount for research on cancer, heart disease and AIDS. * In the case of Alzheimer's, there is no cure and the cause of the disease is not known. ORANGE COUNTY ASSESSMENT FACILITIES For more information regarding the symptoms of dementia, or to schedule an assessment, contact one of the medical facilities listed below: UC Irvine Alzheimer's Disease Diagnostic and Treatment Center (714) 725-2382 UCI Medical Center-HAPS Clinic (714) 634-6094 Los Alamitos Medical Center 714) 826-6400 Ext. 3279 St. Jude Alzheimer's Assessment Center (714) 871-3280 Ext. 3059 or call the Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Assn. at (714) 631-0245. Source: Alzheimer's Disease and Related Disorders Assn. Inc.

text:what text:is text:the text:impact text:of text:poach text:on text:the text:world' text:variou text:wildlif text:preserv
This is what happened after Richard E. Leakey, world-renowned paleontologist, author and conservationist, head of the Kenya National Museums for 20 years, decided to speak out on the issue of wildlife poaching in the country's national parks: Leakey's reputation as a scientist and museum administrator was harshly attacked in the local press. The government reorganized the museum board behind his back, prompting him to submit his resignation. Despite being a native Kenyan and a citizen, whose younger brother serves in the Kenyan Parliament and as deputy tourism minister, Leakey was derided by one government minister as a "cheeky white" who felt that black Africans could not manage their own affairs. But in the fullness of time, Leakey's reputation and career have recovered. Soon after his resignation, a public uproar forced the government to restore the old museum board, and he withdrew his resignation. More recently, Leakey became head of the Department of Wildlife Conservation and Management, succeeding one of his critics. For all of that, his experiences underscore one thing: wildlife conservation in Kenya is sensitive business.  Conservation Rivalries Few events have laid open the rivalries between conservationists and bureaucrats -- and among the conservationists themselves -- as a scandal here over poaching and Leakey's outspokenness on the subject. How Kenya undertakes to protect its valued wildlife has long been a tender issue, because there is little any developing country can do to combat a gang of determined poachers. Many people here feel that the only solution is to "privatize" wildlife preserves, by establishing quasi-private companies to run existing preserves or otherwise placing them in private hands that can afford to safeguard their perimeters. But Kenyan officials are particularly sensitive to criticism, partly because they fear the impact that negative publicity might have on the country's significant tourist trade. "After all, most of us want to remain in the country," remarked one leading local zoologist, who was reluctant to discuss the issue. With a multiplicity of international and local wildlife clubs and funds and societies representing a variety of interests and philosophies, Kenyan conservationists, like keepers of the flame anywhere, often spend as much time sorting out their own differences as they do fighting a common foe. "Oh, yes," says Imre Loefler, a local surgeon and prominent conservationist, "there are enormous disagreements in the conservation community. This community has various traits and prejudices. At one extreme is the most bigoted right wing -- strictly anti-humans -- and at the other are those only interested in a few species. They're generally employed in the tourist industry." In few other places, moreover, are the conflicts between the needs of wildlife protection and those of the human population so sharply etched as in Kenya. Wildlife is Kenya's greatest tourist draw, and tourism its third-largest foreign exchange earner: The 700,000 visitors expected this year will leave behind well over $350 million in foreign currency. With coffee and tea prices locked in a long slump, tourism may be Kenya's only growth industry.  Competing With Humans Yet Kenya's elephants, rhinos, lions and antelope occupy land that comes at an increasing premium and for which they must compete ever more aggressively with the country's human population, which is growing faster than that of any other nation. In Narok, a farm district next to Masai Mara National Park, one of Kenya's most popular game reserves, a herd of elephants not long ago invaded a plantation of bananas and vegetables; in their haste to reach the food, they trampled a woman to death. In Tana River district, which includes part of Tsavo East Game Reserve, 88 people have been killed by animals since 1980, according to the Department of Tourism and Wildlife. "With growing population pressures, one has to show the politicians that setting aside preserves is economically productive, whether that involves tourism, hunting or exploitation" such as harvesting ivory, Loefler says. "You can't tell people anymore that we're just going to do this for sentimental reasons." Adding to the underlying tension is a racial element: The wildlife conservation community here largely comprises white expatriate Europeans and Americans, some of whom may not be fully sensitive to the competing interests of a poor and developing land. What set all this tinder aflame was an apparent surge of poaching late last year in Kenya's national parks. Tourists began returning from safaris in the parks, not with tales of bongo on the hoof and lions at repose yawning in the grass and trees, but of mountains of elephant carcasses, with trunks and tusks ghoulishly lopped off. Reports reached Nairobi of poaching gangs armed with automatic weapons engaging park rangers in lengthy shoot-outs. In November, Perez Olindo, Leakey's predecessor as director of Wildlife and Conservation Management, detailed the six-month war's casualties: six game rangers killed, nine wounded. In the longer term, Olindo said, poaching had reduced Kenya's elephant population in 13 years from 140,000 to 22,000. Other unofficial estimates placed the elephant population as low as 16,000. It was into this ferment that Leakey jumped with both feet last fall. Just after Tourism and Wildlife Minister George Muhoho called a news conference to pledge a redoubled government anti-poaching effort, Leakey called his own conference as chairman of the East African Wildlife Society. Calling poaching "a growing national crisis" and "economic sabotage," he labeled the government's approach toward wildlife protection "lip service" and charged that high officials of the wildlife department itself were participating in poaching. The remarks by Leakey, one of the few Kenyans of his stature to speak out, brought the poaching issue to the forefront of national and international attention. The elder son of the late Louis Leakey, whose work at Olduvai Gorge in Tanzania was critical in the study of early man, Leakey has made many important discoveries himself. His directorship of the national museums is widely regarded as having given those institutions a preeminent position in study of prehistory.  Family's Prominent Role Finally, there could be few white families who have played as prominent a role as natives and citizens in Kenya's post-independence period as have the Leakeys. Muhoho at first replied with what Kenya's leading newspaper, the Daily Nation, later disapprovingly termed a "contentious response": He called Leakey a "cheeky white." Yet, it was not only Kenyan officials who felt Leakey had shot from the hip. "There's no question whatsoever that he was doing a bit of grandstanding," said David Western, chairman of the governing council of the Wildlife Clubs of Kenya. In any event, the wildlife rangers temporarily recovered some of their morale. The government staffed the parks with a detachment of its paramilitary General Services Unit,  Mounds of Carcasses Nevertheless, in succeeding months, it has become clear that the tide of poaching in the national parks, particularly of elephants, has not appreciably been stemmed. Mounds of carcasses still appear, and public concern over the situation has not abated. Leakey's outburst may finally have borne its most important fruit last month when he got a chance to take full charge of correcting the ills he has complained about. The government appointed him to replace Olindo as the man directly responsible for protecting Kenya's wildlife.

text:what text:tropic text:storm (text:hurrican text:and text:typhoon) text:have text:caus text:signific text:properti text:damag text:and text:loss text:of text:life
The names will be different, but more hurricanes with the powerful punches of Hugo and Gilbert may be prowling the Atlantic, Caribbean and Gulf of Mexico in the future. "The probability of more intense hurricanes in the Atlantic region is greater in the next decade or two than it has been in the 1970s and '80s," says meteorologist William M. Gray of Colorado State University, who analyzes hurricane patterns. Gray predicts a possible return of the more ferocious hurricanes of the '50s and '60s, because of an apparent break in the periodic West African drought. Rainfall in the Sahel, typically associated with more intense hurricane activity, was above average in 1988 for the first time since 1969, he says. A second rainy summer this year indicates an end to the drought. The most intense hurricanes, Gray explains, usually form at low latitudes from tropical disturbances moving westward from Africa. The well-watered conditions in the '50s and '60s produced 31 of the most severe kind (categories 4 and 5) in the 17-year period 1950 to 1967. Hurricanes are classified by the Saffir-Simpson scale, the fiercest a No. 5, or catastrophic storm. The atmospheric pressure at its center drops drastically and its wind speed exceeds 155 m.p.h. In the drier 17-year period of 1970 to 1987, there were only 13 severe storms. In the '88 and '89 seasons -- June through November -- there have been five. Last year's Gilbert, which left a wide swath of devastation across Jamaica and the Mexican Yucatan, was the mightiest hurricane on record in the Western Hemisphere. Its atmospheric pressure dropped to 885 millibars and its wind speed reached 200 m.p.h. This September's Hugo, which ripped through the Virgin Islands and Puerto Rico before clobbering South Carolina, had sustained winds of 150 m.p.h. and an atmospheric pressure of 918 millibars (27.1 inches). Officially a 4 on the Saffir-Simpson scale, it "may be a borderline 5," says meteorologist Mark Zimmer of the National Hurricane Center in Miami. The strongest recorded storm on Earth, Zimmer says, was 1979 Typhoon Tip in the western Pacific, with a low pressure of 870 millibars. Outside the Atlantic area and the eastern Pacific, hurricanes are called typhoons or cyclones. Fortunately, most Atlantic-region hurricanes do not develop to their worst potential. In this century, only two No. 5 hurricanes have struck the United States with full force, the 1935 Labor Day storm that ravaged the Florida Keys and 1969's Camille, which slammed ashore at Mississippi and Louisiana. In 1980, Allen, the mightiest Caribbean storm then recorded, had lost much of its punch before it hit the Gulf Coast of Texas. "If the future is like the past with its pattern of atmospheric conditions, there is a good probability of the return of stronger storms," Gray said. But in the 1990s, he warns, U.S. destruction will be at least four to five times more costly than in the '50s and '60s, because of the boom in population and property development along coastal areas. The threat of global warming also portends hurricanes more powerful than any yet recorded, says meteorologist Kerry Emanuel of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology. Hurricanes are like huge, self-sustaining heat engines spinning across the sea. They get their power from the water's warmth. To develop, they need tropical ocean-surface temperatures of about 80 degrees Fahrenheit. "If tropical ocean temperatures go up, the intensity of hurricanes will," Emanuel explains. "Sea-surface temperatures set the upper limits." The biggest uncertainty, he says, is whether global warming will affect tropical ocean temperatures. The gradual warming of the Earth results from the greenhouse effect, caused primarily by the accumulation of carbon dioxide and methane in the atmosphere, which, like the glass of a greenhouse, trap heat.

text:what text:legal text:action text:have text:result text:from text:the text:destruct text:of text:pan text:am text:flight text:103 text:over text:lockerbi text:scotland text:on text:decemb text:21 text:1988
A US jury yesterday found Pan American World Airways guilty of wilful misconduct in a case filed by relatives of the victims killed in the bombing of a Pan Am jumbo jet over Lockerbie, Scotland. Pan Am Flight 103 ended in disaster on December 21 1988, when a bomb hidden inside a portable cassette player tore the jet apart shortly after it left London for New York. All 259 people on board the Boeing 747, and 11 people on the ground, were killed. Yesterday's verdict comes after a civil trial lasting nearly 11 weeks in a Brooklyn federal court. The plaintiffs are seeking more than Dollars 300m (Pounds 157m) in damages from the airline and two subsidiaries, Pan American World Services and Alert Management. Under international treaties, liability damages are limited to Dollars 75,000 for each victim unless wilful negligence is proved. A second phase of the trial, to determine the amount of damages to be awarded, will now have to take place. No date for this has yet been scheduled. Pan Am, which stopped operating last year, is also thought likely to appeal against yesterday's verdict. Lawyers acting for Pan Am and its own legal department declined to make any immediate comment on the verdict. The case centred on how the bomb got on board the jet. The plaintiffs argued that the bomb had been placed in an unaccompanied suitcase, and put on an Air Malta flight to Frankfurt. This bag, they contended, was then improperly transferred to Flight 103 by a Pan Am employee. The employee, they contended, failed to examine the bag and note that it did not belong to anyone travelling on the flight. The defence argued that the bag was smuggled into the Pan Am system at Frankfurt, or even London, by terrorists. Lawyers said the plaintiffs were seeking 'private vengeance' against the carriers, which had no control over the disaster. The jury was also told that the airline had improved security measures in the months before the disaster. Pan Am, which had been losing money for many years, went into bankruptcy in January 1991, and ceased operating last December. Its affairs are still being wound up, but the airline's insurers would be liable for any damage award. Yesterday, Mr Tom Plaskett, who was in charge of Pan Am at the time of the Lockerbie bombing, claimed that the trial had 'failed to solve the mystery that is the Lockerbie disaster'. 'Much of what we do know with certainty about Lockerbie was not shared with this jury. . . We shall endeavour through the appeals process to shed some light on this uncertainty,' he said.

text:who text:is text:involv text:in text:the text:schengen text:agreement text:to text:elimin text:border text:control text:in text:western text:europ text:and text:what text:do text:thei text:hope text:to text:accomplish
West Germany sent an unsettling signal to its partners in the European Community on Thursday by postponing an agreement with its closest Western neighbors while at the same time moving toward a closer new relationship with East Germany. The West German government announced that it was holding off on concluding what had been called a landmark treaty that would eliminate border controls with France, Belgium, the Netherlands and Luxembourg. Later in the day, in East Berlin, the West Germans disclosed that they are setting up a joint economic commission with East Germans to explore such matters as trade and investment. "This is the first time," a foreign policy analyst commented, "that West Germany has allowed East German considerations to take precedence over European Community considerations. It could be a worrying precedent." The analyst, asking not to be identified by name, said: "The West Germans keep saying they are firmly embedded in the West and its institutions, but actions speak louder than words." In much of the West, the Bonn government is being carefully watched to see if developments in East Germany lead it to focus its attention on the East to the detriment of Western relations. The so-called Schengen Treaty, named for a frontier town in Luxembourg, was to have been signed today. It anticipates a phasing out of border inspections, increased police cooperation and a common policy on travel visas and ways of dealing with people seeking asylum. The treaty was to go into effect in mid-1991 and was widely regarded as a model for a broader agreement among the 12 countries of the European Community, which plan to do away with border controls in 1992. West German officials were uncommonly reticent about their reasons for delaying the treaty. They would say only that the signing had been postponed. But Prime Minister Ruud Lubbers of the Netherlands, addressing Parliament in The Hague, said that West German Chancellor Helmut Kohl wanted the delay in order to permit discussion of how developments in East Germany might affect the treaty. Kohl reportedly was persuaded by members of his Parliament to delay the signing until it is made clear that East Germans have the same freedom as West Germans to travel within the countries involved. West Germany's constitution does not recognize a separate East German state, and East Germans are treated for all practical purposes like West Germans. This has given East Germany de facto status as a member of the European Community, able to ship its goods duty-free into West Germany and from there on to the other 11 member countries. West Germany's partners in the Schengen Treaty are concerned that, if East Germany is included, undesirables might use East Germany as a way into West Germany and on into their countries. An agreement on the joint economic commission was reached at a meeting between the West German minister for economics, Helmut Haussmann, and three East German officials, Prime Minister Hans Modrow, Foreign Trade Minister Gerhard Beill and Finance Minister Christa Luft. It is expected to be ready for signature when Kohl and Modrow meet next week. It calls for closer economic cooperation between the two Germanys as East-West barriers come down. According to Haussmann, 40% of West German companies have expressed interest "in investing or cooperating in East German economic development." East German spokesman Wolfgang Meyer told reporters in East Berlin that the Kohl-Modrow meeting will be "of extraordinary significance for our country's economic development."

text:find text:inform text:on text:shipwreck text:salvag text:the text:recoveri text:or text:attempt text:recoveri text:of text:treasur text:from text:sunken text:ship
ON THE starless and stormy night of January 4 1656, the Nuestra Senora de las Maravillas - Our Lady of the Marvels - fired a cannon shot to warn the rest of its flotilla of approaching sandbanks off the Little Bahama Bank. In the confusion that followed, the Spanish treasure galleon was rammed by its sister ship, the Concepcion. According to Don Diego Portichuelo de Rivadeneryra, a priest on board the Maravillas: 'The Concepcion gave such a blow to our boom with her cutwater, which had been newly refitted in Havana and made of mahogany, that it broke in three pieces. That blow broke through our planks from the top of the waterline to the holds, making splinters of all of them.' Impaled from port to starboard, wallowing in heavy seas, the Maravillas' death throes were swift. The 40 tons of gold and silver bullion and treasure, destined to fund another of King Philip IV's interminable wars against France, dragged the 150 ft-long ship on to a coral reef. On deck, priests were mobbed by crewmen eager to make their last confessions. Some priests demanded gold and jewels as payment, doubtless hoping to survive and enjoy Heaven on Earth as well as in the hereafter. The bow of the Maravillas went down in only 30 ft of water but massive waves ripped the stern - containing most of the treasure - away to sink elsewhere. Of the 650 people on board, only 45 lived. Those who clung to debris were swept away by swirling currents. Others grabbed hold of the mast and rigging that remained above water, but died from exposure and attacks by tiger sharks. (Tiger sharks guard the wreck to this day.) The avaricious priests plunged to the bottom, their cassocks weighted down by booty. As the centuries passed, the shifting sands covered both bones and gold. But 335 years later, in 40 ft of water, a crew member scuba-diving off a salvage ship, the RV Beacon, uncovered from the sunken bow section a cache of gold coins and a Spanish colonial gold pectoral cross set with 66 well-matched emeralds. The cross was auctioned at Christie's in London nine days ago, where it fetched a record Pounds 231,000. The cross was the prize piece in a sale of 157 lots salvaged from the Maravillas, ranging from individual gold and silver coins and bars to jewellery and even a bronze signal cannon - perhaps the same one that fired that fateful shot. The sale earned the treasure hunters a total of Pounds 430,000. But the real pay-day could be to come. The Maravillas' manifest shows it was carrying cargo worth, in present-day terms, more than Dollars 1.6bn - but the real value could be much more, because Spanish sailors displayed great ingenuity at smuggling. Thus, now the cross has gone under the auctioneer's hammer, the Beacon's crew are preparing to search for the mother lode. Legend insists that, in addition to the bullion, the Maravillas' stern also contained a life-size statue of the Madonna and Child - weighing more than half a ton and cast from solid gold - plus a 400 lb gold table studded with emeralds, rubies and diamonds. If found, their value is incalculable. Herbert Humphreys, 44, heads Marex, a Memphis-based underwater salvage company which has been diving on the galleon since 1986. He says the business of recovering sunken treasure can be 'boring, tedious, expensive and dangerous.' But he adds: 'It is also one of the most exciting adventures left on earth. To dive beneath the sea and hold in your hand a weapon, a coin, a piece of jewellery or a tool that belonged to some unknown and long-dead man or woman is an experience few people can have. I have seen the stuff that dreams are made of.' Humphreys has been hooked on these particular dreams since, aged eight and playing on a Bahamas beach, he picked up a gold coin washed ashore by the shifting seas. For his 16th birthday, his father - co-founder of a cooking oil company which merged, profitably, with the giant Kraft food empire in 1951 - gave him a copy of Fell's Guide to Sunken Treasure Ships of the World. Written on the title page is the inscription: 'Hope you find Dollars 10m. Love, Dad.' Humphreys still has the well-thumbed book but, these days, his financial sights are set rather higher. Indeed, he appears to have inherited a certain financial flair. He had a private education which gave him all the traditional social graces and charm of the Southern gentleman, and travelled the world with his parents. After winning a horse-jumping competition at 16, he invested the Dollars 5,500 prize money in Philippines gold stock at 25 cents a share. He sold it a few years later at Dollars 30 a share. At 22, he became convinced that the clear waters off the Cayman Islands would be irresistible to scuba divers. So, he negotiated a Holiday Inns' franchise for Grand Cayman at a time when there were only two other small hotels on the island. Now, he has extensive shipping, air charter and travel businesses in the Caribbean and Memphis. Humphreys served in Vietnam with the US Navy. He is a qualified pilot and parachutist who speaks and writes French and Italian. Politically, he is right wing: he was a major-general in the FDN Legion, a Nicaraguan Contra organisation. His first wreck was HMS Thunderer, a British warship which went down off Honduras in 1780 carrying looted Spanish and French cargo. It was an archaeological dream untouched for 203 years. Archaeology is the key word, because Humphreys regards preservation as the first and foremost goal of treasure recovery. 'Every nail, every little pottery shard, each musket ball, literally everything we find is treasure to me. We have an artefact preservationist on board the Beacon who dedicates himself to preserving these important time capsules of the past. I want to share the results of our work with the public.' He employs a full-team of marine archaeologists and researchers and has already given precious metals and 17th century artefacts to museums in the Caribbean. Inspired by his success with the Thunderer, he founded Marex (Marine Archaeological Rescue) in 1984 and persuaded the Bahamian authorities to let him excavate the Maravillas (they get 25 per cent). Treasure-hunting today is many microchips away from a rowing boat and a snorkel. The Beacon is packed with high-tech equipment, giant sand-blowers and metal detectors. It has been searching the shallow Bahama Bank for the past five summers, raising Dollars 5m in treasure. The annual operating costs of Dollars 200,000 come from Humphreys' own pocket. When he is on board, he is the first diver out in the morning and the last one back at night. Among his own discoveries was a 100.85-carat emerald, the largest ever discovered from a shipwreck. That stimulated him still further and now he wants to explore deep-water wrecks. To that end, Marex has just signed a profit-share deal with the Shirshov Institute of Oceanology which, since the collapse of the Soviet Union, is in dire need of commercial funding. The Russians have two MIRs - three-man submarines which can operate at depths of nearly 20,000 ft (6,000 metres) - and filmed the Titanic in the north Atlantic last year. They intend to start operations in the autumn and their first targets are all in deep international waters: a 22,000-ton liner, believed to contain 50 boxes of gold, somewhere off Liberia; a World War Two submarine; and an ancient French wreck off Barbados thought to hold priceless Ming porcelain, a gift from the Chinese emperor to Louis XIV. The MIRs will be working 18-hour dives at depths where the water is pitch black, pressure would make a man implode and the greatest danger to sanity comes not from claustrophobia but its opposite, agoraphobia, triggered by being surrounded by vast expanses of open sea. There is plenty of potential to create a new industry, though. During the war, 10,000 Allied ships were sunk by enemy action. Their unrecovered cargoes include gold, silver, jewels, nickel, manganese, tin, copper and aluminium. Long term, Marex has targeted 23 wrecks with cargo valued at Dollars 500m. Retrieval costs are estimated at Dollars 35m to Dollars 50m. But while diving on ships like the Maravillas can be seen as a hobby, albeit an expensive one, financing deep-water salvage is altogether different. Although the technology has been available for years, it remains largely unproven. Investors - who accept cheerfully that it costs Dollars 90m to repair a satellite in space, or are prepared to risk Dollars 50m financing a movie that might prove a flop - are wary. Humphreys is confident of success. But he admits: 'My true love is the old wrecks because they reek of history, romance and adventure. My personal interest in this is much more than mere monetary gain. Underwater treasure-hunting has been my life-long interest and one that I believe to be the last frontier on this planet.' He hopes to strike the jackpot with the Maravillas any time now. 'Under the water, we have found some of the gold bars from the ship marked with the owners' names, and a trail of gold coins two miles long. We believe that trail is leading us towards the mother lode. This season, we will find the stern - and who knows what will be in it.'

text:what text:secur text:measur text:ar text:in text:effect text:or text:ar text:propos text:to text:go text:into text:effect text:in text:airport
US PRESIDENT George Bush yesterday called an emergency meeting of his top security advisers to discuss the rapidly worsening situation in Bosnia and the implementation of an international aid airlift to the region's beleaguered population. The meeting, attended by Mr James Baker, secretary of state, Mr Dick Cheney, defence secretary, and Mr Brent Scowcroft, national security adviser, was convened amid harrowing reports of the plight of 300,000 starving people, blockaded by Serbian forces in the Bosnian capital of Sarajevo. But US officials played down speculation that Washington and its allies were contemplating military action to end the fighting, mainly between the region's Serbs and Moslems. Before the meeting, Mr Baker said he did not believe the international community had the authority under current United Nations resolutions to use force to ensure humanitarian aid reached its destination. Nor, inspite of regular continuous consultations between members of the Security Council, were there were no any plans to pass a new UN resolution authorising the use of force at this stage, a senior State Department official said. The Pentagon confirmed that US forces in Europe were on alert transport food and medical supplies to the population of Sarajevo but stressed that the go-ahead would be given only when a ceasefire was in place. EC government leaders meeting in Lisbon yesterday were divided over what to do about the Bosnian crisis and generally cautious over suggestions that force could be used to open Sarajevo airport. French president Francois Mitterrand called for tough measures, but did not spell these out. However, his spokesman was cool about proposals for military intervention and emphasised that 'Europe had neither the vocation nor the means to be a policeman in Yugoslavia'. Britain, too, remained sceptical about military intervention. Officials suggested it would take up to 100,000 troops to secure Sarajevo and Serbian-controlled hills around the city. It is clear, however, that Washington's European allies are seriously considering their participation in a US-led humanitarian airlift for Bosnia if there is an effective ceasefire. 'If there is an effective ceasefire that lasts long enough to allow a multilateral operation safely, we would be ready to play our part,' a senior British official said. He stressed that such an operation should not involve the use of ground forces. Western European Union officials meeting in London concluded that it was feasible, in principle, for member countries clamp a to put into effect a naval embargo on of Serbia and agreed to examine ways in which the nine member countries could participate in the proposed airlift. On the ground General Ratko Mladic, the commander of Serb forces in Bosnia-Hercegovina, lashed out at western countries and warned that Serbs were ready to continue their fight. His speech contrasted with yesterday's call by Mr Radovan Karadzic, Bosnia's nationalist Serb leader, for 'an immediate halt to all artillery attacks on Sarajevo' and the withdrawal of anti-aircraft guns from the Serb-held city airport. Shelling continued yesterday in parts of the city in defiance of Mr Karadzic's order.

text:what text:ar text:new text:method text:of text:produc text:steel
Hard rock is a favourite subject among the employees of Scandinavia's construction and mining equipment companies, but they are unlikely to be discussing the latest heavy-metal band to hit the nightspots of the Nordic region. For Europe's most northerly engineering companies hard rock is the ground under their feet. Producing equipment to drill, hammer or crush it is a challenge which, once overcome, can provide a passport to success in world markets. Nowhere is that more important than in Finland, where the frozen terrain has bred a number of equipment producers which have benefited in export markets from the expertise necessary for their equipment to survive the battering it takes at home. For Finnish companies such as Rammer, which makes hydraulic hammers, Lokomo, which produces crushing equipment, and the rock-drill and underground loader producer Tamrock, exporting is now more important than ever. The local market - down by 70 per cent or more over the past two years, depending on the sector - makes the UK equipment sector look like a beacon of prosperity. But even in good times Finland has been too small a market to support engineering companies' product development spending, and forced companies to look overseas. Not everywhere outside Scandinavia has such hard rock, however, and the Finnish suppliers have had to spend heavily to manufacture a range of products suitable for all environments or to convince prospective purchasers of new uses for their hard rock equipment. The Finnish engineering sector has been through considerable upheaval over the past decade, but manufacturing is emerging as a key weapon in equipment producers' attempts to build on their hard rock foundations and remain competitive internationally despite being tucked away in a corner of Europe. In Lahti, the provincial Finnish town best known as a ski-jumping centre, production of small hydraulic hammers has undergone a quiet revolution since 1990 when Rammer's new automated factory was opened. The factory is one of around 40 flexible manufacturing systems in Finland, with three manufacturing and assembly cells grouped around an automated warehouse system into which raw materials are fed. The critical hammer parts are produced by computer-controlled machining centres and robots and matched with subcontracted parts, with final assembly mainly by hand. According to Olli Vartiainen, a production expert at the Rammer manufacturing company Bretec, production times have been reduced from four weeks to one week, and Rammer's new 20-series hammers have been 'designed for manufacture' from the start. But other important advantages of the new system have been increased flexibility and technical quality. The factory was planned to handle six hammer variations, but is now producing more than 40, he says. The new system is timely for two reasons. Following a reorganisation this year, Bretec (short for breaking technology) has become a manufacturing unit within Rammer Detec, a holding company ultimately owned by Outokumpu, the big Finnish mining and engineering group. The Rammer sales company has become a Bretec customer, a system which keeps everybody on their toes. But the new factory has also allowed the group to exploit what Pekka Heikkonen, Detec president, sees as an important change over the past two to three years in the relationship between hammer manufacturers and producers of the excavator to which hammers are normally attached. 'Excavator manufacturers never used to be interested in the attachment business, but now they are,' he says. 'If they sell an excavator with attachments as a package, they can get more added value per unit.' But each excavator company has different design priorities, and none wants to become involved in manufacturing hammers, so companies such as Bretec, which is making hammers for Caterpillar, have an opportunity so long as they can respond to several different customers at the same time. In the past two months Tamrock, based in Finland's third city of Tampere, has also opened a new factory producing rock-drills. For Tamrock, Finland represents only 2 per cent of sales, and the company has expanded from its base in hard rock drilling into all grades of rock and earth-drilling where different methods apply. That requires investment in the latest flexible manufacturing technology to maintain the company's competitiveness, says Markku Varjoranta, marketing communications manager. But perhaps the biggest transformation in manufacturing methods and culture has occurred at Lokomo, also based in Tampere, which was founded in 1915. On a site which over the years has produced a huge range of mechanical equipment, production has been concentrated on Lokomo's crushers and manufacturing cells installed over the past decade. Overall, says Kauko Hinkkanen, workshop manager, manufacturing lead times have been reduced from six-12 months to just eight weeks. 'That's very important for us, because with so many variations and options, forecasting is very difficult,' says Pekka Pohjoismaki, area manager. As at Rammer, Lokomo machines the critical parts of its crushers itself, but has taken the unusual decision to retain its own foundry. Keeping Lokomo Steels, the biggest steel foundry in Scandinavia, is not just a question of ensuring access to large, high-quality castings. Since 1982, the foundry has built its future around 'vacuum steel' which has low levels of impurities. The extra-tough vacuum steel allows Lokomo to use lighter castings for its rock crushers, but also gives the foundry a strong position making castings for water-turbines, diving bells and other equipment where steel strength is crucial. 'Vacuum steel is the reason why we are still alive,' says Tapio Saari, Lokomo Steels project manager.

text:how text:much text:sugar text:doe text:cuba text:export text:and text:which text:countri text:import text:it
BFN [News conference by President Fidel Castro with participants in the 15th International Tourism Convention in Varadero on 20 May -- recorded] [Text] [Castro] [passage indistinct] What is better? To have them speak first? [Unidentified speaker] Commander, I suggest that you answer some of their questions. [Castro] This is like arriving to take a test without having studied the subject. [Unidentified speaker] Professors do not have to study the subject. [Castro] That is so for professors, but I have been a student all my life and have always felt like a student whenever I have been before an audience. [Unidentified speaker] Commander, I am from Argentina's Tele-C News... [Castro, interrupting] Yes, but the question from Argentina was left unfinished. [laughter] [Unidentified speaker] I am always on the way. Commander... [Castro, interrupting] Let me stand. I cannot see who is speaking. [applause] [Unidentified speaker] Commander, I wanted to ask for the [words indistinct] of Argentina: What role do you believe tourism plays for Cuba at this historic junction? [Castro] I believe that for everyone [words indistinct]. I hope it will play a special role and must say sincerely that we are prioritizing it while maintaining other sectors, despite everything bad and good tourism is said to bring. I say, as some say, because we do not know anything about it. We are now beginning to learn. In general, I must stress that I have seen good things. I do not know if tourism is categorized as very good, outstanding, good, regular, fair, or bad. I have yet to see the bad tourism category. Rather, I have seen tourists falling into the outstanding and good categories. Anything that helps the economy today is enormously important to Cuba. This is one of the most influential sectors. This sector has maintained a growth rate of a little over 30 percent annually. Our future success will depend heavily on our ability to work and, particularly, on our ability to attain your cooperation worldwide. I believe we have the potential. I believe we have great tourism potential and an educated people. We have a highly developed spirit of hospitality, as well as the will to do things right. However, I will answer your question specifically by saying that tourism occupies one of the topmost places at this historic junction in the country's life and finances. [Unidentified speaker] Thank you. [BBC correspondent Rose Hays, in English with passage-by-passage translation into Spanish] I have been at the Varadero convention for a week now. There have been many debates on tourism industry profits. It is said that right now it has probably reached a phase where tourism profits are surpassing sugar industry profits. It has been predicted that the tourism industry will surpass sugar as Cuba's main source of revenue. Do you agree? [Castro] Yes, at least that is our hope. We hope the tourism industry will overcome the sugar industry. I have been pondering this. The large-scale sugar industry and tourism seem to be two difficult things to reconcile. We have almost 11 million people and a little over 110,000 square kilometers of land. I believe we can do both things right. We have hundreds of kilometers of beach and thousands of kilometers of coast, some of it nestled between the sea and the mountains. In other words, we have great tourism potential. However, we still have great sugar potential. Other industries certainly tend to surpass the sugar industry in modern times. For example, Puerto Rico produced 1 million tons of sugar about 30 years ago yet does not produce enough sugar today to satisfy national demand. Many sugar fields were used to grow other crops, to meet urban growth demands, or to establish industrial parks. Above all, the sugar industry is very difficult and entails extremely hard work. The introduction of slavery in the Caribbean was followed by the development of the sugar industry in the tropical heat. It is such hard work that the native population was practically unable to do it. This is what gave rise to the macabre idea of enslaving Africans to make them work in the fields here, in the tropics, because they were better suited to that hard work in sugarcane, as well coffee, although coffee is not as hard. Sugarcane was the hardest crop because the harvesting and weeding had to be done by hand. However, the sugarcane harvest demands great effort even if you improve working and living conditions. Also, it has a cyclic nature. It does not guarantee year-long jobs for everyone. This results in a large emigration of the labor force from the sugar fields to other activities. Slavery was allegedly abolished at the turn of the century, yet tens of thousands of Caribbean people emigrated from Jamaica, Haiti, and other Caribbean islands following the great boom the sugar industry experienced after the U.S. intervention, when hundreds of millions of dollars -- which had a greater value then -- were invested to develop the sugar industry. A new form of slavery ensued because the Jamaicans and Haitians who came to Cuba to work in the sugarcane lived under similarly harsh conditions. It is very hard work. I have noticed that sugar production declines as tourism develops in the Caribbean islands. The work force transfers to tourism. There are islands of every size, from 400 square kilometers to 1,000 square kilometers and every other size in between. I have noticed the incompatibility of these industries. Boosting the tourism industry has resulted in a decline of the sugar industry in those countries. Cuba should be able to maintain a highly vital sugar industry through mechanization and chemical resources once we are again under normal conditions and given the available land area, population, machinery, herbicides, and automation processes at sugar mills. This is what we plan to do. However, there is a sugar mill nearby which is about empty of personnel. Almost every worker is here, in Varadero. Tourism work is not as hard and is more appealing than agriculture and sugarcane. Yet, I believe we have a large enough population to maintain both industries. However, tourism's potential, keeping in mind that we have thousands of kilometers of virgin beaches, is much higher than the sugar industry's potential. If we fully develop our tourism potential, undoubtedly, apart from other factors, the tourism industry will render much higher revenues to Cuba than the sugar industry, even if this incompatibility did not exist between both sectors. In addition, the tourism market is growing much more than the sugar market. I have yet to hear anyone say that sunshine makes you fat. [laughter] Unfortunately, people are going around saying that sugar is fattening and all those kinds of things, all those calumnies against sugar. [laughter] However, tourism is healthy and has great prestige. It seems that tourism is the faster growing industry in the world. I have heard many people say this. [Unidentified speaker] Once again, for Argentina: Regarding the U.S. blockade, is the Clinton administration as severe as previous administrations? [Castro] I would have to ask you to define severity. [Unidentified speaker] Argentina is well aware of the U.S. position, which is not fair to the Cuban people. This is why I ask the question. You raised this issue last year, when I had the opportunity to meet you and the Council of State. I would like to know your thoughts on this today. [Castro] I could say that Clinton maintains the same severity, because he maintains the blockade, the Torricelli Law, everything. However, he does so in a softer manner and with less threatening and less bellicose words. But the severity of U.S. policy toward Cuba has not changed. It remains the same. [Rene Capriles, correspondent for Brazil's ECO RIO magazine] Commander, I had the pleasure of hearing you at the Rio summit. Your address was the most applauded, even by President Bush, which was a surprise, as you might remember. You just came from a conference on island-states and biodiversity. Biodiversity plays an important role worldwide when it comes to genetic patents, on which Cuba has broad experience. What are Cuba's prospects in this regard, considering tourism, island-states, and the creation of the Caribbean common market in the future? [Castro] The analysis of environmental problems was good at the Barbados meeting. Both the environment and sustainable development were discussed. We noticed in Rio that island-states are highly anxious about this. I noticed that many countries are highly anxious about the prospects that global...[pauses] changes in weather patterns and the greenhouse effect. Changes in weather patterns mean more droughts, more intense hurricanes, and other climate phenomena which are generally disastrous for those small nations. While a hurricane in Florida damages a very small portion of the territory, a hurricane on St. Vincent or on any other small Caribbean island -- such as St. Lucia or Jamaica -- covers 100 percent of the island's territory and can destroy everything. The rest of the nation can help Florida repair the hurricane damage. Islands face territorial limitations and serious communication problems. A man from Santiago de Cuba was complaining because there are no direct flights between Mexico and Santiago de Cuba. Yet, there are no flights between many Carribean islands. There are no flight routes. Sea transportation is also very difficult. These countries experience diverse difficulties for their development. They are affected the most, environmentally speaking. Many of those islands, particularly those in the Pacific, would disappear if the water were to rise four meters. It would be a global disaster because it would affect every port's infrastructure. However, certain countries would disappear altogether. Certain countries, such as Bangladesh, with a population of over 100 million people, would disappear almost completely, despite being one of the most densely populated countries. Of course, this explains the high anxiety experienced by these states and why it was decided at the Rio summit to hold an international conference of small island-states. There was an increased awareness of the problem in Barbados, more of an awareness than in Rio. However, the Rio summit and the efforts of the nongovernmental organizations were extremely significant in creating an awareness of this problem. I dare affirm 90 percent of the governments of the world were not aware of ecological problems. This was the first time that dozens of heads of state had a chance to think about these problems and were compelled to think about them. The representatives of the most industrialized nations also had to speak and explain things in Rio. Consumerist societies are the main culprits of the destructive phenomena that has ravished the environment in past decades. They consume an overwhelming majority of energy and fossil fuel and have poisoned the rivers, lakes, and seas the most. They have poisoned the air, have created acid rain, and have increased carbon dioxide in the atmosphere. They are creating serious, real problems, including extremely serious problems with weather pattern changes. This awareness is somewhat late. Certain damages are already irreversible. The amounts of fluorocarbons released have damaged the ozone layer and will continue to do so for a long time. We must ask ourselves if there is still time to reverse this trend. However, since we cannot afford to be pessimistic, the least we can do is fight hard to increase awareness so that measures are adopted as soon as possible to solve these problems. You might remember from Rio that the U.S. Government objected and put up the most resistance to the accords. It was practically isolated. I must add that this is not the case with the current administration. This administration is more concerned with environmental issues. The U.S. vice president has a book out on the environment. I believe he is quite committed to environmental issues. The United States, the number one consumer of energy and natural resources, is called upon to play a very important role here. This is why any change in the U.S. Government's position must seen as positive. This had not taken place yet at the time of the Rio summit but was hinted at in the U.S. representative's address in Rio and noticed again during the Barbados conference. We must fight harder and harder and harder if we want to avoid the catastrophe of incalculable magnitude toward which we are heading right now. This is an issue that can be discussed at length. A great many variables enter into play because the development of various countries can differ so greatly. I pointed out in Barbados that Bangladesh's per capita income is $220, while Switzerland's is $34,000. [Words indistinct] 1 billion tons of carbon is consumed. How much more do the Chinese people need to attain a gross income 10 times higher? India has similar problems. These are very complex, acute problems. How will global resources be distributed? How will development be apportioned? Will we just decide to leave developing nations as they are while developed nations continue to develop? Mankind must exert great effort and revise certain theories. I hinted at this in my 15-minute address on the problems of inequitable worldwide development. What does the future hold for a society that can only survive by growing and can only grow by depleting the world's natural resources? That question has no answer. They are condemned to grow. This is why when one speaks of sustainable development, no one knows what one is talking about. We ought to speak of societies that can sustain themselves or that can survive as they are by recycling and reducing levels of carbon dioxide and other polluting gases and not by continuing to deplete natural resources. Neoliberalism is in vogue today. However, we are not talking politics here, nor do we want to discuss politics. Yet, it is in fashion. Neoliberalism is based on the concept of continuous growth to prevent a disaster. However, continuous growth will result in a bigger disaster. We must focus primarily on the growth of those countries further behind, the poorest nations. We must do a better job distributing the world's natural resources. We must distribute the world's wealth better and more equally. Otherwise, the problems will not be solved. Yet, we cannot discuss this further here nor turn this into a conference on extremely complex philosophical issues. We risk missing the mark regarding tourism. [Faustino Castilla, director of Spain's VIAJE Y TOURISMO magazine] How can capitalist and socialist views coexist in the tourism industry? Unfortunately, I remember what the Cuban tourism industry had to endure in the '50s. That was not like tourism today but was tourism, nevertheless. How can both doctrines coexist today? I would also like to present to you an example of Habanera, a typically Cuban-Spanish form of music that symbolizes Cuban-Spanish unity. [applause] [Castro] He asks: How can the two views coexist? That of tourism and what else? Within tourism? You refer to joint investments, right? Unfortunately, I do not have Karl Marx, Frederick Engels, or Vladimir Ilich Lenin by my side to help me answer your question. Yet, I believe, referring even to the founders of socialism, Lenin for example, at the time of the famous Bolshevik revolution, had even considered the idea of establishing capitalism under the control of the proletariat. Lenin's original idea was to establish socialism in that country, which was one of the most industrially backward, a country besieged and blockaded. Lenin finally came up with the idea of developing capitalism in Russia, not under the control of capitalists but under the control of workers. There were other ideas among the political leaders of that era: The impossibility of establishing socialism in only one country. This was discussed extensively. We must add that among the CPSU's founding concepts was the idea that the revolution was going to take place simultaneously in every industrialized nation. History has still not proven that that was wrong. Although, I will keep my opinion regarding what has happened in those countries, there is no doubt that building socialism in one single country, entirely surrounded by industrialized capitalist countries [words indistinct]. Their accomplishments were, in my opinion, truly extraordinary. They will be praised someday once this contemporary period is over. They conceived with a highly dialectic sense and flexibility how to build socialism. We have not relinquished the idea of building socialism. We have not relinquished our goals. We are simply adapting to our current reality and acknowledging that under such exceptional circumstances, following the collapse of the socialist bloc and the disappearance of the USSR, our goals cannot be the building of socialism but the defense of the fatherland, the revolution, and accomplishments of socialism. The development of any country requires capital, technology, and markets which we do not have at this time. These are far from ideal conditions. We are no longer dealing with building socialism in a single country but on a tiny island lost somewhere in the Caribbean, lost geographically but not politically. Tourism provided the first opportunity to create joint associations and to introduce foreign capital in Cuba. We need all three things -- capital, technology, and markets -- to develop tourism in Cuba. We did not hesitate on the need to promote its development. We have been talking about tourism, which is a very typical example. There are many other fields where the same is happening or could be happening, like the oil sector. We will never exploit the oil beneath the Varadero peninsula. We do not want to...[pauses] A well had already been drilled nearby, but we closed it. Estimates have been made on the amount of fuel underground, but Varadero's tourism development and oil extraction are incompatible. Developing Varadero's tourism will yield much more than the extraction of the oil underneath it. There are diverse positive indicators regarding the presence of oil. However, we need seismological research with advanced technology, well-drilling, and capital investment. We do not have the capital or the technology to exploit these resources. How could we do this if not by associating with foreign companies and capital? It would not be socialist but stupid to turn a blind eye to this reality. Nothing would be accomplished if we did that. We would be left stranded, would fail to fulfill the goal of defending the fatherland, the revolution, and the accomplishments of socialism. I have given two examples. As we set off down this path -- free of dogma, armed with flexibility, and keeping clearly in mind our goals and the means to attain them -- we have been making this overture, which continues to expand. I believe our goals and the means being used to attain them are perfectly in keeping with one another. The goals we are seeking are perfectly in keeping with the means we are using to achieve them. To tell the truth, it is very important that there be trust. We have taken great pains to ensure that we have created trust among those who invest in Cuba and are giving investors advantages they do not get in many other parts of the world so as to make investing here truly attractive. [Words indistinct] show that those first experiences were successful. We must calculate how much the capital yields in each European country. How much in Italy? How much in Switzerland? How much in France? How much must be paid in rent? How much does capital invested in Costa Brava, Spain, yield? How much in the Canary Islands? We must find ways to make capital yield more in Cuba than it does in Costa Brava, the Canary Islands, or any other country. All in all, it is a competition. I believe that we are in a position to compete and that Cuba has some advantages. As the managers of this hotel can attest, cooperation between the population and the investors is high because we have persuaded the population of the need to take these steps, these measures, and to make these investments. I want to stress to you that our people are socialist. Harbor no doubts: Our people cannot return to capitalism. However, they understand perfectly well all the measures we are taking in this sphere and that the associations with capitalist companies are in response to the reality of today's world. Thus, we have growing ties with multinationals. We do. This is a reality and a power in today's world. No one in today's world can do without multinationals, because their power continues to increase. They have more power, even more than governments. The power of governments is declining and that of multinationals increasing. We are surrounded by capitalists in this world. We are told in geography class that an island is a piece of land surrounded by water on all sides. If someone were to ask us at present to define socialism in Cuba, the answer would be: A noble, courageous, heroic effort surrounded by capitalism on all sides. [laughter] We cannot ignore capitalism any more than we can ignore the sea around us. Besides -- and this was pointed out by Marx -- capitalism has made significant contributions to mankind's economic development, such as technological and scientific contributions and a great development of the productive forces. We could add other things that were unknown at Marx's time: management capability, [words indistinct], use of computers in administration and management. We could add many other contributions capitalism has made to mankind. Also, it would be stupid of me not to make use of any useful experience capitalism can contribute. This is how we see what we are doing, without relinquishing our principles, goals, or ideals. I believe Cuba is not the only country doing this. The Chinese people are doing it and have been doing it much longer than we. The Vietnamese people are doing it and have had very significant successes. However, history will have the last word. New paths are always strewn with obstacles, problems, and difficulties. Our intelligence and wisdom should help us overcome all these difficulties. There are many other difficulties. There are difficulties that are not political, ideological, or philosophical in nature. Other difficulties could be of a moral nature. I was explaining to the comrades and have at times explained to the Cuban people that we cannot afford to be pure within a glass case. Purity is not as praiseworthy if one is alone, isolated, unpolluted, free of contact with any virus, germ, or bacteria. Virtue blooms in the struggle against vice. These methods or things we are introducing might bring with them certain vices, yet this can serve to develop our virtue. Many have questioned the influence tourism might have upon the minds of our people, upon their basic traits. These matters have come up. However, experience is teaching us that we can develop our country perfectly well. Cuba's ties, culture, and contact with the world are growing. We will be all the more pure if we are able to preserve our virtues amid the contamination certain things might bring with them. I believe we will do so in this effort we are making. It will be, above all, a test. I once used a metaphor but later had to recant because it was wrong. I said that virtue could not be preserved in a cloister, a convent. Several nuns immediately wrote me and told me the remark was unfair. I agreed with them and no longer speak of cloisters or convents. I speak of ivory towers. [laughter, applause] [Unidentified speaker] [Words indistinct] [Castro] From what magazine? [Unidentified speaker] (SUARA), a magazine with a circulation of over 300,000 and [words indistinct]. I will not ask any questions because my questions were answered by the minister. I asked if Cuba was ready to welcome tourists and so on. As you have said... [Castro, interrupting] What did he answer? Yes? [Unidentified speaker] Yes. [Castro] He lied to your readers. [laughter] Did he say we were ready or learning? [Unidentified speaker] No, no. This is my first trip to Cuba. I want to take this opportunity to do something very personal or my daughter will never forgive me: I must tell you that she admires you greatly. She is 15 years old, and we have explained to her that Cuba is the only socialist country left in the world. She asked me to tell you that she is at your service for whatever you might need and that you can always count on her help. [applause] She has written many letters to you that remain on her desk. I have explained to her that it is not easy to reach you. However, I will not leave Cuba without asking you to please sign this for her and to take our picture. Otherwise, she would never forgive me. I am sorry, but this is my only chance. I hope the others will forgive me. [applause] [Castro] I will take a chance and honor your request, although I can foresee about 350 more like them...[pause] Those noble feelings of solidarity encourage us along, in this struggle. Our struggle is not easy. Not everyone understands it. I have wanted to talk about it. The fact that there are so many good and noble people in the world fills us with energy and is an extraordinary boost to continuing to struggle, resist, and triumph. Thank you very much. [applause] [(Pablo Amalce), Spanish national radio editor and deputy director of VIAJEROS magazine's Cuba section] [Words indistinct] in the world, the matter of image as regards tourism. A country's image is vital. You know that it is oversimplified sometimes. There is also the pitfall of putting forth an image currently being used by several other countries, resulting in a failure to present the unique characteristics of a destination. What do you -- the president of the Republic of Cuba, a great communicator, and someone who knows how to rouse and motivate diverse audiences well -- think Cuba's tourism image ought to be? [Castro] I do not know what a communicator is. That is a technical term used nowadays regarding television, radio, and other such resources. I have always relied on the same thing: speaking very frankly and trying to explain things as I see them. If I do not understand something, I do not attempt to explain it. I have endured enough of that in school already. I had teachers who explained things in the books that they did not understand, could not understand either. First, we could say that Cuba presents the image of a beautiful country. It has the natural, physical conditions. Columbus first took notice of this. It is a proven fact that when he arrived in Cuba, he said it was the most beautiful land human eyes had ever seen. I do not know if Columbus ever said this to a woman, but it is a fact that he said it about Cuba. We have an image as a country of extreme natural beauty. However, its people are more important than the land. Cuba's image is that of an hospitable, warm, generous, fraternal nation. We want the image of a morally and physically healthy nation. We want the image of an organized country, the image of a country which protects the environment, the air, the water, with pure waters, pure air, a welcoming climate. Of course, we are a tropical country. Many visitors come from frigid places, particularly in winter. They come to escape the snow and cold weather or the like. We do not want to be seen as a country with gambling or drugs or prostitution. We have the image of a country with a high level of culture and capability [words indistinct] and pleasant the stay of our visitors. We want to educate the people on this profession of hospitality so that services can attain levels equal or superior to those found in any other country. We want a tourism of the people. Everyone wants the tourists to pay more money for greater luxury. Of course, we will have some services that will also serve those who can afford higher prices. However, we also want tourism to be a source of knowledge, contact, and brotherly ties among the peoples. We also want the world to see Cuba as an honest country, a moral country. This is highly cherished by us because we know that in the world such qualities are not abundant. Finally, I will borrow from the Bible and Adam and Eve, who are said to have been very happy in Eden: We want the world to see Cuba as a terrestrial paradise. [applause] [Ed Caprice, director of Berlin's Tropicana tourist company] Mr. President, it is not always easy for a small tour operator who is not under the German tourism conglomerates' control to bring tourism to Cuba. However, I do not want to dwell on the difficulties but on the happy moments. One such occasion took place recently, when a group of over 40 people came to Santiago de Cuba. All of their misgivings were cleared up by the time they returned to Berlin. Some of them asked before departing Berlin: Can we really travel to Cuba, given the current difficulties in supplying the population? However, they were all very happy and taken by the tropical beauty, the hospitality you mentioned, the revolutionary spirit of the Cuban people [words indistinct]. The oldest in the group -- an 84-year-old man -- said that the trip to Cuba was the happiest time in his entire life. Mr. President, I would like you to accept the catalog we have put together for Cuba with all our love. Thank you, very much. [applause] [Unidentified speaker] Commander Fidel, I have come from Bolivia with a friend who works in an enterprise. First, I want to express Bolivia's love and admiration for your efforts on the Cuban people's survival and freedom and for being an example of independence to all Latin American leaders. I do not want to leave Cuba without firmly shaking your hand as a symbol of the struggle against the economic blockade endured by Cuba and its people. [applause] [Emilio Galdez, sales director of Grupo Sol in Cuba] I do not have any questions because I already have my answers after living in Cuba for three and a half years; I received them on a daily basis from the honest efforts of the Cuban people and the efforts which I have witnessed at all levels day to day in the tourism sector, as well as in the society. I ask that you continue your struggle and your efforts, which in the last three and a half years have yielded results and successes. I ask that you continue to set the example which other countries were, perhaps, not virtuous enough to adopt. I refer to positive and negative things which have been attained in tourism. For example, in my country -- Spain -- we have had many successes, but we must lament not having been successful in other things and even failures. We have experienced a crisis from which we are now recovering. We will have to make investments to regain the levels of years ago. Keeping these things in mind, I ask of you to continue this path to attain what I believe everyone augurs for this beautiful country, which has all the right conditions to fulfill its goals. My cooperation with Cuba does not end, but my stay does in two months. I must follow orders. My boss has asked me, and I agree. I must return to Majorca. However, during my stay in Cuba I have had the great luck of working with and making friends not easily found in other countries, wholehearted friends, true friends to the end. I have had the luck of meeting my wife and having a daughter -- Daria Lucia -- in this beautiful country. She is 44 days old today. Therefore, my wish is that very soon and before she can talk, but when she can understand me I will be able to tell her that Cuba has overcome the very difficult special period because it truly deserves it. Finally, it is also my wish -- I have asked many friends at work to help me with this -- to take a photo of you with me and my wife and daughter. Dear friends, I ask you to continue working together and more united and strong each day for the good and future of tourism in Cuba! Viva Cuba! Viva Fidel! Viva the Revolution! [applause, pause] [Castro] I have been told that you have made a great effort and that it is time to conclude this meeting. I believe you have other things scheduled, including a closing ceremony. Is that right? When? At nine? I imagine you have to go to your rooms and do things. I believe I have tired you enough. It has been a great pleasure to come to this meeting. We have heard very friendly words and intelligent and interesting questions. We have also experienced moving moments, such as the case of the comrade who spoke just now and introduced his wife and daughter. We have seen a great example of the ties and relations that can be established among the peoples through tourism. He asked us to continue along this path. I can affirm that we will and that we will never betray the trust of those who believed in us. [applause] Our word and commitments are sacred. In no [words indistinct] of law, or any canon by Osmany, because we have the canon of honor, seriousness, the given word which will always prevail. We follow principles of honesty and good faith. We follow principles of optimism, and that will always prevail. We only began a short while back and can already see certain results. I believe we can speak of a future, given the efforts we are conducting. You cannot imagine with what difficulties we began to build those renowned causeways. This has helped us gain access to marvelous beaches, as marvelous as this Varadero beach, in other places around Cuba. We will continue working in this manner, with efforts and sacrifice. We cannot nor do we deny that we are working under hard and difficult conditions. This is why words such as the ones we have heard today are so encouraging; the words of the lady who spoke about her daughter and the faith and trust she has in Cuba; the words, the words by the Bolivian gentleman; those by the German gentleman. I mentioned this because he relayed a message from an 84-year-old man who said his stay had been the happiest days of his life; 84 is a considerable age. Those of us who are a little younger felt it. [laughter] An 84-year-old man has experienced practically the entire century. He lived through World Wars I and II and has experienced calamities of every kind, hard and good moments in his life. The fact that he felt the happiest here is encouraging and honors us. I will try to maintain that tradition and set this example for as long as I can. I am sorry not everyone is here, but this hall can only accommodate so many. As you can see, we have a brand new minister. [applause] Perhaps I am getting ahead of myself and prompted your generous applause. He has yet to earn that applause. What I should have said is that we have a brand new ministry. We must find out if we have a brilliant minister. [applause] This has to be seen. However, we have the greatest hope that he will prove so. [applause] In any case, another will have to if he does not prove so. [laughter] What is clear is that we need a good ministry and an even better minister. He has many ideas and initiatives that have been warmly welcomed and endorsed. I hope that this will help accelerate the development of tourism in Cuba, which will continue to have the support of our people, government, and everyone. I want to add: Our people did not understand tourism at first. It was necessary to conduct an educational campaign so that our people, who had been brought up in the strictest ivory tower puritanism, would understand the need for tourism, its portended dangers, what tourism would represent, etc. I assure you that that struggle is being amply won and that the people's enthusiasm and happiness is immediately recognized anywhere in Cuba today where a new tourist project is announced. We have had to do difficult things to reconcile certain issues. The people had a hard time understanding the dollar decriminalization issue, which is why we have had to explain every step. We normally explain things to the people. We do not want things to appear by decree but by persuading the population. We had to explain our own difficulties, the excess of currency we have and which any tourist or tour operator understands readily, the approximate value of a peso, a dollar, a pound. This required taking measures to correct the national financial imbalance. However, these measures were not taken by decree or accord of the Council of Ministers but were discussed at the National Assembly of the People's Government. They were discussed at every workplace with millions of workers. A consensus was reached before measures were taken. We sometimes have difficult tasks. You see this everywhere. However, I believe the essential key is to persuade the people and to attain a consensus among the population for every step taken. This is how our population came to understand the need for tourism and understands it more and more each day. They understood the need for the highly touted decriminalization of dollars and all that. Our people were brought up in deeply rooted egalitarism, and anytime anything gave the appearance of privilege it upset them. For example, if someone has a wealthy relative abroad who sends things the others did not have, that is still a certain privilege. Our population had a very deep sense of equality. We have explained to them that this is necessary, that it helps the national economy, that it helps those who do not have wealthy relatives abroad and that somehow what is received makes its way back to them. That is the argument we used to persuade our people. I am happy to see how they have come to understand and to support tourism. I must also add that I am pleased, very pleased to have had the opportunity to meet outstanding people such as you. Thank you, very much. [applause]

text:what text:is text:known text:about text:drug text:traffick text:in text:the spanOr([spanNear([text:golden, text:triangl], 0, true), text:golden triangl]) text:the text:area text:where text:burma text:thailand text:and text:lao text:meet
Language: Lao Article Type:CSO [Unattributed report: "The Four Countries Making Up the Golden Triangle Sign Drug Suppression Memorandum"] [Text] According to a report from the UN office for drug control in Laos, on 26 October at the UN headquarters in New York the United Nations, in order to control international drugs, met with the LPDR, the PRC, Myanmar [Burma] and Thailand to sign a memorandum to tighten up cooperation in suppressing drugs in the Golden Triangle. Mr Alounkeo Sittikoun, the LPDR representative, together with the representatives of the PRC, Myanmar [Burma], the Kingdom of Thailand and the director of the UN project to control international drugs met to sign this memorandum. The goal was to increase cooperation in controlling the drugs in this area of these countries and to assure the continuation of high-level consultations between these four governments and the United Nations in order to control international drugs with respect to the production of illegal drugs in this area, trafficking and violations. The memorandum also stated that the area of the Golden Triangle in Southeast Asia was an area of extensive drug production. For this reason the four countries, Laos, China, Myanmar and Thailand, reached an agreement with the UN office for the control of international drugs to increase cooperation in correcting the problem of widespread drug production, trafficking and use. The UN office for drug control is to provide technical assistance and funds to the governments of these four countries.

text:what text:is text:the text:statu text:of text:the text:three text:gorg text:project
Language: Chinese Article Type:BFN ["Newsletter" by XINHUA reporters Zou Aiguo (6760 1947 0948) and Tang Weibin (0781 5898 1755): "The Great Undertaking of the Three Gorges Project Will Shine a Thousand Years To Come -- A Report on Premier Li Peng's Inspection of the Three Gorges Project"] [Text] Yichang, 23 Dec (XINHUA) -- Standing on the central axis line at the future worksite of the Great Three Gorges Dam with a pair of binoculars, Premier Li Peng commanded a full view of the water near him and a mountain in the distance. The Tanzi Mountain is on the left bank and the Baiyanjian Mountain is on the right bank; a bustling worksite and the rushing Changjiang are also in view. On 20 December 1993, accompanied by Chen Jinhua, minister of the State Planning Commission; Guo Shuyan and Li Boning, deputy directors of the State Council Three Gorges Project Construction Committee; and Jia Zhijie, governor of Hubei, Premier Li Peng arrived in Sandouping to inspect the preparatory work for the Three Gorges Project. Sandouping, 40 kilometers away from Hubei Province's Yichang City, is the dam site for the Changjiang Three Gorges Key Water Control Project, a project that has attracted worldwide attention. The Three Gorges Project officially entered the preparatory stage on 26 July this year. The earth-and-stone work on the building of the cofferdam, the first stage of the project, began on 24 October on the right side of the river bed. The roaring sound of the motor shook and awoke the sleepy valley. Ascending the platform of the Zhongbaodao cofferdam, Li Peng gazed in the distance. Great changes have taken place here during the past year. Zhongbaodao was quiet when Li Peng inspected the Three Gorges on 25 November 1992. But now the first stage earth- and-stone-work of the cofferdam task has begun. The experimental section of the 750-meter cofferdam, which was completed at the end of June, has stood the test of the peak of the flood season. Standing in front of the "Map of the Changjiang Three Gorges Key Water Control Project," General Manager Lu Youmei and Deputy General Manager He Gong of the China Changjiang Three Gorges Project Development Corporation briefed Li Peng and others on preparations for the project, pointing out that the major objectives of this year's preparatory work have been basically realized following five months' efforts. Li Peng said: "The project's preparatory work involves a heavy workload. We must do a good job. As we are building here the most modern and first-rate project in the world, we must set first-rate engineering standards." A white central axis line was painted on the center of the platform of the cofferdam. Li Peng looked at the Baiyanjian Mountain in the right bank with his binoculars. He asked: "What is the height of this mountain peak?" Wei Yanzheng, deputy director of the State Council's General Office for the Three Gorges Project, replied: "240 meters above sea level." Li Peng continued: "After completion of the Three Gorges Project, the distance between that mountain peak and the 185-meter dam will only be 50-60 meters. You should build a forest park there to preserve the beautiful scenery and excellent ecological system in the dam zone. Turning around, Li Peng looked at the Tanzi Mountain in the distance on the left side of the bank and asked: "What about this peak?" "It is also about 200 meters above sea level," came the reply. Li Peng walked up to the north side of the cofferdam's platform amid the din of the machine. Some 30 dump trucks were seen travelling back and forth to dump the full load of sand and stone into the river. Li Peng turned to Qiao Shengxiang, chief of the Gezhou Dam Engineering Bureau, who is responsible for building the cofferdam, and said: "Cofferdam building has a direct bearing on the formal beginning of the Three Gorges Project. You bear a great responsibility." Li Peng turned again to Lu Youmei: "The building of the Three Gorges Project must be mechanized. First-rate builders must be mobilized for this project." Seeing Li Peng walking toward them on the cofferdam's platform, workers there greeted the arrival of the premier with warm applause, and Li Peng waved at them. Li Peng spoke to Chen Jinhua, Guo Shuyan, Jia Zhijie, Lu Youmei, and other comrades while walking on the platform: "We should introduce a competitive mechanism into the Three Gorges Project and adopt a bidding system so as to attract the most outstanding construction teams to the Three Gorges Project. Competition raises efficiency. A competitive mentality is needed in our effort to build a socialist market economy." Li Peng showed concern for the Three Gorges Project, for the preparation of the project, and for millions of settlers. Prior to inspecting the project's preparatory site, he made a special trip to visit the people who were resettled at the Zhujiawan resettlement zone located at the lower reaches of the dam site. The Three Gorges Project, being an extra-large and key water-control project, is confronted with a tough task of resettling the people. Premier Li Peng has repeatedly emphasized: "The success or failure of the Three Gorges Project depends on resettling the people." Following many years of experiments, the dam zone has gained many useful experiences in the work of resettling the people. The masses generally welcome the experiment, since then have experienced marked economic, social, and environmental benefits in various resettlement sites. Walking on a gravel road, Li Peng headed toward a temporary resettlement area. Yichang County Head Chen Hua pointed at a residential building in the distance which is undergoing construction and told the premier: "That building is for the settlers. It can accommodate 162 settlers. A total of 92 people from 26 households will move into their new houses before the Spring Festival. With much interest, Li Peng inquired into the details of the new houses for settlers. In a makeshift house, Li Peng was found sitting together and chatting with the family of settler Zhou Bin. Li Peng asked: "How many rooms did you have in your former house?" "Two," came the reply. "What is the size of the new house?" "160 square meters." Li Peng smilingly said: "It is bigger than your former house." Zhou Bin said: "That is because of the meticulous arrangements made by the party and government." Li Peng asked Zhou Bin again: "What was your original occupation? "I was a carpenter." "What have you done after moving?" "After moving here, I was recruited into the village's construction team." Li Peng said: "Carpenters play a big role in house building; they make windows and furniture." Zhou Bin spoke with pride: "I make those things." Li Peng spoke in a tone of praise: "As you have skills, you will surely lead a comfortable life!" At this, Zhou Bin smiled. Li Peng looked inside and outside the house of Zhou Bin. He said: "Your housing condition is much better than that of the house I was provided in Tangshan when I took part in post-quake relief work. I stayed in Tangshan for over three months. After bidding farewell to the Zhous, Li Peng visited another makeshift house. Viewing the surroundings, Li Peng asked Yang Guanghua, master of the household, about the number of family members and the size of the house. The old man told him that he had 12 members in his family and that they lived in three big rooms. Li Peng said: "You surely have a big family with four generations living under one roof. Your housing condition will improve after moving into a new house." During their chat, a woman holding a little girl walked into the house. The little girl said: "How are you, uncle?" Li Peng asked "What is your name?" "I am Yang Qin." The innocent look of the little girl made all at the scene laugh. Li Peng moved around the neighborhood at the temporary settlement site. At one time, he was seen talking with the people, and at another, he was seen discussing the resettlement plan with provincial, city, and county level cadres. He said: "The Three Gorges Project will benefit future generations. A great number of settlers have made great sacrifices for the construction of the project. As the resettlement work affects many people, we must stick to the development-type resettlement policy and properly resettle them." Li Peng spoke to comrades who are involved in the resettlement work: "Resettlement work requires comprehensive planning and must proceed in strict compliance with the "Changjiang Three Gorges Construction Project's Resettlement Regulations" promulgated by the State Council. It is necessary to determine short-term as well as long-term priorities in the resettlement work according to the progress of the project and to expedite the resettlement work on the premise of fund availability. The current priority should be given to resettling people who live near the proposed dam site." "I greatly appreciate the slogan, `Serve the Great Three Gorges and Build a New Yinchang' advanced by Yichang City." Li Peng added: "The building of the Gezhou Dam has invigorated Yichang. The Three Gorges Project will paint an even more beautiful picture for Yichang's development prospects. Comrades in Yichang should foster the thinking of serving the Three Gorges Project and make positive contributions to the project." When leaving Zhujiawan, Li Peng waved and bid goodbye to the people there. He wished them all a happy Spring Festival and hoped that they would enjoy their new houses. Following the inspection of the Three Gorges Dam Zone, Premier Li Peng rushed to Yichang City by transiting through the Sandouping building site again. The roar of the drilling machines and the sound of the motor vehicles, like part of a majestic symphony, reverberated along the great rushing river.

text:find text:wai text:of text:measur text:creativ
Why is it that Leonardo da Vinci could paint the Mona Lisa, while another person is barely able to draw a stick figure? What enabled Emily Dickinson, in only four years, to write nearly 1,800 poems, some of the most lyrical in the English language, while many people can barely piece together an office memo? And how is it that Albert Einstein could revolutionize the world of physics, when most people don't even know how their car radios work? For centuries, philosophers and teachers have speculated on why some human beings are extraordinarily creative and others have merely mortal abilities. The ancient Greeks thought it was the result of divine inspiration -- a gift from the gods. Some modern thinkers have theorized that it is just a lucky combination of genes, a happy but largely accidental coincidence of events. Others have equated creativity with the ability and tenacity to solve problems -- a skill, they insist, that can be learned by almost anyone, or even by a computer. Dissatisfied with these pet theories and intrigued by the seemingly endless stream of contradictory observations, a small but determined number of researchers have renewed the study of creativity -- a subject that until recently had fallen into disfavor among serious scientists. Some of the findings confirm earlier suspicions about the curious natures of creative individuals, but others are forcing scientists and educators to rethink what creativity is and how it is manifested. Creative people may have certain inherited talents or biologically controlled predilections -- a painter, for example, might have peculiar sensitivity to light; a musician, an unusual awareness of sound; a dancer, a certain physical size or muscle mass. Yet, scientists are finding that creativity goes beyond biology. One of the most surprising and important findings has been that, as people become more creative, they also become more consumed by their work. And their devotion seems to be at least as important to their success as innate talents. Many creative people, scientists now realize, also live with a certain degree of mental illness. In fact, one of the fundamental attributes of creative people may be the ability to make productive use of mental states, such as depression and mania, that tend to cripple others. Although still in its infancy, the study of creativity could have profound implications for modern society. If creativity can be understood -- better yet, if it can be cultivated and taught -- then mankind will surely be better equipped to do any of a number of things: beautify cities, cure diseases, improve the economy. While it may be some time before science can offer a reliable blueprint of how to teach creativity in the classroom or to encourage it in the workplace, enough information about creativity has been uncovered to begin to fill in important blanks in science's picture of the mind. It was World War II that provoked the first round of serious research on creativity. Some of the first research was financed by the War Department. The military wanted new technology and more creative leaders. Over the next 20 years, scientists devised dozens of tests to measure creativity. But most were little more than word games and visual puzzles -- interesting, but probably capable of measuring only the most trivial aspects of the creative process. By the mid-1970s, most respectable scientists had all but abandoned studies of creativity. It was the 1960s' preoccupation with pseudo-creativity and free life styles that was partly responsible for giving the whole subject of creativity a "bad name," said Frank Barron, a retired professor of psychology at UC Santa Cruz and a leading expert on creativity. About the same time, social scientists became preoccupied with seeking more respect from the rest of the scientific and medical community. They concentrated on observable, quantifiable behavior and tried to distance themselves from subjects as intangible as creativity. What scientists did discover during these early years, however, were some puzzling inconsistencies in creativity research. While some creative people were clearly geniuses, others did not appear to be especially gifted. While some were unusually confident, others were remarkably insecure. Still others appeared to fluctuate, in a cycle of despair and optimism, self-doubt and self-assurance. There remained some universal traits that creative individuals seem to share: insatiable curiosity, openness to new experiences, willingness to take risks, a tendency to think in images. There was also what one researcher described as "the uncontrollable urge of almost every creative person" to go beyond established limits, to break rules. Although athletes are not usually thought of as "creative," Dick Fosbury was someone who seemed to meet all the criteria. In the late 1950s and early 1960s, he was just a lanky, awkward Oregon boy who wouldn't do the high jump like everyone else. Fosbury insisted on going over the bar backwards and headfirst. But the "Fosbury flop" not only won him an Olympic gold medal, it also inspired athletes that followed to break records experts said could not be touched. But fame and glory do not seem to drive most creative people, researchers found. It is the intrinsic rewards of the work -- the fascination of mixing paint or combining sounds or manipulating numbers. And the willingness to take risks. Dennis Farber, a New York artist, recently described his work this way: "You put yourself in a situation where you don't know what's going to happen. If you really say what you think, you risk being ostracized; you may make a fool of yourself. But if you don't say what you think, you'll let yourself down. And that's worse. . . . It's that risk that is so compelling. It's like rock climbing, if you don't think something terrible could happen, it's not much fun." Although his ability to paint may in part be "biological," Farber said, it is also a matter of hard work. "The idea of inspiration is a romantic one that has done artists as much harm as good," Farber said. "Sometimes people ask me where I get my ideas. It's simple. The ideas come from working, from getting up everyday and going to work." As Sir Isaac Newton so disarmingly put it when asked how he was able discover the law of universal gravitation: "By thinking on it continuously." Why are some people so driven? That question intrigued Mihaly Csikszentmihalyi, a Hungarian-born professor of psychology at the University of Chicago. Csikszentmihalyi wondered how creative people behaved when they were alone. He also wanted to know what they thought about when they were in the throes of creation. Were they happy, sad, worried, relaxed? Csikszentmihalyi had an idea. He would ask research subjects to carry beepers, which could be activated randomly throughout the day. Subjects would stop and jot down what they were doing right then, and how they felt about it. The data would be fed into a computer and analyzed. Csikszentmihalyi's idea not only worked in the 1970s, when he began to use it, the method caught on with other researchers. In a decade, thousands of subjects -- artists, composers, dancers, chess players, mountain climbers, basketball players, ordinary people -- had given researchers detailed snapshots of their activities and moods. The University of Chicago researcher documented what philosophers had long suspected -- that creative people simply do not always do things the way other people do -- nor do they think about what they are doing in the same way. People performing at their peak seem to enter another world, Csikszentmihalyi explained recently. "Time is distorted, a sense of happiness and well-being overcomes them." They have entered, what he calls, a state of "flow," "when things seem to go just right, when you feel alive and fully attentive to what you are doing." Athletes talk about entering of "the zone" -- when a basketball player makes one shot after another from seemingly impossible angles or distances. Batters will see a baseball gliding toward them, looking as big as a beach ball. They know they cannot miss, and they don't. Creative people such as professional athletes or gifted musicians are not the only ones to experience this state. But what makes them different is that they get these highs from their work, and with inordinate frequency. What about the people who have the potential to be creative, but are not? Csikszentmihalyi wanted to know more about them, too. This time, he chose as his subjects high school students who were highly gifted in mathematics. "All these students were equally talented, but, in the opinion of their teachers, half of them no longer showed any real interest in mathematics. We wanted to know why. Why should one group virtually abandon the subject while another group would take advanced courses, compete in tournaments, be involved in math clubs?" Csikszentmihalyi asked. "When you look at all the data and analyze it, in the end what you find is that the committed students like spending time alone, they like solitude and in their solitude they find the time to pursue . . . their passions," Csikszentmihalyi said. In contrast, he said, "most people cannot put up with solitude for very long. After a few minutes and certainly after a few hours, they start to feel a kind of psychic entropy. They are unable to coordinate their thoughts and feelings and actions in orderly ways. . . . To keep from feeling unhappy or bored, they pick up a telephone or turn on the television." Charles L. Fefferman, a professor at Princeton University who is considered one of the great mathematicians of this century, described some years ago how he spent his days after he had won a prestigious fellowship that freed him from his ordinary teaching duties. Every morning, he went to his office -- in his home. There, making himself comfortable in a wingback chair, he worked quietly by himself the entire day. During those hours he did not talk. He did not turn on a computer. He did not even pick up a pencil or piece of paper. He simply sat -- and thought. Eight, 10 hours a day doing nothing but thinking. Such solitude would drive most people crazy. What drives a chosen few to go off by themselves and concentrate, to tolerate solitude and even flourish in it? "We're only beginning to have some of those answers but clearly it has something to do with their homes and their families," said Csikszentmihalyi, who is now writing a book on the subject. "If the family environment is supportive but expecting children to do well and to work hard, that clearly helps. . . . If there is too much turmoil or if the families are too complacent, that will clearly affect the ability to focus and concentrate." What some researchers suspect -- and hope -- is that exposure to productive solitude will make talented young people crave more. Just like addicts who want drugs or athletes who seek runners' highs, truly creative people, those who are both talented and productive, have had an extraordinary experience, one they very much want to repeat -- again and again. "I think," Csikszentmihalyi said, "the desire to capture this euphoria is the root of all artistic pursuits." Whatever else can be said about creativity, one thing is now clear: It takes more than raw talent or devotion to an idea to be genuinely creative, Csikszentmihalyi said. "To have creativity requires a society that cultivates creativity and promotes creativity," Csikszentmihalyi said in a recent telephone interview. "I studied the subject for over 24 years and only recently did I realize what creativity really is: It is the interaction between societal needs and individual talents." Schools have begun to realize this and are encouraging students to participate in creativity contests -- the most notable of which is "Odyssey of the Mind," started by a New Jersey couple 10 years ago and now financed partly by IBM. The program, which includes classroom materials and extracurricular art and science projects, encourages youngsters to have unpredictable ideas; to ask questions, rather than simply look for answers; to understand that there is nothing whatsoever wrong with failure, that it is a natural and necessary part of discovery. The idea is to make children realize that they are different and to understand that being different is good. And, fearing that Americans were not as creative as their counterparts in Japan, companies over the last 20 years have turned to "creative consultants." In fact, an entire industry of these experts has flourished in the United States. Dr. Edward deBono, a British professor of medicine, has toured the country, explaining the concept of brainstorming. William J. J. Gordon and George M. Prince, co-founder of Synectics Inc., has started a think tank in Boston to promote creativity in corporations. And James Adams, a Stanford University business professor, has explained the concepts of creative thinking to hundreds of thousands of people in a book titled "Conceptual Blockbusting." The only problem with efforts to cultivate creativity is that there is no "proof" that they do what they claim, said Robert W. Weinberg in a 1986 book "Creativity: Genius and Other Myths." For every study that said a certain approach worked, there was another study saying that it did not. Some studies, for example, have shown that brainstorming generates more ideas, but other studies say it does not always produce better ones. Although there may be no scientific formula for how to do it, one thing is clear about creativity, Csikszentmihalyi concluded: When cultures value it, creativity flourishes. When they ignore it or are afraid of it, creativity declines. Renaissance Italy was one culture that revered creativity, Csikszentmihalyi said. "Some of the greatest art the world has ever seen was produced in Florence in the 15th Century, not just because there happened to be some talented people living there at the time, but because the bankers and powers of the city wanted it. They wanted to create a community so impressive that it would be known as the second Athens. And so they did; they saw to it that it happened." In contrast, creativity was reviled in ancient Egypt. "For nearly 3,000 years, works of art made in Egypt looked the same . . . because what society valued then was order and consistency." In the modern world, particularly in the United States, there now exists an odd combination of reverence and indifference toward creativity. "Americans are people who strongly believe in the idea of creativity," Csikszentmihalyi said. "We admire it. We are proud of it. . . . But we do very little to encourage it. "Partly it is because we aren't sure how. . . . Perhaps we are a little afraid of it."

text:in text:what text:wai text:have text:quilt text:been text:us text:to text:gener text:incom
What the heck is folk art anyway, and why do we keep aggravating ourselves with the question? We don't go around wringing our hands and moaning, "What is folk music?" It's that stuff with the fiddles and banjos. Whatever folk art is, there is a wunnerful new exhibition of it that just opened at the County Museum of Art. Titled "An American Sampler," it lays out 120 signs, decoys, carousal critters and cigar-store Indians without surgeon-general warnings. Then there are quilts and scrimshaw. In case you've been napping in a hatbox on the top shelf in the closet, scrimshaw is carvings that look like ivory, but they aren't. Not usually. They are made out of whale bones and whale teeth -- you might say whale tusks. Still, they look a lot like ivory. One of these depicts a lady who is as naked as a baby bird. She looks a lot like one of those ancient Oriental ivories known as "doctors ladies." They say that in the old days, sick Oriental females used them to point out to the doctor where they hurt because they were so modest the doctor was not allowed to touch them or look at them in the buff. Anyway, nobody says that exquisite Oriental ivory carvings are folk art, so why do we say these scrimshaw are folk art? As a matter of fact, the handsome carrousel animals -- the padding tiger and the vain giraffe -- bear suspicious resemblance to courtly ceramic animals in the Chinese gallery next door. So why is one grand art and the other folk art? Maybe because the carrousel animals have saddles for the kids to sit in. Since nobody ever saw a saddle on a tiger or a giraffe, these have an air of fable about them. Maybe that quality of magic brought to ordinary things is what makes folk art. Maybe it's a quality of domesticated mythology. This show makes us sigh for an America that may never have existed except in myth. What the ding-dang heck is folk art anyway? This exhibition makes it clear that whatever it is, it is more than one thing. Out here in California we tend to think of folk art as being made by loners, eccentric outsiders with no art training, such as Simon Rodia or Grandma Prisbrey, who just up and make private worlds for themselves. We think of them as neighborhood oddballs and hermits or social outcasts like the black folk artists in a memorable exhibition seen at the Craft and Folk Museum or in "Cat and a Ball on a Waterfall" at the Oakland Museum. That's the kind of folk art we tend to have here in the far-out West. But "An American Sampler" -- on view through April 30 -- insists there is more than one kind of American folk art. It comes from the Shelburne Museum, which is situated on the shore of Lake Champlain in southern Vermont. Considered the leading repository of the genre, it was founded in 1947 by Electra Havemeyer Webb, youngest daughter of the Henry O. Havemeyers, the great collectors who bequeathed a famous gift of Impressionist and Old Master paintings to Manhattan's Metropolitan Museum. Given that provenance, it is not surprising that Mrs. Webb's exasperated mother once asked, "How can you, Electra, you who have been brought up with Rembrandts and Manets, live with such American trash?" It is also not surprising that the East Coast Shelburne collection presents us a more civilized version of folk art. Where the California version tends to emphasize the idiosyncratic, the Eastern version plays to something almost classical. A Brunnhilde figurehead, circa 1850, was clearly made by an artist who knew about Baroque sculpture. It would not look out of place in a mainstream gallery. On the other hand, a stark little carving of a revolutionary soldier looks real direct and frank, like one of those African tribal sculpture. Maybe folk art is everything in between academic art and primitive art that doesn't quite fit either category. What the willy-dad-blasted heck is folk art anyway? One thing is sure, it isn't a handle that was invented by anybody that makes the stuff. Nobody says, "Here in our little town we play folk music and make folk carvings." If they do, you smell a rat, since folk art's charm is supposed to include unself-consciousness. The category certainly came into being as part of the avant-garde modernist movement that was so generous about recognizing non-academic art and so enthusiastic about copying its virtues. A sculptor such as Elie Nadelman based his whole oeuvre on folk figures. To this day,many a modern artist shares qualities often ascribed to folk artists. Warhol was a naif, O'Keeffe a no-bull earth mother and the whole lot stood outside the social mainstream doing it their way until they became the mainstream. Here folk art comes across as a popular art ancestor of Pop art. The show is punctuated with oversize common objects, such as a huge rocking chair that makes us feel 3 years old again. There are trade signs like a huge tooth, giant rifle and oversize spectacles that have the same hyperbolic Yankee humor that turns ironical and multilayered in Claes Oldenburg. Big rock candy mountain. It's very patriotic stuff full of bald eagles and George Washingtons that set you thinking about the deadpan flags of Jasper Johns and the inability of sophisticated city people to honestly express a corny emotion. A breath of fresh air blows through the mind when you look at quilts made with more concern for love than for time, quilts dedicated to friendship proved through endless hours of affectionate labor. The downside of folk art is that it remains imprisoned in convention like some decent modest soul who always sticks to the neighborhood rules. Its concern with good behavior rarely allows any emotional outburst, but here there is a quilt that defies the rules, looking like a haunted Rorschach blot. The upside of folk art is an innocent approach to the business of making art that lends it an authentic aura of wonder and surprise. Look at that wooden Indian weather vane. It is conceived like a flat, drawn profile silhouette, but it has real thickness that gives it a funny frontal view where the gesturing arm seems to come out of the middle of the chest. Alberto Giacometti would have loved it. He would have loved the cigar-store Indian on the wheeled wagon. All art is, in fact, concerned with verisimilitude, getting it to look like the thing depicted. What every artist learns is that you can't do that because sheet tin has no third dimension and wood is not flesh. You have to settle for some aspect of reality and that way you wind up exaggerating part of it. Great folk art uses guess work and respect for the material to come to the same decisions as great art in general. When it doesn't, it remains a craft object. A life-size Captain Jinks of the Horse Marines captures the same drama of solid volumes as an Egyptian old kingdom figure. Our jaunty soldier takes on a wry sense of self-importance. An adamantly accurate weather vane depicting a horse-drawn fire engine retains life-size detail at about one-tenth scale. It has a vivid hallucinatory presence of surreality like a Rene Magritte. So folk art is just art made by folks who get the better of themselves. At best, it has all the clout of mainstream art with the added endearments of modesty, independence and willingness to face the unknown. Just doing the best with what it's got, it sometimes creates aesthetic effects accidentally. The French call it bricolage.

text:what text:new text:us text:have text:been text:develop text:for text:old text:automobil text:tire text:as text:a text:mean text:of text:tire text:recycl
In his relentless celebration of American folkways, Norman Rockwell transformed derelict automobile tires into little petunia beds and children's swings -- testament to Yankee thrift and the creativity of ordinary folks who extracted their last nickel's worth. Sadly, nobody else has so deftly dispatched worn-out tires into a useful hereafter. Long a national nuisance, they are piling up across the country faster than ever. From coast to coast, they are being shredded, chopped, ground, burned, buried, dumped in the ocean and exported to the Third World. They are turned into jogging tracks, crash barriers, jungle gyms, mud flaps, sandals, doormats and hockey pucks. But, despite all of this and a flurry of regulations from aroused statehouses, less than 4% are recycled. The rest are still accumulating in vermin- and mosquito-infested heaps, embarrassing environmental-protection authorities and inviting arsonists. They are banned from half of the country's landfills and being shut out of more every week because of their shape. They take up too much valuable space and trap air, causing them to resurface, as sullen and indestructible as ever. With the Environmental Protection Agency projecting a 50% reduction in landfill space by the turn of the century and 80% by the year 2010, tires appear headed for universal banishment from the family of ordinary garbage. "The environmental movement doesn't want you to put them in the ground, they don't want you to burn them, they don't want you to put them in the sea and, presumably, they don't want you to send them into space," lamented Don Wilson, the principal lobbyist for the National Tire Dealers and Retreaders Assn. "But they have to go somewhere." Arriving home in Buffalo, N. Y., one day recently, John Spagnoli, a regional director of the New York State Department of Environmental Quality, looked out an airplane window and saw a huge truckload being dumped off the end of the runway. In the hierarchy of waste hazards, tires trail far behind nuclear and toxic wastes that pose direct hazards to land, air and water, but they are politically and physically incendiary. "Tires in themselves are not something that I am terribly concerned about," Spagnoli said, "but I've got tire piles all over the place, one with six or eight million tires, and within the next year or two or three, I'm going to have a fire, and the whole thing is going to come to a head." It is not an idle concern. New York had a major tire fire just last year near Albany. In February, environmental catastrophe was averted in Canada when firefighters extinguished a blaze that had burned for 17 days in an illegal 14-million-tire dump near Toronto. The most disastrous tire fire in history burned itself out at Winchester, Va., in July, 1984, but the mess it made remains. In nine months, the blaze consumed 5 million to 7 million tires, polluted the air in four states and contaminated the ground water. After state and federal expenditures of $4 million, the EPA still has not settled on a plan for cleaning up the zinc contamination of the soil and the water of a nearby lake and the holding pond that caught the boiling oil. It is expected that a water-treatment plant will have to be constructed on the site before the polluted water now being diverted into the holding pond can be allowed to flow into the scenic Shenandoah River. The list of lesser disasters, led by fires in Colorado, Wisconsin and Texas, is long. By some estimates, there may be 3 billion scrap automobile tires in legal and illegal stockpiles, with another 250 million being thrown away every year. Eighty-five percent of them will go into stockpiles, illegal dumps or landfills. Lying about, they attract not only arsonists, rats and garden-variety mosquitoes, but the Asian Tiger Mosquito, a known vector of dengue fever in the Far East and shown in the laboratory to transmit encephalitis and a number of less dangerous viral infections. Believed to have come into the United States in truck tires imported for recapping, the insect has now been identified in 120 counties in 17 states, and as far north as Chicago. Because tire piles provide watery breeding sites for all manner of mosquitoes, the arrival of the Asian Tigers produced a wave of pressures to get tires into landfills. The United States now requires that tire casings brought in from Asia for recapping first must be fumigated, steam cleaned or otherwise heat treated. Although the mosquito remains of concern to public health officials, the national garbage crisis and the shortage of landfills has abated the rush to dispose of tires in landfills. Statutes regulating disposal had been put on the books in 18 states by the end of last year, with an equal number expected to tackle new legislative proposals in 1990. Several states, including California, have attached fees to tires, creating funds for disposal or recycling, and others have put sticker fees on new cars. Requirements have been laid down for stockpilers and for "casing jockeys" who make a buck by taking old tires off the hands of retailers. In Oregon, a state permit is required by anyone transporting more than 10 tires, and heavy fines have been levied against stockpilers operating without permits or ignoring fire-safety requirements. Minnesota's Legislature -- the first such body to appropriate money for tire disposal -- banned dumping five years ago and mandated a vigorous effort to clean up existing tire piles, using chipped casings for fill in highway-construction projects. But with the problem growing worse and occasionally causing friction between states as junk tires cross borders, creating illegal dumps, there is now a move toward federal legislation making tire manufacturers and importers responsible for the recycling of an increasing proportion of their products. A recycling incentive bill introduced in the House by Rep. Esteban E. Torres (D-La Puente) and in the Senate by Sens. John Heinz (R-Pa.) and Timothy E. Wirth (D-Colo.) would require tire manufacturers and importers to recycle 5% of their products. The requirement, enforced by the EPA, would be increased 5% each year, reaching 50% by the turn of the century. Given governments' lack of success in handling the problem so far, the idea of the legislation now before Congress is to create a market for junk tires and jump-start a recycling industry. Tire manufacturers and importers would either recycle old casings themselves, putting the material back into the production of new tires, or purchase credits from recycling operations. Contrary to popular notions, scrap tires are not worthless -- on the average, each one contains 2.5 gallons of oil -- and neither is there any dearth of ideas for things to do with them. It's just that there are so many tires -- steel reinforced to survive age, potholes, high speeds, quick stops, heat, cold, low shoulders and hard curbs. But technology has kept apace. New machines will slice through steel belts like liverwurst, turning rubber into the consistency of crumbs, sand or baby powder. For years, California and a growing list of other states have been experimenting with crumb rubber for road paving and patching, and advocates of the practice maintain that rubber asphalt mixes will outlast conventional asphalt and perhaps provide better traction. Paving a mile with a rubber asphalt mix can use the equivalent of 16,000 junk tires. Appealing as it sounds, the recycling of old tires into new roads has been a long time coming because the mix is more expensive than ordinary asphalt, because patent issues are involved, and because the Federal Highway Administration is still at work on standards that specify ratios and performance requirements. The story is similar across the recycling front. Retreading has been thrown into steady decline with the arrival of inexpensive new tires from the Far East, making new tires less expensive than retreads. Although shops across the country have the capacity to put new treads on as many as 25 million tires a year, only an estimated 12.5 million passenger-car tires were retreaded last year. In the mid '80s, 12% of the more than 200 million auto tires were being retreaded. By last year, the number had declined to 7.5%. In spite of the technology to retread or reincarnate bald and near-bald casings into anything from dish drains to carbon black, it is more profitable to ship worn tires to Third World countries for continued service than it is to recycle them. But the feeble waste-tire market has never discouraged eccentrics and dreamers, who have accumulated mountains of them with an eye to the day when sky-high energy prices would make them rich. One such collector may have altered the course of the waste-tire crisis. Over a period of 20 years, Ed Filben collected the biggest pile of junk tires in the history of the world, 30 million to 40 million of them filling a whole valley in the hills outside of Modesto. On a slope above the stupefying dump, Oxford Energy Inc., a New York-based company, is burning tires from Filben's collection in a $41-million high-tech plant. The Oxford plant, which obtained the tires in a lease arrangement with Filben, generates 14 megawatts of electricity, sufficient to supply the needs of 15,000 homes. The electricity is sold to PG&E, the local utility. With its 2,000-degree incinerator going 24 hours a day and consuming 4 million tires a year, the pile could disappear by about the turn of the century. But meanwhile, the company is collecting more tires -- those of more recent vintage produce more energy -- and expects to continue burning after the massive Filben collection is gone. Environmental groups, long alarmed over the presence of the outrageous dump, have opposed the import of any more tires, but the plant has complied with state air quality requirements and received environmental citations from the state and the U.S. Department of Energy. Moving into the black after losing money for half of its first two years, it is being shown off to visitors from other towns where the Oxford company wants to start up new operations. "When we started, we were thinking in terms of 20 or 40 plants around the country," said Oxford Vice President Robert Graulich, "but we have decided that is neither possible nor desirable." The success at Modesto has not made expansion easy. If abandoned tires epitomize decay, the notion of tire burning conjures the smell of rubber and the image of oily black smoke. When Oxford proposed to collect millions of tires from across New England and burn them in a tire-to-electricity plant at Stirling, Conn., it created an uproar across the nearby border in Rhode Island. Concerned that the operation would foul the state's largest water reservoir, the Rhode Island Legislature adopted a bill to block tires from being shipped out of the state to an incinerating facility within 200 miles of its state line. But after four years, construction is beginning. Oxford is collecting and chipping tires from across New England. According to Graulich, it expects to be collecting them at a rate of 11 million a year by the time it goes into operation. Meanwhile, Oxford has set its sights on Lackawanna, N. Y., an old Lake Erie steel town, for a third plant, provoking a debate that stands to become a metaphor for the national waste-disposal crisis and the struggle against tire piles. Lackawanna is financially strapped, devastated by the shutdown of the venerable Bethlehem Steel Co. plant. A monumental cleanup task remains at the abandoned site, while Bethlehem's only remaining operation, a coke oven, continues to regularly belch pollution, bringing it fines from the state Department of Environmental Conservation. It is the epitome of a Rust Belt town trying to make a transition to a new economy. It desperately needs new revenue. Oxford Energy's proposal to locate a tire-fed electric power plant twice the size of the Modesto facility produced a sharp split in the town, although the operation would pay it $980,000 to start up and about $550,000 per year in lieu of taxes. The problem is that Lackawanna is in an area of the state that has excess landfill, two hazardous waste facilities and a nuclear waste dump. Before Oxford approached with its proposal for a tire-burning plant, the giant waste disposal firm Browning-Ferris Industries made Lackawanna its choice as a location for a huge medical waste processing operation. "The aura of waste has overpowered rational discussion," said Spagnoli, the state environmental official whose region includes Lackawanna. "There is a garbage phobia because there isn't a hazardous waste made that we don't handle in western New York." At Oxford, Graulich professes not to be surprised that "we got swept up in all the unfounded fears. We knew that what we were doing was unusual and that we would always have to go through a protracted public education process." Other communities have already been presented with the issues now facing Lackawanna. When a Utah-based company proposed to build a plant to generate electricity from shredded tires at Rialto near San Bernardino, a complex legal battle ensued, involving several counties and municipalities and pitting the South Coast Air Quality Management District against its own appeals board. The fight has gone on for more than five years with two trials and two trips to an appeal court, and the opposition thus far prevailing. Another company, Resource Technology Inc., has hopes of turning old tires into profit at a prototype tire-burning plant at Claxton, Ga. Rather than generating electricity, the plan in Florida is to make a profit by recovering oil, zinc and carbon black, among other byproducts. The firm plans to apply for a permit for a full-scale facility in Polk County, Fla., where there is a tire pile estimated at 10 million, one of a half-dozen in the state with 5 million casings or more. In Congress, in the tire business, and among environmental groups there remain doubts that incineration or current recycling is the answer to the tire problem. There is a notion that there is something to be learned from the junk dealers who have created the eyesores and fire hazards with their massive collections. Shredded tires, it is suggested, might be put into lined landfills, and covered with another liner beneath a layer of dirt. Immune to decomposition, they would remain an energy bank against the day when oil prices might make it commercially attractive to recover them.

text:how text:widespread text:is text:carbon text:monoxid text:poison text:on text:a text:global text:scale
Carbon monoxide is a silent killer. It sneaks up on its victims, odorless and colorless. It makes people drowsy and puts them to sleep. Last year, according to an EPA study, 1,500 people nationwide died of carbon monoxide poisoning, another 10,000 were poisoned but lived. Often, as was apparently the case in Tijuana where authorities believe 12 people died from asphyxiation and six others were injured from a butane-burning lantern, the lack of simple air circulation, through a vent or open window is the main factor that allows the deadly gas to accumulate. Dr. Anthony Manoguerra, director of the Regional Poison Control Center at UC San Diego Medical Center, said that, although the Mexican deaths have the appearance of carbon monoxide poisoning, only laboratory blood tests can confirm it. Mexican officials are relying on the San Diego County medical examiner's office to conduct those tests. Manoguerra said symptoms of carbon monoxide poisoning are headaches, nausea and possibly vomiting. Often, he said, people don't recognize the symptoms for what they are and associate them with some other malady. "They think there's some other reason they aren't feeling well," he said. "Often they don't put the symptoms together. "You can drift into (sleep) before you realize what is happening." For those who survive, their prospects of good health depend on factors such as how long they were exposed. The medical center, for example, has a hyperbaric chamber it uses to treat people poisoned by the gas. By raising the air pressure, the chamber increases the amount of oxygen in the body tissues, removing the carbon monoxide from the blood more quickly. In Tijuana, where there is no hyperbaric chamber, officials are administering oxygen to the six survivors who were poisoned. Manoguerra said this works but usually takes longer. Manoguerra said that, depending on the severity of the poisoning, it is not unusual for people to suffer permanent nervous system or brain damage. Manoguerra said carbon monoxide is usually a byproduct of any system that burns natural gas, such as butane or propane, in the presence of oxygen. If everything is working properly, the system will produce carbon dioxide -- the harmless gas that is expelled when people exhale. However, if the system is receiving inadequate amounts of air or is faulty internally, it instead spews out deadly carbon monoxide, he said.

text:how text:is text:the text:dispos text:of text:industri text:wast text:be text:accomplish text:by text:industri text:manag text:throughout text:the text:world
CSO [Article by Eduardo Calvo Sans: "The Enemy Is Argentina"; first paragraph is LA PRENSA introduction] [Excerpts] While all sorts of hazardous materials circulate throughout the world, here in Argentina we still do not know what to do with our own wastes or how to control them. Argentina is supposedly safe from hazardous wastes coming from other countries. In principle, a controversial law (24.051) bans this, though some environmentalists say that its later enacting regulation (Decree 831/93) leaves open a window through which some wastes could be introduced, disguised as industrial components. It is a fact that throughout the world such materials are "roaming around" in search of storage sites. It is the duty of the authorities to keep their eyes open and their pockets shut. [passage omitted] For Argentina, the enemy is within. Generators of hazardous wastes and unscrupulous waste disposal contractors cannot be controlled. The unevenness of legislation throughout Argentina, the inadequacy of the organizations that are supposed to conduct controls, and the lack of industrial facilities to process these materials place the population at serious risk. Tragic isolated events may suddenly make the problem obvious. The widespread feeling among specialists is that Argentina is living on a time bomb, and there are no legal or political mechanisms to dismantle this bomb.

text:what text:incid text:have text:there text:been text:of text:stolen text:or text:forg text:art
The wood-paneled offices are tucked away on the fourth floor of the Explorers Club in Manhattan -- a nice bit of symbolism -- and serve as a central clearing house in the international search for stolen art. When the phone rang on Monday, it was no surprise that the FBI was on the other end of the line. The agent in the Boston field office wanted to know if the International Foundation for Art Research could print a special bulletin with pictures and descriptions of a dozen priceless masterpieces taken from the Isabella Stewart Gardner Museum in Boston Sunday -- the biggest theft of old masters in the nation's history. "The FBI and the Gardner Museum want to get the word out," said Constance Lowenthal, the foundation's executive director, who immediately began planing a mini-magazine which will be sent to collectors, art dealers, museums, insurance companies and law enforcement agencies around the world. "They (the robbers) obviously stole it very well," Lowenthal said. "The next part is more difficult to carry off. It requires a different set of skills to insert these works of art into the art market." Her colleague, Margaret I. O'Brien, speculated that the works by Rembrandt, Degas, Manet and Vermeer could well prove impossible to dispose of because of all the publicity. But they could also be held for ransom, or possibly dealt to a collector intent on having a masterpiece no matter what the origin. Art experts said Monday that the astounding haul from the Gardner -- possibly the biggest art theft in modern times -- underscores what law enforcement officials have realized for more than a decade: stealing art works has become the second biggest international criminal activity after narcotics. The boom in stolen art is fueled partly by soaring prices, increasing sophistication of thieves and the low priority many thefts get from law enforcement agencies busy focusing on violent crime. Lowenthal's group maintains files on more than 30,000 stolen art cases. More than $100-million worth of paintings, sculpture, decorative arts and antiquities are stolen each year on average around the world. A single case like the Gardner theft can balloon that number dramatically. Although the museum will not put a price on the missing masterpieces, some experts say the value could be a quarter-billion dollars. And while the masterpieces may prove to be challenging to unload, lesser artworks are almost liquid assets in today's art underworld. Experts estimate that only 5% to 10% of stolen artworks ever finds its way back to the owners. "You'd be amazed at how many folks are dealing unknowingly with stolen art," said Milton Esterow, editor and publisher of ARTnews magazine. "More and more of the thieves know exactly what they are doing. They know the difference between a Rembrandt and a Botticelli," he said. "As thieves have become more knowledgeable about the art world, more sophisticated, law enforcement activities in the United States have diminished, and that's disgraceful," Esterow added, noting that offenders, when apprehended, often receive light sentences. "Thefts have gone up for two reasons," Lowenthal said. "The value of what is stolen has risen so dramatically. Thieves who used to steal other things have learned there is value in art and antiquities. They are willing in some cases to accept 1% of market value when they sell stolen goods. They sell to unscrupulous dealers who don't ask any questions." In the case of the Gardner thefts, "It's difficult to figure out what the thieves will do with the art if you think of it in the normal manner of buying and selling," said Detective William Martin, a Los Angeles Police Department art theft expert who has worked in the field since 1980. "If I were investigating this case, I'd be looking at ransoms and rewards," he said. The Boston thieves might demand a ransom from the museum or an insurance company, he said. If a reward is offered, an accomplice "might just happen to be walking down an alley and spot one of the paintings in a trash can," Martin said. One case involving a ransom occurred last year, when thieves stole three paintings by Vincent van Gogh from the Kroeller-Moeller Museum in Otterlo, Holland. They demanded a $2.2-million-ransom and returned one of the works. The others were later recovered and four suspects arrested. It is unlikely the Boston thieves are working for a collector, Martin said. "Everyone wants to hear that thieves steal to order for some mad collector who will hide the art in a castle . . . (but) the joy of collecting is showing your collection. Theft is done for profit. The basic motivation is money," Martin said. Still, occasionally thefts are commissioned for works that cannot be legitimately acquired. One such theft occurred in 1983, when thieves stole Italian Renaissance masterpieces, including Raphael's self-portrait, from the Hungarian national museum in Budapest. Investigators found that a sophisticated band of Italian art thieves, armed with cutting tools and high-tech alarm-busting devices, executed a perfect break-in and vanished with the works. An extensive dragnet eventually snared the thieves in their home country before they could get the paintings to Greece where, it was later found, an olive oil baron had paid a handsome sum for the sake of having the works hang in his home. "There aren't many thieves with that sort of expertise," said Robert Volpe, a former New York City police detective who worked on the Hungarian case and is now a private consultant tracing stolen art around the world. "They were capable of stealing anything." Recoveries are relatively rare but when they occur, they are celebrated in "IFAR Reports," the monthly publication of Lowenthal's group. The magazine listed 10 important recoveries in 1989 in its December issue. Among them is "one of 21 Dutch Old Masters stolen at gunpoint in a daylight raid on a Zurich gallery, and allegedly transported to the U.S. in a diplomatic pouch." The painting by Dutch master Adrian van Coorte was recovered through the efforts of New York dealer Richard Schillay, who was offered some of the works, according to the journal. A lithograph, "Sick Child," by Norwegian Expressionist Edvard Munch was returned to an Oslo collector after a citizen's tip about a suspicious driver led Norwegian police to a cache of stolen art. Auguste Rodin's bronze "Mask of a Man With a Broken Nose," stolen from the Philadelphia Museum of Art, turned up under a sewer pipe in the basement of a Philadelphia truck driver, thanks to an anonymous tip. Christie's auction house was responsible for another recovery, listed in the publication. A double-sided drawing by Rembrandt "induced gasps of excitement" when it was delivered to the auction house for consignment, but it was later found to be property stolen in 1979 from the Rembrandt House Amsterdam, the IFAR publication reported. Documentation is essential to recovering a stolen work of art. When law enforcement officers receive vague descriptions of stolen property, such as "oil painting, multi-colored" or "painting, abstract," as is typical of thefts from private collections, they can't help. But when photographs and complete documentation of stolen artworks are available, as it is for works in major museum collections, the information can be circulated and the items can be easily identified if they are found. The Gardner thefts prove that American museums have a serious security problem, but they are better prepared than European institutions, which are often housed in antiquated, ill-equipped buildings. Of all the art-rich countries, Italy probably has the greatest difficulty protecting its treasures, some of which still sit around in open churches, Martin said. "There has been an increase in museum thefts in America during the last two years, principally back east," Martin said, noting that "there hasn't been a major museum theft in Los Angeles for a long, long time." Martin credits that record to effective preventive measures. "The security in major museums in Los Angeles is excellent," he said. Art museums have become more security conscious and installed increasingly sophisticated security systems during the last decade, he said. Effective security for a museum includes a "very sophisticated, up-to-date alarm system, 24-hour protection by trained security officers and back-up cataloguing of items in the collection," Martin said. Given that effort, the Gardner theft sent shock waves through the museum world. "I'm just devastated. It's a terrible loss," said Deborah Gribbon, associate director for curatorial affairs at the J. Paul Getty Museum. "People may get the impression that the Gardner is a lax institution or that it is understaffed, but that's not true. It's not a situation where they were a sitting duck," said Gribbon, who was curator of the Gardner from 1976 to 1984. The Getty, the Los Angeles area's most conspicuous center of art wealth, has always been security-conscious, Gribbon said. "But there's no question that you take a look at what you are doing after something like this," she added. "The Gardner theft underlines that excellent security people are the ultimate line of defense, and ours are extremely good." "Certainly an incident like this causes all museums to reflect on and review their procedures." said Jeanne Collins, director of public information at the Museum of Modern Art in New York. Museums typically do not insure artworks for full replacement value. Rates are prohibitive and the money is better spent on prevention, museum officials and insurance agents agree. While museums have the most valuable collections and are vulnerable to the largest losses, dealers whose doors are open to the public are probably even more susceptible. Longtime dealers say that security is a relatively recent worry, but an extremely serious one now. "We didn't have any security at all when I started out here about 55 years ago; it wouldn't have occurred to anybody to take a work of art," said Klaus Perls, owner of Perls Galleries on Madison Avenue in New York. "It was very hard to get rid of art in any way you wanted to -- you couldn't sell it and there were very few people who wanted it. In the museums, there were some precautions but they were more about fire than stealing." Perls was a victim of theft in January, when a mobile by Alexander Calder was stolen through a domed skylight. "You would not believe the kind of fortifications we have in our place now," he said. Dealers who exhibit at antique shows across the country deliver objects to armories or halls where the exhibitions are held using unmarked vans or trucks. "All drive trucks with nothing on the side panels," said Wendell Garrett, editor of the magazine Antiques. "Anonymity is the best thing." It is also the first line of defense for many private collectors. Being identified as the owner of a major artwork once was regarded as a status symbol, but "you go to exhibits nowadays, and most labels say 'loaned by a private collector' rather than identifying the owner," said Jim Reinish, senior vice president of New York's Hirschel Adler Galleries. Experts say that while spectacular robberies like that at the Gardner Museum may make headlines, smaller thefts are more common. Each year, the International Foundation for Art Research adds over 2,000 works of stolen art to its files. They include liturgical objects like a 19th-Century silver chalice stolen in Seraing, Belgium; a 16th-Century Gothic clock taken in Zurich; an Egyptian statue of a standing man stolen in New York, and a 20th-Century Tiffany Studios peony lamp taken last June in Beverly Hills. The foundation put out a special art theft alert offering a $100,000 reward for a private collection of 60 pieces of art, antiquities and Oriental and tribal sculpture stolen last March in New York City. It included a Picasso pastel and pencil drawing and an Egyptian Middle Kingdom standing man. Goldman reported from New York and Muchnic from Los Angeles. Staff writer Karen Tumulty and researcher Lisa Phillips in New York also contributed to this story.  MAJOR RECENT ART THEFTS MARCH 18, 1990 -- Two robbers dressed as police officers steal 11 paintings and an ancient Chinese beaker from the Isabella Stewart Gardner Museum in Boston. The stolen paintings included works by Rembrandt, Degas and Vermeer. The works are said to be worth hundreds of millions of dollars. DEC. 29, 1989 -- Eight works by Matisse are reported missing from the Nice apartment where the French artist had lived. Police recover the works, with an estimated value of $12.5 million, during a routine traffic stop Jan. 9. NOV. 5, 1989 -- Works worth at least $17 million are taken from the home of Picasso's daughter, Marina Picasso, including seven paintings by Picasso, a Brueghel and a bust by Rodin. SEPTEMBER, 1989 -- Works worth $3 million, including 81 Andy Warhol lithographs, are stolen from a gallery near Bonn, West Germany. Authorities recover the works from a Dutch art dealer. AUGUST, 1989 -- Two men steal paintings and three signet rings worth $4 million from a New York art collector. The booty includes a 1516 painting worth $3 million and a ring the owner said belonged to the family of Vlad the Impaler, the Eastern European prince who inspired the vampire legend of Count Dracula. JUNE 1, 1989 -- A Braque painting worth an estimated $3 million is taken from the National Museum of Modern Art in Paris. MAY 3, 1989 -- Six armed men flashing fake police badges steal $30 million to $40 million worth of paintings, sculptures and tapestries from the Chacara do Ceu Museum in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. Police recover the works, which include paintings by Dali and Matisse and two Chinese ceramic horses from the 7th Century Tang Dynasty. APRIL 12, 1989 -- Three armed robbers take 21 Renaissance paintings worth more than $5 million from a gallery in Zurich, Switzerland. Police recover at least nine of the works. DEC. 12, 1988 -- Thieves steal three paintings by Van Gogh, with an estimated value of $72 million to $90 million, from the Kroeller-Mueller Museum in a remote section of the Netherlands. The thieves demand a ransom of $2.2 million for the works and return one of them. Police recover the other two on July 13, 1989. Source: Associated Press NO THEFT INSURANCE -- The stolen Gardner Museum works were insured against damage but not theft. A20

text:find text:refer text:to text:milosevic' text:wife text:mirjana text:markov
Mr Radovan Karadzic, the Bosnian Serb leader, yesterday survived a mutiny from his elite army corps when soldiers lifted their eight-day blockade of Banja Luka, the biggest Serb-controlled city in northern Bosnia. Mr Karadzic appears to have smashed the rebellion, dubbed 'September 93', by arresting some of its leaders and winning over others. But the protest reflects growing splits between the Belgrade leadership of President Slobodan Milosevic and Serb leaders from outside Serbia proper. There are growing fears the parlous state of the economy will give rise to similar protests in coming months, even though the Serbs have effectively won the war in Bosnia. One reason is that Banja Luka, the north-western Serb military headquarters and the industrial centre of the self-proclaimed Serb state in Bosnia, has been much harder hit by the war than many other regions nearer Belgrade. The soldiers who rebelled receive the equivalent of DM2 (80 pence) a month - a fraction of what others earn. The mutiny appeared to be an attempt to weaken Mr Karadzic, who has emerged from recent peace negotiations in a strong position. But there is continuing confusion about who instigated the affair. Mr Vojislav Seselj, president of the powerful, ultra-nationalist Serbian Radical party, blames the Communist Party-Movement for Yugoslavia led by Mr Milosevic's wife, Mrs Mirjana Markovic. In the first sign of the expected power struggle between Serbia's two strongest leaders, Mr Seselj has accused Mr Milosevic's closest allies of 'trying to separate Serbia from Serbs living in Bosnia and Croatia'.

text:give text:exampl text:of text:alleg text:suicid text:that text:arous text:suspicion text:of text:the text:death text:actual text:be text:murder
A county computer whiz, accused of masterminding the 1985 murder of his wife, acknowledged to investigators that he told his teen-age daughter to take the blame for the killing because she would face only a minimal sentence, a videotape played in court Tuesday showed. David A. Brown, 34, also admitted to police during the taped interview after his September arrest that he told his daughter how to write a suicide note and concocted a drug mixture to help her feign suicide after the killing. But the Anaheim Hills computer programmer denied orchestrating the murder of his wife, maintaining that he never thought his daughter and sister-in-law were serious about their plot to kill Linda Brown in March, 1985.  Final Piece of Evidence The videotape shown Tuesday of Brown's statement to police, what could prove to be the most damning evidence against him, was the final piece of evidence offered by prosecutors as Brown's 3-week preliminary hearing drew to a close in a Westminster courtroom. This morning, Municipal Judge Floyd H. Schenk is expected to decide whether Brown should stand trial on murder charges. Because of a special allegation that Brown had his wife killed to profit financially from $835,000 in insurance, he could face the death penalty if convicted. In the interview with police, Brown's own words seemed to suggest that he had a far greater knowledge -- and perhaps a more active participation -- in the killing of his wife than Brown had previously acknowledged. Brown's attorney, Joel Baruch of Newport Beach, conceded that the videotape could prove incriminating to his client, saying in an interview: "In any criminal case, when a defendant talks to a police officer, and there's anything but an outright denial, that could pose problems."  Explanations Wait for Trial Baruch added: "There are explanations for the things that are said in that tape, but those explanations will have to wait for the trial." He declined to elaborate, saying he did not want to reveal his defense to Deputy Dist. Atty. Jeoffrey Robinson. Brown is accused of persuading his daughter, Cinnamon Brown, then 14, to kill his wife -- Cinnamon Brown's stepmother -- so he could collect on the victim's insurance and marry his wife's sister. On the night of the murder, Cinnamon Brown was found in the doghouse of the family's Garden Grove home, apparently incoherent from an overdose of drugs. She left a suicide note, saying she was sorry for shooting her stepmother to death. She was convicted in the killing and has spent more than 3 years in the California Youth Authority facility in Camarillo. After remaining silent about the case, she named her father in the plot last fall, which led to his arrest. She initially told investigators that she had not killed Linda Brown herself, but then admitted that she had pulled the trigger -- though only at the prodding of her father. After the killing, prosecutors allege that Brown collected $835,000 from several of Linda Brown's life insurance policies and, about 16 months later, married the victim's teen-age sister, Patty Bailey. Bailey, living in the Browns' Garden Grove home, had been having an affair with David Brown while her sister was alive, prosecutors say. Bailey faces separate murder charges stemming from the alleged plot.  Prime Witness Against Father Bailey is now a prime witness against her husband. She testified earlier during the preliminary hearing that Brown had schemed to kill Linda Brown, although her testimony about the murder contradicted Cinnamon Brown's on several points. Brown was interviewed by police Sept. 22 after his arrest on suspicion of murder. He initially maintained in the taped interview that he had loved his wife and had nothing to do with her death. But he later acknowledged, under sharp questioning, some knowledge of the events leading up to her death. Brown said in the interview that Cinnamon Brown and Bailey had been convinced that Brown's wife wanted to kill him, and the two teen-agers wanted to stop her before she could carry out the plan. Brown said at some points during the interview that he had not thought that Cinnamon Brown and Bailey were serious about hurting the victim, but he maintained at other times that he had tried to talk them out of the plan.  Would Not Stand for It "I told (Cinnamon) if something was going to happen to me, let it," he said. "There's no way I would stand for anything like" the slaying. He added: "If I was going to stage something (like the slaying), I would stage something a hell of a lot more sophisticated than this. . . . My imagination is very vivid." Nonetheless, Brown said he discussed writing suicide notes with Cinnamon Brown and mixed a combination of aspirin and baking soda for her to take in order to make it seem as if she was trying to kill herself. And, in a conversation with his daughter in the hospital after the slaying, Brown told her that she should admit to the killing, he said in the interview, because as a juvenile, she would get only a minimal sentence in a youth facility. Still, Brown insisted in the interview with police that his discussions with his daughter had been purely hypothetical; he did not think she would go through with the plot, he said, terming it "a joke . . . a game."  'I Was Shocked' "I was shocked that Linda was actually shot," he said. Yet at another point during the videotaped interview, Brown seemed to contradict that very assertion: "I told (Cinnamon that) if she was going to go through with this thing regardless of what I said, I didn't want to be there." Brown was not in the house when Cinnamon Brown shot her stepmother as she slept, police said.

text:what text:counterfeit text:of text:monei text:is text:be text:done text:in text:modern text:time
Language: Russian Article Type:BFN [Feature consisting of report by INTERFAX, ITAR-TASS, and own correspondent Aleksandr Chernykh, and unattributed comment: "Draw a Million, Friend"] [Excerpts] INTERFAX: "On 25 December a criminal gang of six Chechnya inhabitants was arrested in St. Petersburg. Some 20,000 counterfeit 50,000 ruble bank notes produced on a xerox machine with a total face value of 1 billion rubles were confiscated from them." ITAR-TASS: "The year 1993 has been a record one in Perm Oblast in terms of the number of counterfeit bank notes which are going into circulation. The number of counterfeit notes confiscated was almost seven times greater than last year. The season was opened by Ashot Oganesyan, who already has two previous convictions, from whom 50,000 ruble [R] notes he had produced himself were confiscated. The oblast court sentenced the counterfeiter to eight years' imprisonment with the confiscation of his property. In all 10 people have been convicted of counterfeiting money this year." [ITAR-TASS report ends] [Chernykh report begins] Tomsk -- There has been a mass dumping of counterfeit R50,000 notes in Tomsk. The local law enforcement organs had already recorded instances of this kind, but not on such a scale. [passage omitted] During the investigation it emerged that the main cache was in Novosibirsk. The Tomsk team of investigators traveled there. With the aid of their local colleagues they managed to reach the underground storehouse. When it was opened the picture was very impressive: They discovered 488 counterfeit R50,000 notes, counterfeit plates, and blank passports and identity cards. [passage omitted] In the opinion of V.O. Grechman, first deputy chief of the Tomsk Internal Affairs Administration, the dumping of counterfeit money in Russia is a precisely planned operation at the state level. On the one hand it is designed to support Chechnya's destroyed financial system and on the other directly or indirectly to undermine Russia's economy. (Let us recall the operations involving fake advice notes which caused us losses of many billions -- they came from there, from Chechnya). Good preparation helped the Tomsk law enforcement organs halt the counterfeit money operations quite swiftly. After the "Novosibirsk cache" had been destroyed the dumping of counterfeit bank notes ceased. But is that for long? What further inventions will the Caucasus bring us in the sphere of economic crime? [Chernykh report ends] The number of criminal encroachments connected with the production and sale of counterfeit money has increased 350 percent, a ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA correspondent was told at a Russian Internal Affairs Ministry [MVD] news conference. Instances of counterfeiting have been discovered in many regions of the country. Over the first five months of 1993 alone counterfeit Russian bank notes with a face value of many tens of millions of rubles were removed from circulation. There has been a marked enhancement of the counterfeiters' organization and professionalism. In a number of cases they organize international links and distribute roles and spheres of criminal activity. One of the main reasons for the growth of this type of crime is the lifting of restrictions on the import of modern copying and duplicating equipment from abroad and the repeal of previously established rules for its registration by the internal affairs organs. This act has not been compensated for by other forms of social control. Unfortunately the newspaper editorial office cannot supply the reader with the specific results of the internal affairs organs' struggle against counterfeiting in 1993. It is not known why department chief N.S. Ponomarev refused to talk with a correspondent on the telephone. Yevgeniy Tumanov, chief of the Moscow Internal Affairs Main Administration department for combating economic crimes, believes that almost all counterfeits are distinguished by one method of production. It cannot be said that they are all produced to a very high standard: Often watermarks are lacking and the color of the dye is lighter than on a genuine note but naturally you cannot discern these nuances as you go. In principle Russian bank notes are quite well protected but after all dollars are also forged. And in general we have given our proposals on this score to the Main Administration for Production of State Bank Notes, Coins, and Medals but for some reason they have not been taken seriously. Let us add on our own behalf that recently there has been an increase in the number of counterfeit R50,000 notes (the counterfeiters do not think small). It is particularly painful to lose such a large sum at one go so the MVD and the Central Bank urge us to be vigilant. Do not accept R50,000 notes from people you do not know. The dye on counterfeit notes is not as fast -- rub a folded note to see if it comes off. And to be doubly sure wet it with saliva and see if the color runs. Alas, so far that is all the wise fighters to preserve the integrity of bank notes can suggest to us. To judge by their recommendations all is confusion as regards money right now. It is far easier to buy nothing, to sell nothing, and to have no money at all.

text:provid text:inform text:on text:the text:us text:of text:dog text:worldwid text:for text:law text:enforc text:purpos
(4) Is not subject to either CSRS or FERS and is in a position that OPM determines would satisfy one of the other three conditions cited above. In addition, an employee who has had law enforcement retirement coverage granted retroactively for service while subject to 5 U.S.C. chapter 51 is entitled to the special pay adjustment retroactively. An agency commented that there is a lack of congruence between the definitions of ``law enforcement officer'' under CSRS and FERS and that the classification standards should provide specific guidance for linking law enforcement duties to the definition of ``law enforcement officer'' for retirement purposes. Questions that arise concerning law enforcement duties for the purpose of determining an employee's entitlement to these special pay adjustments must be handled within the context of the technical amendments to FEPCA and law enforcement retirement law and regulations. Such issues are not within the scope of a classification standard. Adding a discussion of these issues to classification standards would add unnecessarily to the complexity of the standards without adding materially to the quality of information already provided. An employee organization commented that the definitions of ``law enforcement officer'' in these regulations should provide guidance on specific positions, job series, or duties. Such guidance is beyond the scope of these regulations. The criteria for approval of a position as a primary or secondary law enforcement position are in 5 CFR part 831, subpart I, for employees subject to CSRS, and in 5 CFR part 842, subpart H, for employees subject to FERS. Most employees who are covered by law enforcement retirement provisions are criminal investigators, Border Patrol Agents, Deputy U.S. Marshals, correctional officers, or support personnel in correctional institutions who have frequent and direct contact with inmates. Most Federal police officers are not covered by law enforcement retirement provisions. Basic Pay for Computation of Special Pay Adjustments An agency commented that some of its attorneys and accountants are on nationwide special rates under 5 U.S.C. 5305 that are not specifically related to law enforcement duties. Some of these attorneys and accountants have been granted retroactive coverage under the law enforcement retirement provisions. The agency believes special pay adjustments for LEO's should not be based on nationwide special rates unless the special rates are directly related to law enforcement duties. The interim regulations for special pay entitlements for law enforcement officers published on January 8, 1993, provided for computation of special pay adjustments on the basis of a nationwide or worldwide special salary rate under 5 U.S.C. 5305. Such a rate was included in the definition of ``scheduled annual rate of pay'' in 531.301 of title 5, Code of Federal Regulations.

text:find text:document text:that text:discuss text:the text:damag text:ultraviolet text:uv text:light text:from text:the text:sun text:can text:do text:to text:ey
PINT-SIZED, inexpensive sunglasses perched on button noses are too cute for words, but are they ruining the eyes of the children who wear them? Perhaps. Eye specialists say that unless the lenses protect against ultraviolet (UV) radiation, a child is better off without sunglasses, even on the brightest days. The safest approach is to buy sunglasses that block at least 95% of UV rays. "The worst thing you can do is put a child in sunglasses without UV protection because studies have shown that the long-term absorption of UV radiation probably contributes to cataracts and may also cause degeneration of the retina," says Dr. Sharon Spooner, a clinical instructor of pediatric ophthalmology at UCLA's Jules Stein Eye Institute. In bright sunlight, the pupil of the eye automatically constricts and muscles around the eye contract to a squint. This offers natural protection, by letting in fewer harmful rays. But when the eye is covered by a dark lens, muscles relax and the pupil dilates, allowing more UV rays to enter the eye. Concern about UV radiation absorption has been a hot topic with regard to adult sunglasses for several years, but only recently have studies shown that children are particularly vulnerable. So doctors have begun to urge parents to protect children's eyes from UV. "I'm prescribing more sunglasses for kids with normal vision to make sure that they get adequate UV protection," says Dr. Jay Schlanger, an assistant professor at Southern California College of Optometry in Fullerton and an optometrist at Cedars-Sinai Medical Center. "Parents are now beginning to realize that the more UV you absorb in your lifetime, the more susceptible to damage you are. They want their kids to be protected as early as possible." For that reason, optician Katheryn Dabbs-Schramm sells sunglasses sized to fit infants at her A Child's View optical shops in El Toro and Huntington Beach. "It's commonly thought that parents won't spend money on kids' glasses, so most optical shops don't carry children's sizes," she explains. "But I find there is no limit to what they'll spend." Although non-prescription infant sunglasses with UV protection are only $12, Dabbs-Schramm says the average price of children's prescription eyewear is about $150, on a par with the national average for adult eyewear. Makers of over-the-counter sunglasses are not required by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to label their products with regard to UV protection, but this summer a voluntary labeling program was instituted. Eyewear marked "General Purpose" and "Special Purpose" provide 95% and 99% UV protection, respectively. Schlanger recommends that consumers buy only prescription or labeled, over-the-counter sunglasses. He also notes that any pair of sunglasses can be coated for UV protection at an optical store for about $15. "Parents put sunscreen on their children to protect their skin," Spooner says. "Now we're talking about their eyes. Proper sunglasses are necessary protection against harmful rays." Glasses courtesy of A Child's View; model Alex Scott /Colleen Cler.

text:do text:ani text:countri text:other text:than text:the text:u. text:and text:china text:have text:a text:declin text:birth text:rate
Language: Chinese Article Type:BFN [By reporter Yu Changhong (0060 7022 3163)] [Text] Beijing, 24 Jan (XINHUA) -- Peng Peiyun, state councillor and minister in charge of the State Family Planning Commission, recently pointed out: We must strictly control population growth while going all out to develop the economy. We must fully understand that family planning is the indispensable condition for realizing our second and even third phase strategic objectives, and we must ensure a good job in family planning, monitoring and handling it in the general climate of social and economic development so as to create a good population environment for China's socialist modernization drive. Thanks to extensive, thoroughgoing family planning, China has been able to effectively control its excessive population growth during the peak birth period in recent years. However, due to a large base figure, China is still facing a grim situation in birth control, and it is urgent matter to build a family planning structure in line with China's socialist economic structure. As far as this issue is concerned, Peng Peiyuan discussed several aspects of family planning work at the sixth national demography seminar that ended yesterday: -- To continue to strictly control population growth remains the top priority of China's family planning work. The development of family planning is uneven across the country, and the birth rate in some regions shows no sign of decrease. As outdated beliefs regarding birth still exist among some cadres and masses, and their practical problems remain unsolved, the birth rate can pick up at the slightest relaxation of efforts. In addition, some grass-roots units have concealed and failed to report new births, and new circumstances and problems concerning birth control have also occurred in the course of establishing a socialist market economy. Therefore, we should fully recognize the protracted, arduous nature of family planning work, accurately assess the results in population control, and do everything possible to lower the birth rate. -- China is also facing an arduous task in improving population quality. Of the more than 50 million disabled in the country, more than 10 million were born with deformities; there are now 4.17 million disabled children under 14 with birth defects, accounting for more than half of all disabled children; there are also 180 million illiterates or semi-illiterates in the country; and of every 1,000 newborns, 13 suffer from birth defects. Over 400 million people are living in iodine-deficient areas, which could cause the birth of tens of millions of mentally retarded children by 2000 if the problem was not solved. Therefore, we must understand that good prenatal care, sound rearing of children, and good education are the prerequisites for improving population quality as well as the essential conditions for solidifying a low birth rate; we must coordinate all sectors to energetically and effectively promote family planning. -- Population structure problems must be solved. Due to a decline in the birth rate and a rise in average life expectancy, China is facing an aging population structure which has brought along a series of age related problems. In the structure of sex, the problem of a high ratio between males and females merits our keen attention. Therefore, efforts should be made to promote the establishment of a comprehensive pension and life insurance system as early as possible. Moreover, equality between men and women should also be advocated and policies and measures should be taken to lift women's social status. -- Urbanization must be advanced in a planned way. Since the policy of reform and opening up was instituted, China's population mobility has increased and urbanization has accelerated. This trend will grow continually throughout the nineties. We should encourage and guide the surplus rural labor force to flow in an orderly manner between regions and to gradually transfer to job vacancies in nonfarming sectors, thereby bringing into play the positive impact of population mobility. This is also an important issue that has a close bearing on China's economic development and social stability. Speaking in her capacity as chairwoman of the China Demography Society, Peng Peiyun also urged demographers to do more practical work and provide information and consultation for departments concerned. The new term of the society's officials also appointed Song Jian, state councillor and minister in charge of the State Science and Technology, and seven other as advisers.

text:identifi text:outbreak text:of text:legionnair text:diseas
339. Muder RR, Yu VL, McClure JK, Kroboth FJ, Kominos SD, Lumish RN. Nosocomial Legionnaires' disease uncovered in a prospective pneumonia study: Implications for underdiagnosis. JAMA 1983; 249:3184&hyph;3188. 340. Fliermans CD, Cherry WB, Orrison LH, Smith SJ, Tison DL, Pope DH. Ecologic distribution of Legionella pneumophila. Appl Environ Microbiol 1981; 41:9&hyph;16. 341. Morris GK, Patton CM, Feeley JC, et al. Isolation of the Legionnaires' disease bacterium from environmental samples. Ann Intern Med 1979; 90:664&hyph;666. 342. Hsu SC, Martin R, Wentworth BB. Isolation of Legionella species from drinking water. Appl Environ Microbiol 1984; 48:830&hyph;832. 343. Tison DL, Seidler RJ. Legionella incidence and density in potable drinking water. Appl Environ Microbiol 1983; 45:337&hyph;339. 344. Muraca P, Stout JE, Yu VL. Comparative assessment of chlorine, heat, ozone, and UV light for killing Legionella pneumophila within a model plumbing system. Appl Environ Microbiol 1987; 53:447&hyph;453. 345. Farrell ID, Barker JE, Miles EP, Hutchinson JCP. A field study of the survival of Legionella pneumophila in a hospital hot-water system. Epidemiol Infect 1990; 104:381&hyph;387. 346. Stout JE, Yu VL, Best MG. Ecology of Legionella pneumophila within water distribution systems. Appl Environ Microbiol 1985; 49:221&hyph;228. 347. Sanden GN, Fields BS, Barbaree JM, et al. Viability of Legionella pneumophila in chlorine-free water at elevated temperatures. Curr Microbiol 1989; 18:61&hyph;65. 348. Schulze-Robbecke R, Rodder M, Exner M. Multiplication and killing temperatures of naturally occurring legionellae. Zbl Bakt Hyg B 1987; 184:495&hyph;500. 349. Habicht W, Muller HE. Occurrence and parameters of frequency of Legionella in warm water systems of hospitals and hotels in Lower Saxony. Zbl Bakt Hyg B 1988; 186:79&hyph;88. 350. Ciesielski CA, Blaser MJ, Wang WL. Role of stagnation and obstruction of water flow in isolation of Legionella pneumophila from hospital plumbing. Appl Environ Microbiol 1984; 48:984&hyph;987. 351. Rowbotham TJ. Preliminary report on the pathogenicity of Legionella pneumophila for freshwater and soil amoebae. J Clin Path 1980; 33:1179&hyph;1183. 352. Fields BS, Sanden GN, Barbaree JM, et al. Intracellular multiplication of Legionella pneumophila in amoebae isolated from hospital hot water tanks. Curr Microbiol 1989; 18:131&hyph;137. 353. Le Saux NM, Sekla L, McLeod J, et al. Epidemic of nosocomial Legionnaires' disease in renal transplant recipients: a case-control and environmental study. Can Med Assoc J 1989; 140:1047&hyph;1053. 354. Berendt RF, Young HW, Allen RG, Knutsen GL. Dose-response of guinea pigs experimentally infected with aerosols of Legionella pneumophila . J Infect Dis 1980; 141:186&hyph;192. 355. Marston BJ, Lipman HB, Breiman RF. Surveillance for Legionnaires' disease 1980&hyph;1989: Risk factors for disease and disease-related mortality. Abstracts of the 33rd Interscience Conference on Antimicrobial Agents and Chemotherapy 1993; 33:373.(abstract) 356. Kirby BD, Snyder KM, Meyer RD, et al. Legionnaires' disease. Report of 65 nosocomially acquired cases and review of the literature. Medicine 1980; 59:188&hyph;205. 357. Haley CE, Cohen ML, Halter J, Meyer RD. Nosocomial Legionnaires' disease: A continuing common-source epidemic at Wadsworth Medical Center. Medicine 1979; 90:583&hyph;586. 358. Bock BV, Kirby BD, Edelstein PH, et al. Legionnaires' disease in renal transplant recipients. Lancet 1978; 1:410&hyph;413. 359. Brady MT. Nosocomial Legionnaires' disease in a children's hospital. J Pediatr 1989; 115:46&hyph;50. 360. Horie H, Kawakami H, Minoshima K, et al. Neonatal Legionnaires' disease: histologic findings in an autopsied neonate. Acta Pathol Jpn 1992; 42:427&hyph;431. 361. Helms CM, Viner JP, Sturm RH, et al. Comparative features of pneumococcal, mycoplasma, and Legionnaires' disease pneumonias. Ann Intern Med 1979; 90:543&hyph;547. 362. Yu V, Kroboth FJ, Shonnard J, Brown A, McDearman S, Magnussen M. Legionnaires' disease: New clinical perspectives from a prospective pneumonia study. Am J Med 1982; 73:357&hyph;361. 363. Marston B, Plouffe J, File T, et al. Evidence of mixed infection in patients with antibody to Chlamydia pneumoniae . Abstracts of the 32nd Interscience Conference on Antimicrobial Agents and Chemotherapy 1992; 808.(abstract) 364. Ussery XT, Butler JC, Breiman R, et al. Outbreak of Legionnaires' disease associated with Mycoplasma infection. Abstracts of the 32nd Interscience Conference on Antimicrobial Agents and Chemotherapy 1992; 815.(abstract) 365. Jimenez ML, Aspa J, Padilla B, et al. Fiberoptic bronchoscopic diagnosis of pulmonary disease in 151 HIV-infected patients with pneumonitis. Eur J Clin Microbiol Infect Dis 1991; 10:491&hyph;497. 366. Centers for Disease Control. Case definitions for public health surveillance. MMWR 1990; 39 RR13:18. 367. Helms CM, Renner ED, Viner JP, Hierholzer WJ, Wintermeyer LA, Johnson W. Indirect immunofluorescence antibodies to Legionella pneumophila : frequency in a rural community. J Clin Microbiol 1980; 12:326&hyph;328. 368. Wilkerson HW, Reingold AL, Brake BJ, McGiboney DL, Gorman GW, Broome CV. Reactivity of serum from patients with suspected legionellosis against 29 antigens of Legionellaceae and Legionella -like organisms by indirect immunofluorescence assay. J Infect Dis 1983; 147:23&hyph;31. 369. Nichol KL, Parenti CM, Johnson JE. High prevalence of positive antibodies to Legionella pneumophila among outpatients. Chest 1991; 100:663&hyph;666. 370. Storch G, Hayes PS, Hill DL, Baine W. Prevalence of antibody to Legionella pneumophila in middle-aged and elderly Americans. J Infect Dis 1979; 140:784&hyph;788. 371. Plouffe J, Marston B, Straus W, Breiman R, Hackman B, Moyenuddin M. Utility of diagnostic studies in Legionnaires' disease: Franklin County. Abstracts of the 32nd Interscience Conference on Antimicrobial Agents and Chemotherapy 1992; 817.(abstract) 372. Edelstein PH. The laboratory diagnosis of Legionnaires' disease. Seminars Respir Infect 1987; 2:235&hyph;241. 373. Bridge JA, Edelstein PH. Oropharyngeal colonization with Legionella pneumophila . J Clin Microbiol 1983; 18:1108&hyph;1112. 374. Fukunaga H, Akagi K, Yabuchi E. Asymptomatic infection of Legionella pneumophila in four cases with pulmonary disease in Japanese. Nippon Saikingaku Zasshi 1990; 45:833&hyph;840. 375. Dondero TJ, Rendtorff RC, Mallison GF, et al. An outbreak of Legionnaires' disease associated with a contaminated air-conditioning cooling tower. N Engl J Med 1980; 302:365&hyph;370. 376. Garbe PL, Davis BJ, Weisfield JS, et al. Nosocomial Legionnaires' disease: epidemiologic demonstration of cooling towers as a source. JAMA 1985; 254:521&hyph;524. 377. O'Mahony MC, Stanwell-Smith RE, Tillett HE, et al. The Stafford outbreak of Legionnaires' disease. Epidemiol Infect 1990; 104:361&hyph;380. 378. Mastro TD, Fields BS, Breiman RF, Campbell J, Plikaytis BD, Spika JS. Nosocomial Legionnaires' disease and use of medication nebulizers. J Infect Dis 1991; 163:667&hyph;670. 379. Breiman RF, Fields BS, Sanden G, Volmer L, Meier A, Spika J. An outbreak of Legionnaires' disease associated with shower use: possible role of amoebae. JAMA 1990; 263:2924&hyph;2926. 380. Hanrahan JP, Morse DL, Scharf VB, et al. A community hospital outbreak of Legionellosis: Transmission by potable hot water. Am J Epidemiol 1987; 125:639&hyph;649. 381. Breiman RF, VanLoock FL, Sion JP, et al. Association of ``sink bathing'' and Legionnaires' disease. Abstracts of the 91st Meeting of the American Society for Microbiology 1991; L18.(abstract) 382. Struelens MJ, Maes N, Rost F, et al. Genotypic and phenotypic methods for the investigation of a nosocomial Legionella pneumophila outbreak and efficacy of control measures. J Infect Dis 1992; 166:22&hyph;30.

text:identifi text:instanc text:of text:attack text:on text:human text:by text:african text:killer text:bee
Something was falling from the sky, and the people in Rolling Hills Estates didn't know what to think. Tiny yellowish brown drops splattered cars, houses, people. Birds weren't the problem -- that much they could tell. They looked up and saw airliners. Jet fuel, perhaps? Calls were placed last week to the South Coast Air Quality Management District, but the smog police knew better. This was a case, they said, for Mike Pearson. Mike Pearson is a man who knows bee poop when he sees it. He is the one and only bee inspector in the Los Angeles County agricultural commissioner's office -- a lonely, obscure and potentially dangerous task that the public takes for granted. Even in summer, when such hymenoptera (stinging insects) as honey bees, yellow jackets, wasps, hornets and bumblebees are at their nastiest, people seldom stop and think, gee, I wonder how the county bee inspector is doing today.  His Stature May Rise But soon, Pearson's stature may rise. If predictions come true, the mild-mannered bee inspector will be very much in demand, perhaps even a media darling, a film-at-11 kind of star, for he is the man who would stop the killer bees. "They're coming," Pearson said from behind the net slung over his pith helmet the other day. It is not a matter of if, he said. The Africanized bees -- Pearson prefers their proper name -- have in three decades traveled from South Africa to South America to Mexico. Colonies are expected to arrive in California sometime in 1991. Your back yard, perhaps. . . . A dozen regular old domestic bees buzzed about Pearson's head. "When they do come," he said, "there will be clouds of them around me." The bee-sting death of a 65-year-old farm worker in Fresno County who drove her truck Monday into a set of hives set off alarms among bee inspectors and beekeepers that perhaps the Africanized bees had arrived. Tests later showed that domestic honeybees had stung her an extraordinary 136 times. Unlike most bee-sting deaths, the victim apparently had no allergic reaction, but succumbed to the sheer volume of venom.  Fear Mass Attacks When Africanized bees arrive, more of these sorts of mass attacks are feared. Their venom is no more potent than that of the domestic honey bee; the danger is their hostility -- that something much less than a truck collision will stir their malevolence. Frequent, sensational mention of killer bees in supermarket tabloids -- alongside the usual Elvis sightings -- has perhaps confused the facts about Africanized bees. "There's been a lot of hype," Pearson said. But then, their true story is like bad science fiction, beginning with the work of a certain geneticist in the 1950s. As reported in science journals, a geneticist brought African bees to Brazil in the 1950s, hoping to breed better honey producers than the indigenous variety, an earlier import from Europe. But the African bees -- more hostile than the European variety -- genetically overwhelmed, or "Africanized" their counterparts. The Africanized bees escaped into the wild and earned the nickname "killer" for swarming, sometimes fatal attacks on animals and humans.  Started as Student Pearson, who developed a fascination for bees while he was a student at Cal Poly Pomona, became the county's bee inspector in 1981. He figures that he has been stung about 100 times, including one incident in which he took 15 stings. He developed a fever, but was soon back among the bees. He branched into the killer variety in 1985, when bee inspectors from throughout the state were mobilized after a pocket of Africanized bees had been discovered in an oil field in Lost Hills, near Bakersfield. A dead fox, rabbit and raven were found near their hive. Apparently, the Africanized bees had hitched a ride from South America on a shipment of oil-drilling equipment. The successful eradication effort -- 14 separate colonies were identified and fumigated with no injuries to humans -- makes Pearson optimistic about California's ability to deal with killer bees. At a recent symposium on the Africanized bee menace in San Diego, Pearson said, it was reported that up to 100 human deaths per year have been attributed to the bees in Venezuela alone. But Venezuelans, in some cases, attempted to capture the bees without wearing protective clothing or using proper equipment. Ignorance was the problem, Pearson suggested. "They're not really killers unless they're provoked," he said.  Uses Scented Traps Since the Lost Hills episode, Pearson's killer bee vigil has consisted of checking 13 scented traps set at strategic locations around the county -- the port, major truck routes, an oil field in Signal Hill. So far -- Pearson is a little embarrassed to admit it -- these traps haven't even caught a stray domestic colony. Still, the effort is considered so important that the county Board of Supervisors -- after cutting funding for mental health -- recently backed away from a proposal to cut funds for the Africanized bee detection effort. No politician, apparently, wants to seem pro-killer bee. When they come, Pearson said, his duties will change radically. He envisions a task force of bee inspectors who roam the county, responding to reports of suspicious bee activity. The first detection, he said, will probably be in a hobbyists' back-yard hive. Killer bees are known to attack and take over other hives, he said. "They send out raiding parties and they'll just fight their way in. Their queen will search out the other queen and kill her. A coup d'etat. . . . After a time, they're all Africanized." It could happen to any one of the more than 30,000 domestic hives registered in the county, both commercial operations and those of hobbyists. Eighty of those hives -- perhaps 250,000 individual honeybees -- can be found in Marvin Griffin's back yard in Rancho Palos Verdes. It was Griffin's colonies, the bee inspector determined, that were fouling a certain neighborhood in nearby Rolling Hills Estates.  No Regulations Rancho Palos Verdes, it turns out, has no ordinance to regulate beekeeping. Officials there say they are attempting to abate the nuisance as an illegal commercial enterprise in a residential zone. But Griffin says that won't be necessary; he is now looking to move his hives to three more rural locations in Los Angeles and Kern counties. Griffin, 46, who started his bee hobby 14 months ago with a single hive, is now an avid breeder and a trapper of wild colonies. He hopes to breed an extra-mild bee, he said, to contend with Africanized gene pools. "I love bees," he said. "It's like I finally found my niche in the world." The beekeeper, after being contacted by Pearson, said he was "flabbergasted" when he saw the mess his bees were making. One driveway was so dotted, he said, it looked like a test for color blindness. "It's a hobby," he said, "that went a little wild."

text:what text:ar text:the text:latest text:develop text:in text:robot text:technolog
FOR all the hype over the past 20 years about how robots would transform manufacturing industry, they still remain on the fringes of the industrial scene - with the notable exception of manufacturing in Japan. According to the United Nations Economic Commission for Europe, the world industrial robot population stood at 388,000 units at the end of 1989, of which 220,000 were in Japan, 56,000 in western Europe, 37,000 in the US and -very roughly - 75,000 elsewhere. There are a number of interconnected reasons for this situation. In the past, there has been considerable hostility from trade unions to their introduction and managements have taken a lot of convincing about the cost benefits. Dr Kevin Clarke, manager of manufacturing engineering at PA Consulting Group, says that, in many instances, robots have not delivered the cost effectiveness they have promised. Robot manufacturers, he says, have not developed their products technologically as fast as they might have. 'There's very little innovation, because the market isn't there,' he says. However, the evidence of the past two years suggests that things may be changing. Those 388,000 units represented an increase of 20 per cent from the end of 1988, and in 1990 US-based robotics companies won record new orders of Dollars 517.4m. The robotics industry was in deep gloom during 1986 and 1987, and especially in the US where it had become far too dependent on the motor industry - which took about 40 to 50 per cent of sales. Mr Donald Vincent, executive vice-president of the US Robotic Industries Association, recalls that 'when the automotive industry quit buying in 1986 and 1987, it sent robotics into a deep spin.' This decline had two results. First, it encouraged a much-needed concentration among robot producers. In the middle of the 1980s there were some 300, according to the International Federation of Robotics (IFR). Now, it says, there are probably fewer than 100 true producers, led by ABB Robotics, part of the Swiss-Swedish Asea Brown Boveri, GMF Robotics, a joint venture between Fanuc of Japan and General Motors of the US, and Yaskawa of Japan. Secondly, the downturn prompted an urgent search for new applications for robots away from the motor industry and its inherent cyclicality. Dr Clarke singles out 'clean room' applications for robots in health care and precision engineering, while Mr Vincent is hopeful of new applications in the food industry, materials handling and packaging. The wellspring for this diversification into new markets, which has already begun, is computer power. In mechanical terms, robots are relatively simple beasts, and robotic technology has always been based on the use of computers to overcome mechanical limitations. Mr Kenneth Waldron, a robotics expert at Ohio State University, says 'the major theme which will direct commercial applications of new research in robotics will be that of taking advantage of the huge increases in computing power which have become available as a result of the development of advanced microprocessors.' Mr Waldron notes that most current industrial robot systems offer only incremental improvements over what was possible with the first generation of microcomputer controllers. Current research is looking at areas such as greater use of sensing - of the robot's environment and internal state - more sophisticated control techniques offering greater speed and accuracy, robotic mobility and improved control of the interface between the robot and the workpiece. Given these trends, there has inevitably been considerable interest in industrial vision systems for robots, which could radically change many applications, particularly in assembly where robots have so far failed to make their mark. Previous forecasts for the population of vision-equipped robots have not been realised, but it is reasonable to predict, as the IFR has, that the continuous reduction in prices of computers and sensors, and their greater speed and reliability, will gradually remove the technological and economic barriers. Many of the business trends in robotics over the past few years are illustrated by developments at ABB Robotics, which claims to be the world's biggest supplier - a title which the Japanese manufacturers might dispute. ABB's purchase last year of Cincinnati Milacron's robotics business was an important step in the consolidation of the industry around leading European and Japanese suppliers. Mr Stelio Demark, head of ABB Robotics, says the Cincinnati business brought with it a tremendous US customer base and undoubted expertise in spot-welding robotics. The nature of ABB's customer base has also been changing, and over the past five years it has reduced its dependence on the automotive industry from 70-75 per cent of sales to 50 per cent. ABB is attracting new business from small and medium-sized companies which had previously not bought robots. 'We may be supplying ones and twos, but it's growing very quickly,' says Mr Demark. New markets include glass making, different kinds of process applications, and palletising. This effort is backed up by spending on research and development - 10 per cent of revenues - that is almost on a par with that of the pharmaceutical industry. Meanwhile the falling cost of electronics is allowing ABB to build more capability and flexibility into its robots. ABB's latest product, the IRB 6000, was officially launched last month with claims of much greater flexibility and capability than rival products. Because of these developments, Mr Demark is optimistic about future growth prospects for ABB and the industry. The view is shared by independent observers. In a report about to be published by Frost & Sullivan, the international market research publishers, total world robot sales are forecast to rise from Dollars 2.15bn in 1990 to Dollars 3.41bn in 1996. The relatively small size of the industry at the end of the 1980s is a reflection of many of the factors mentioned above. F & S sees the Japanese market's share of world robot sales falling from 65 per cent last year to 45 per cent in 1996, while Europe's share will rise from 15 to 20 per cent, the US will mark time at about 6 per cent and the rest of the world will jump from 14 per cent to just under 30 per cent. The biggest growth area is Asia, which is good news for the Japanese producers, but Europe, says Mr Demark, is also 'very interesting,' and the company's home base. F & S sees the European market rising from Dollars 330m in 1990 to Dollars 687m in 1996, with Germany leading the way. Looking specifically at the European market, F & S comments that the 'supplier capable of marketing a complete package including sensors, user-friendly software and simple training and installation will achieve the best sales penetration.' ABB is probably justified in claiming that it offers more service and support to European buyers than the more product-based approach of the Japanese, but Dr Clarke wonders whether this will still be true in two years' time. On the other hand Europe, he says, is probably not one of the Japanese producers' priorities, given the better growth prospects in the Asia Pacific region. As for the balance of power in the industry, both ABB and the Japanese are growing stronger, the big producers are getting bigger, and the smaller robotics companies, particularly in the US and UK, are concentrating on niches and ancillary services. If the big producers can keep up with development in computing, the 1990s could well bring the rewards that proved so elusive for much fo the 1980s.

text:do text:polic text:depart text:us text:profil text:to text:stop text:motorist
A woman motorist driving alone near the Pomona Freeway escaped unhurt after she was pulled over early Monday by a man posing as a police officer, bringing to seven the number of similar incidents reported recently in the eastern San Gabriel Valley and Pico Rivera, authorities said. Six of the incidents occurred in the last two days, with the earliest known episode in the string of attacks taking place July 1, sheriff's deputies said. The most recent incident occurred in Pico Rivera about 4:45 a.m. Monday, capping a weekend in which an impostor either robbed, battered or attempted to sexually assault five other women motorists. In the latest incident, as in the others, the assailant wore a security guard-type uniform and used a white spotlight to stop a 33-year-old woman driving on the San Gabriel River Parkway near Rose Hills Memorial Park. He fled, however, when she questioned him about his car, which has been described as a dark, possibly rust-colored, Pinto or Datsun.  'Question Him' "That's the thing to do -- question him," Sheriff's Deputy Hal Grant said. "Don't submit." On Monday, deputies reported an assault on July 1 that they believe is connected to the string of other attacks. In that case, a 22-year-old Hacienda Heights woman was pulled over in Pico Rivera and was punched in the face by a man wearing what appeared to be a police uniform. Officers advised women drivers not to stop in dark, remote areas if they are uncertain who is signaling them to pull over -- even if the pursuer is a peace officer. The motorist should continue "at a reasonable speed for a reasonable distance to a well-lighted, populated area," Sheriff's Deputy Pat Hunter said. "There will be no ramifications about continuing on for a short distance," he said. Motorists were also cautioned not to stop for anyone signaling with a white spotlight. Most law enforcement agencies use either a solid red or flashing red light, police said. "It's got to be a red light, not yellow or blue or white," Cmdr. John Distelrath of the West Covina Police Department said. "For God's sake, don't stop for anything else." Police said the assailant in all the incidents has been dressed in a dark uniform, with a dark cap and a jacket bearing a badge-like emblem.  Composite Drawing A composite sketch prepared Monday from descriptions given by the victims showed a white man in his 20s, about 6 feet tall, 165 pounds, with light-colored, curly, shoulder-length hair and a sparse mustache. In all the assaults, the impostor has followed the victims until he was sure they were driving alone, officers said. Then, using a white spotlight mounted on his car, the assailant has signaled the women to pull over, after which he demanded to see their driver's licenses. The weekend incidents occurred near the Pomona Freeway in Hacienda Heights, Rowland Heights and West Covina. The assailant attempted to rape two of the women and pushed one of them down a 30-foot embankment. But he fled when the women fought back. Another woman was robbed at knifepoint of the $100 she said was in her wallet. The impostor aimed tear gas spray at another of the women. In addition, another victim was struck four times in the face with a flashlight. She required medical treatment but was not hospitalized, police said. A suspect who matched the description and worked as a security guard was detained briefly on Sunday by sheriff's deputies and West Covina police but was released when none of the victims could positively identify a photo of him, officers said.

text:is text:there text:contemporari text:interest text:in text:the text:greek text:philosophi text:of text:stoicism
Working from his home above the UC Berkeley campus, Gregory Vlastos looks out across the San Francisco Bay as its morning fog drifts toward the city famous for its precipitous slopes. But the philosopher's thoughts are wandering through another renowned hilltop metropolis, that of ancient Athens, itself much obscured by nearly 2 1/2 milleniums of history. Internationally eminent as a historian of ancient Greek philosophy, Vlastos, who recently turned 83, has pioneered current thinking about one of the city-state's most illustrious citizens, Socrates. Roaming the marketplace in his well-worn coat, button-holing merchants and youths with his insistent questions, Socrates "brought philosophy from heaven to earth," in the acclaimed words of the Roman orator, Cicero. At a time when other thinkers were either speculating on the nature of the cosmos or cultivating the esoterica of metaphysics, Socrates began his analyses of human conduct, and in so doing helped to lay the philosophical foundation of Western culture. Vlastos, who is also Greek, has spent more than 30 years patiently striving to better understand the ideas of his countryman, whose life spanned 70 years from approximately 470 to 399 BC. The fruits of his labors are now twofold: Last month the octogenarian philosopher became the recipient of a $375,000 MacArthur Foundation Fellowship, awarded for creative endeavors by the John D. and Catherine T. MacArthur Foundation, and, in the process, tied two former winners for the record of oldest honoree. In addition, next spring, his scholarly exploration will culminate in the publication of his book, "Socrates, Ironist and Moral Philosopher" (Cornell University Press and Cambridge University Press in England). According to specialists in ancient Greek philosophy, Vlastos, like Socrates, has done much to humanize the field at a time when emphasis is being placed on the logical validity of arguments rather than the substance of thought. "He has shown that philosophy can speak with a public voice and address problems that are of concern to everyone," says Alexander Nehamus, professor of philosophy at Princeton University and a former student of Vlastos. Along with British philosopher, G.E.L. Owen, Vlastos, says Nehamus, "established Greek philosophy as a serious field of study in America." Previously, "philosophy in America was unhistorical," and concerned more with solving contemporary problems. Vlastos showed there was relevance in the solution of problems bequeathed by ancient philosophers, he says. In the 1950s, Vlastos formed the generally accepted view of Socrates as a negative thinker who pointed out contradictions in other people's thinking, says Nehamus. His new book, he believes, "is going to change the way Socrates is being seen within philosophy. It's Vlastos revising Vlastos, but at the same time it's Vlastos revising common sense, because what he thought about Socrates for the past 30 years came to be what everybody thought about Socrates." Vlastos, who regrets that scholars have come to depict Socrates as a dull moralist, now presents a dynamic positive figure whose views had a charismatic influence on the youth of his time and have an immediate relationship to our own. In the late 20th Century he would be a brilliant debunker of hocus-pocus in issues of public morality. "We could use a whole platoon of people like Socrates," says Vlastos, who bears on his cane to ease himself into a living room chair. Suffering from bone cancer, which has left him frail, he nonetheless speaks forcefully, with the sort of fearless assertions and brisk ironic gusts of humor that are said to have characterized Socrates. "The most important single thing about Socrates is his insistence on clear thinking," says Vlastos. "There's a tremendous amount of fuzzy thinking today, particularly on the topic of morals, which allows ecclesiastical dogmas to be slipped in on us, like the questions of contraception and abortion." Vlastos, who attacks anti-abortion arguments with alacrity, finds "the idea that a fertilized ovum, within a day of its fertilization, is a person is simply absurd." Compounding the wrongness of reasoning, he says, is the fact that this dogma has been foisted off on a nation whose constitution proclaims the separation of church and State. "Socrates would have had a field day pointing out these absurdities," he declares. As the critic of the public conscience, Socrates, says Vlastos, would have a plateful of issues on which to speak: * Donald Trump: "He would really press him as to whether he can find happiness by piling up endless quantities of money and possessions." * The slashing of funds from social services and concurrent support for military defense: "The only way we apply modern technology, which can produce unlimited quantities of wealth, is by running into military crises and then diverting vast amounts of money to the production of 'illth,' which is the opposite of wealth." * The ethics of the Ronald Reagan era: "He was a great joker. . . . He had no compassion for others less fortunate than himself. "These are the kinds of questions Socrates loved to address," Vlastos states, "the problems which real human beings have to face in real life." Furthermore, the media would give him the opportunity to reach an audience of millions, rather than a scattering of individuals. "Socrates would be a prime subject for TV talk shows," says Vlastos. "He had something of substance to say and he would say it with wit and irony and fearlessness." The most important moral lesson that Socrates taught, and one to which Socratic students have not previously given proper attention, Vlastos believes, is his rejection of the principle of retaliation. "An eye for an eye and a tooth for a tooth was a very well-established principle of morality in Greece," he says, "far stronger" than it is in today's society, with Greeks commonly supplicating the gods to take vengeance on their foes. Yet Socrates held that "if your only reason for hurting someone is that that person did a nasty thing to you, that is totally unjustified," Vlastos says. "This is the principle that wrought havoc in the ancient world," setting Athens and Sparta in a nearly 30-year war of retaliation. Similarly, it was to refute the principle of retaliation that Socrates, who was sentenced to death for impiety and the corruption of the city's youth, chose to drink the poisonous hemlock, the state's method of inflicting death, rather than accepting the escape from prison that his friends had prepared. "The argument that was made to him was 'the Athenians have done you dirt. They've condemned you unjustly. So you should feel free to do whatever is most advantageous to your personal safety,' " says Vlastos. Instead, Socrates obeyed the lawful punishment of the city, which, he recognized, had allowed him the freedom to question traditional platitudes for most of his life, a freedom he would not have enjoyed in Sparta. It is such an act of integrity that separates Socrates from American notables of our day, Vlastos thinks. Although there are some celebrated thinkers, he finds, "people with true integrity are quite rare in our society. I can't think of a contemporary Socrates." His style was in diametrical opposition to popular contemporary celebrities. Considered ugly by Greek standards of aesthetics, he was slightly pop-eyed and snub-nosed with large flaring nostrils (the better to take in fresh air, he would joke, Vlastos says), though as his pupil Plato wrote, he was "all glorious within." And rather than trumpeting his importance, says Vlastos, "he was always running himself down." In some ways, he invented irony, Vlastos says. "He'd come up to you and say, 'Oh, you look like a very wise lady to me. Now what do you think about this and that.' And pretty soon it would appear that your wisdom was a little bit over-rated." He was suspicious of politics, refused to become entangled with wealth, and felt his life's mission, commanded by God, was to examine himself and provoke self-examination among the citizens of Athens. He used language with striking virtuosity, engaging young men in debate on the benches of the city's gymnasia, at the same time that they developed their physical powers. But if Socrates flourished as a conspicuous celebrity, Vlastos points out, it was because he was part and parcel of a society in which intellectual prowess was highly prized. The word and the act of philosophizing, as it is known in Western civilization, are Greek in origin, as is "the idea that fundamental principles are all susceptible to rational criticism -- all of them," Vlastos says. "The Greeks had a much livelier intellect than appears in our young people whose minds are stupefied by TV and other essentially passive entertainments which don't call on them to exert their minds. "The general atmosphere of the age is not critical. In our society we have this success bug." Consequently, Vlastos says, "one adopts the conventional signs of good behavior and becomes very wary of departing from established habits." This, in turn, results in "the fact that people are buffaloed by all these uncritical dogmas," which Vlastos thinks is the source of "so many of our problems today." Vlastos' own critical thought was formed at an early age in the particularly Socratic manner of one-on-one tutoring, which he continues to tout in opposition to classroom instruction. Raised among the Greek minority in a Turkish village on the Bosphorus Sea, he received his schooling from his mother, proving its efficacy by entering Istanbul's (then Constantinople) American-run Robert College at the age of 14. Graduating three years later, he left to study for the Congregational ministry on a fellowship at the Chicago Theological Seminary. For a summer he served as pastor in the hamlet of Beverly, Mass., before earning a doctorate in philosophy at Harvard University and opting for a life studying secular morality. Devoting so many years to the examination of Socrates' thoughts has greatly influenced his own life, Vlastos says. "You can't help it, living with a man like that who is a person of complete integrity." Like Socrates, he has spent much of his life teaching, influencing the thoughts of two generations of students. A professor of philosophy at Princeton University for 21 years, he retired in 1976 and became professor emeritus at UC Berkeley, leaving that post three years ago. He has also been a visiting professor at St. Andrews University in Scotland and Cambridge University, England, where he was awarded an honorary Doctor of Letters degree. He has also achieved a Socratic moderation in his life, which he partially credits for his longevity. "That's one reason I've lived to my present age," he says, musing that he has presently outlived Socrates by 13 years. Having survived his wife (he has a daughter in Alhambra and a son in Iowa), he spends most of his time in his secluded hillside house, which he finds conducive to thought. Since his illness, however, days of strenuous work have given way to three hours of morning writing. He has been working on his book for a dozen years. "I'm very pleased I finished it," he says, allowing himself a modest measure of self-satisfaction. "I thought my illness would finish me off before I finished the book. But I won, and now I hope to write a second volume."

text:what text:is text:the text:state text:of text:the text:economi text:of text:estonia
Language: Russian Article Type:CSO [Article by Sergey Trifonov, chief specialist of the Ministry of Finance, and Yaroslav Tolstikov, journalist: "Investment in the Economies of Estonia and Russia: What Is Behind the Numbers?"] [Text] We continue the publication of a series of articles on the comparative economic situation in Estonia and Russia prepared by Sergey Trifonov, chief specialist of the Ministry of Finance, and Yaroslav Tolstikov, journalist. For the previous publications, see the issues of our newspaper for 22 and 29 December 1993. Investment in the economy of the country, that is, making outlays for its development, means laying a foundation for the future prosperity of society. The growth of investment means drawing closer to a such a future; slowing investment down means eating away at our own potential, eating away at our own selves. What is the investment situation in the economy of Estonia today? We must note, first, that we lack any kind of clear-cut statistical base with regard to all sectors. Why do we lack it? It is impossible to gather the necessary data all at once for the tens of thousands of enterprises, mostly small and medium-size ones, and analyze all of them to see what kinds of processes are developing there. However, we can discuss estimates. So, the total volume of investment in the economy of Estonia in nine months of 1993 came to about 2 billion kroons and, in comparable prices, remained at the level of the corresponding period of 1992. Under our circumstances, this is a positive note. Investment on the whole did not decrease, although it did not grow either, while we know how difficult the period is our society is now going through. The enterprises themselves have a bare minimum of funds for investment, and this is well known. It is no accident that under the circumstances we are placing our bets on foreign investment, on luring foreign investors to Estonia. We clearly lack our own capital. However, in this instance the numbers are quite contradictory. There are statistical data, but they take into account only foreign investment as of the moment of the establishment of a given joint venture or foreign enterprise. This is their original contribution, and it is reflected by statistics. However, current contributions to already operating joint ventures or foreign enterprises, or the same enterprises established earlier, do not show up in the statistics. According to statistical data, the following quite approximate picture emerges. As of the end of the first quarter of 1993, the volume of foreign investment came to just 2.2 billion kroons, and by the end of the third quarter, had increased to 2.5 billion kroons. That is to say, the total volume of investment during the year, as has already been noted, remained at the same level--2.2 billion kroons during the year, but the share of foreign investors increased. How are these numbers to be evaluated? There is a council of experts at the Institute for the Study of Trends. This council believes that the course of the investment process is unsatisfactory; there is little investment, more is necessary. However, this is after all a maximalist approach. We wish well, but realistic potential must be taken into account, too. It is good in and of itself that we are registering a continuous growth of foreign investment, although of course more can be desired. It is also necessary to note that at present only one-fourth of all investment goes to industry, and the rest goes to other sectors. In other words, a process of structural changes in the economy is underway. Indeed, industry used to be the sector that got investment first. Foreign investors now understand that this is not the best investment there is, and are investing in the service and trade sectors. Therefore, structural changes in the economy occur in our country under the influence of foreign capital, among other things. Statistical data indicate that during the nine months of 1993 foreign investment came to 625 million kroons, of which 208 million kroons were in the third quarter. In turn, according to the balance of payments, that is, data from the Bank of Estonia, it turns out that in the nine months of 1993 foreign investment came to 1.5 billion kroons. We have already said which data show up in the statistics and which do not. The discrepancy results precisely from this. Therefore, the data of the Bank of Estonia should be considered closer to the truth. Who precisely are the largest foreign investors? They are companies from Sweden and Finland. The volume of investment by Russia keeps decreasing. In the third quarter of 1993 Russia merely ranked seventh, with a volume of investment of 8 million kroons. Data on investment in its own economy are published in Russia accurately, quarter after quarter. Naturally, the high rate of inflation hampers foreign investors, and a drop in the volume is being registered. Nonetheless, the level of investment remains quite high. Thus in the first quarter of 1993 the volume of investment came to 97 percent compared to the corresponding period of 1992, and in the third quarter--93 percent. The total volume of foreign investment in Russia came to $7 billion as of the end of the second quarter of 1993. Germany and the United States are the main investors. If we compare the per capita volumes of foreign investment in Russia and in our country (based on statistical data), we will obtain $46 for Russia and $115 for Estonia in the first half of 1993. Here are a few more numbers. In Russia the number of joint ventures comes to 7,000, and in Estonia--4,000. These are absolute numbers, and they speak volumes. At present Estonia amounts to a more attractive bridgehead for foreign investors than Russia.

text:what text:measur text:have text:been text:taken text:worldwid text:and text:what text:countri text:have text:been text:effect text:in text:curb text:popul text:growth
According to United Nations forecasts, the population of the world is likely to double - to more than 10bn people - by the middle of the next century. This will be one of the biggest forces shaping living standards of future generations. Although growth will take place almost entirely in developing countries, few countries will be able to insulate themselves from the effects. However, population growth was a taboo topic at the Rio Earth Summit in 1992, although it is the source of increasing pressure on natural resources and the environment in many regions. Governments felt that the sensitivity of the issue was so great - provoking debates about differing cultural and religious values - that it would frustrate attempts to reach agreement on other fronts. Even at the time of the summit the omission appeared a serious weakness, as Prince Charles pointed out. In retrospect, that is clearly true. Although countries put their names to Rio's two treaties on climate change and bio-diversity (the variety of the world's wildlife), many have found difficulty in drawing up realistic plans for curbing environmental damage. The omission has also allowed the notion of 'sustainable development' to remain confused. That principle, which governments attending Rio pledged to observe, does not define whether resources are to be preserved at a certain level for each person or simply for each country. Countries with rapidly growing populations will find it almost impossible to preserve resources - however defined - on a per capita basis. But although the projected increase in the world's population is formidably large, it is much less than many people feared two decades ago. Prominent among 1970s doomsters, the Club of Rome (an international group of industrialists, scientists, economists and statesmen) predicted that food, energy and raw materials would run out. Since then, food production has increased while population has slowed. The drop in the birth rate in many countries now looks like one of the development successes of the past two decades. Many Asian and Latin American countries have had particular success in bringing down the rate of population growth. India, for example, now has a fertility rate - the average number of children per woman implied by the current birth rate - of about four. That figure shows a fall of about one third over the past two decades - although still higher than the figure of just over two children per woman which would maintain a static population. However, across much of sub-Saharan Africa, fertility rates have been running at more than six children per woman. Demographers studying why some countries have had more success than others point out that there is no straightforward formula to apply. Longstanding assumptions that as a country develops, its birth rate falls, fail to explain some of the patterns now observed. Sri Lanka, Thailand, Bulgaria and Kerala in India have all shown sharp falls in family size despite relatively low prosperity, while the Gulf states have maintained fertility rates of more than three children per woman during a period of fast economic growth. Instead, demographers are having to put together a more complex picture, in which access to contraception, the level of female education and the availability of jobs for women all play a part. There has also been international concern about the measures sometimes employed to restrain birth rates, particularly in China, which has fiercely applied limits on family size. The scale of China's problem is undeniable: China now has nearly a quarter of the world's population on about 7 per cent of the world's arable land. According to government figures this year, the fertility rate has fallen to about 1.9 from 2.25 children per woman in 1990. That is nearly as low as western European and US rates, and less than half that of India. But the measures used by the Chinese government - including limiting urban families to one child - have provoked criticism that the Chinese government is infringing human rights. Despite those qualifications, the falls in many countries' birth rates have outstripped expectations. But demographers and environmentalists warn against complacency, even if the doom-mongers have not been proved right. They point out that even at current rates, population growth will still put severe pressures on natural resources and on the quality of the environment. They also argue that the ageing of the populations in industrialised countries and the steady fall in the average age of the population in developing countries will bring further pressures. Children under 15 years old currently outnumber the elderly by one third in Europe and North America. But pensioners will soon outnumber children in Europe and North America for the first time, the United Nations Population Fund (UNFPA) has said. Mr David Coleman, a demographer at Oxford University, says that environmental degradation, pressure on resources and the search for jobs will cause industrialised countries to be confronted with an unprecedented influx of immigrants from poorer countries. Mrs Nafis Sadik, director of UNFPA, has also warned of these pressures - even taking account only those who have already been born. More than 2m immigrants are believed to have entered both Europe and North America over the past two years alone. So far, Poland, Hungary and Czechoslovakia have taken the brunt of Russians, gypsies and Romanians from the east, but political chaos in Russia could intensify westward migration. Governments and international agencies for aid, development and the environment may still be coy about addressing issues of curbing population growth. But they will increasingly find the subject unavoidable. Worries about consumption of resources and degradation of the environment are well-established. But migration may be the factor which finally makes countries worldwide - industrialised as well as developing - face these questions.

text:what text:ar text:the text:caus text:of text:railwai text:accid text:throughout text:the text:world
CSO [By own correspondent Li Jianlin (2621 1696 2651): "Statistical Bureau, Ministry of Labor Publish Report on the Development of Labor Affairs During 1993"] [Text] Today, the Statistical Bureau and the Ministry of Labor published a joint report on the development of labor affairs during 1993. The report indicates that new achievements have been accomplished in three aspects of the reform of labor affairs, namely in the further promotion of labor, in wages, and in social security, with key concern having been given to the nurturing and development of manpower markets. In 1993, the nation's entire manpower resource amounted to 820 million persons, and the number of employed was 605.9 million, which was 11.58 million more than in the preceding year. The total number of persons requiring employment in all the urban areas of the nation was 11.47 million. Of these, 7.05 million were placed throughout the year, leaving 4.2 million still unemployed, thus giving an unemployment rate of 2.6 percent. Reform of the labor system toward one in which labor contracts signed by all staff and workers would constitute the major component of labor relations was widely extended beyond the experiments of the past. By the end of 1993, a total of 5.5 million staff and workers in state-owned and collective-owned enterprises throughout the nation had participated in the reform of the labor system, and 3.5 million of these had become staff and workers on the labor contract system, making up 31 percent of all enterprise staff and workers. Salaries and wages were further raised. In 1993, total salaries and wages paid to staff and workers throughout the urban areas of the nation amounted to 477 billion yuan, which was 21.1 percent more than in the preceding year. Average staff-worker pay was 3,236 yuan, a 19.4 percent increase over the preceding year, but taking the commodity price inflation factor into account, the actual average salary-wage increase was 2.8 percent. Among these, the average salary-wage of staff and workers in state-owned units was 3,441 yuan, an increase of 19.6 percent. The report reveals that in 1993 China made considerable progress in providing social security. During 1993, a total of 46.1 billion yuan had been paid into the social security fund (not including the portion taken care of by the systems themselves) and 41.9 billion yuan had been paid out, as 28.8 billion yuan were carried forward as balance (including purchases of special government bonds). In these figures, 44 billion yuan were paid into the basic old-age insurance fund, which paid out 40.8 billion yuan, and 24.5 billion yuan were brought forward as balance. By the end of 1993, 618 cities and counties had instituted reforms toward an old-age pension scheme, involving 25 million staff and workers in state-owned enterprises. The scope to which society as a whole takes charge of retirement expenses was further extended. Up to the end of 1993, 13 provinces, autonomous regions, and centrally controlled municipalities had already instituted a system of taking charge of retirement expenditure unifiedly at the provincial level. As to cities and counties taking charge unifiedly of retirement expenditure, apart from the state-owned enterprises which throughout the nation had already instituted the system of having cities and counties unifiedly taking charge of retirement expenditure, there have been 1,927 other cities and counties that had begun to have society take charge of retirement expenditure for collective-run enterprises in the urban areas, an increase of 168, compared with the preceding year. Throughout the country, 73.36 million staff and workers and 16.28 retired personnel of 590,000 enterprises of various kinds are participating in the system of having society unifiedly take charge of retirement expenditure. At the same time, a further 3,100 enterprises have instituted subsidiary old-age insurance, involving 500,000 staff and workers; 6,000 enterprises have instituted old-age insurance in the nature of savings accounts, involving as many as 700,000 persons. Beyond that, as a convenience for the vast number of retired personnel, social encumbrances of enterprises have been lightened, and throughout the country there are already 1,000 cities and counties that have instituted systems of having banks or social security organs issue pensions. Experiments have been speeded up with reforms toward a system of insurance against work-related accidents. Throughout the country, 500 cities and counties in 19 provinces, autonomous regions, and centrally controlled municipalities with a total population of 11 million are participating in the reform toward insurance against work-related accidents. Central management and regulated initiation of a fund for insurance against work-related accidents has initially been started, employing a system of differential and flexible rates, thereby promoting the safety of ongoing production in enterprises. The reform toward a system of medical insurance has been further pursued. Throughout the country, 2.6 million staff and workers in 221 cities and counties are already participating in systems of having society unifiedly take care of medical expenditure for employees and workers, and 2.8 million retirees in 134 cities and counties are under a system of having their medical expenses taken care of unifiedly. The scope and cover of unemployment insurance has been further expanded, and the system is being gradually perfected. Up to the end of 1993, 532,000 enterprises with a staff and workers establishment of 79.24 million are participating in unemployment insurance. In 1993, 1.63 billion yuan had been raised as unemployment insurance fund, and 930 million yuan have been paid out as unemployment relief, medical expenses during periods of unemployment, retraining fees, and as expenditure to help unemployed take up productive activities. The agencies in charge of labor affairs have provided unemployment relief all over the country to 1.03 million unemployed, and have thereby effectively contributed to social stability. New progress has also been made in the reform toward a system of maternity insurance. Up to the end of 1993, 268 cities and counties -- 170 more than in the preceding year -- had instituted maternity insurance for their female employees and workers, involving 5.5 million staff and workers. This reform adjusts to a certain extent the burden of maternity insurance as between the enterprises and promotes employment of women. Nationwide expenditure for insurance and welfare has been further increased. In 1993, total nationwide expenditure for insurance and welfare amounted to 165.82 billion yuan, an increase of 35.79 billion yuan -- or 27.5 percent -- over the preceding year. At the end of the year, the number of retirees throughout the nation was 27,497,000, and pensions amounted to 90.17 billion yuan, which was 31.5 percent more than in the preceding year. (Figures for retirees and pensions do not include any proportion of civil administration departments.) During 1993, the factory safety situation was grim, as there was a large increase in the number of accidents and in the number of injured and killed personnel during the year, which indeed must attract serious attention. Nationwide, work-related accidents caused the death of 19,798 enterprise staff and workers, an increase of 18.5 percent over the preceding year. Of these accidents, 616 had been serious accidents that caused the death of three or more persons in the same accident. In these accidents 3,819 persons have been killed, and the number of such accidents and the number of killed had increased 0.2 and 3.8 percent, respectively, compared with the preceding year. During 1993, road and traffic accidents nationwide kept occurring at a high rate without diminishing. The number of traffic accidents during the year had been 242,343, with 65,508 persons killed and 142,251 persons injured, and with a direct economic loss of 1 billion yuan. During 1993, there had been 38,094 conflagrations throughout the country, causing the death of 2,467 persons, which was 27.4 percent more than in the preceding year. They caused economic losses amounted to 1.12 billion yuan (not including forest fires), which was an increase of 62.3 percent over the preceding year. During 1993, 3,175 accidents of railway trains in motion had occurred nationwide, causing 46,781,000 yuan of direct economic losses, 9.2 percent less than in the preceding year. During the year, 2,430 serious accidents had occurred on the railway trains themselves, killing 181 persons, an increase of 38 percent, and 16,353 serious accidents outside the railway tracks, killing 9,989 persons, an increase of 10 percent over the preceding year. During 1993, 2,008 accidents occurred in shipping enterprises under the Ministry of Communications, on cargo boats belonging to local transport departments, on cargo boats of villages and townships, and on ferries, i.e., accidents of a kind more serious than the common shipping accidents, a decline of 18.4 percent compared to the preceding year. They killed 557 persons, which is about the same number as in the preceding year, and 37 of the boats or ships involved sank, which was a decline of 2.3 percent, compared to the preceding year, while economic losses were 147 million yuan, an increase of 13.2 percent over the preceding year. During 1993, there had been nationwide three first-grade accidents and two second-grade accidents of China Airways, and there had been two first-grade air accidents and two second-grade air accidents in general aviation. With the intensified reform of the labor system, the system of settling labor disputes has been gradually perfected. In 1993, the labor dispute arbitration committees at all levels handled 12,658 labor disputes, an increase of 51.6 percent over the preceding year, and involving 34,794 employees and workers, an increase of 99.8 percent over the preceding year.

text:what text:ha text:been text:the text:experi text:of text:residenti text:util text:custom text:follow text:deregul text:of text:ga text:and text:electr
Pacific Gas and Electric's carefully laid plans for management succession called for Stanley Skinner, president and chief operating officer, to take over as chief executive a year from now, writes Louise Kehoe. Instead, Skinner will move into the top job at America's biggest power utility next month. By accelerating its plans, PG&E aims to give its new chief executive a head start on what may be one of the most difficult periods in the history of the company as California moves to deregulate its electricity supply industry. Skinner, 56, will succeed Richard Clarke, 64, who will remain chairman of the board. 'The next few years will produce greater change than we have seen in the last 10 or 15 years combined,' says Clarke. A recent proposal by the independent California Public Utilities Commission aims to reduce electricity prices by creating a competitive market. The plan calls for all electricity users in the state, including residential customers, to be allowed to buy electricity from the supplier of their choice by the year 2002. It also establishes a streamlined, performance-based rate-setting system. PG&E, which has long operated its electricity supply operations as a regulated monopoly in many parts of California, is about to go through the same kind of upheaval that has reshaped the US telecommunications industry over the past decade. Skinner will play a pioneering role in managing the transition to deregulation in the US electricity industry. California's plans for deregulation of energy utilities are advanced, and other states are expected to follow its lead.

text:what text:countri text:ar text:experienc text:an text:increas text:in text:tourism
CSO [Interview with Minister of Tourism Dr. Mamduh al-Biltaji, by Sa'id Shalash in Cairo; date not given--first two paragraphs are AL-MAJALLAH introduction] [Text] When Egypt's political leadership selected Dr. Mamduh al-Biltaji, the Public Information Authority chairman, to be appointed minister of tourism in Dr. 'Atif Sidqi's latest cabinet, some people wondered about the connection with tourism of a man who has spent his entire life in the information field. For tourism to be successful, it has to be managed by an economist. Those who hold this opinion are justified, especially since Dr. al-Biltaji has assumed responsibility of the Ministry of Tourism after one of the most successful ministers of Dr. 'Atif Sidqi's cabinet, namely Minister Fu'ad Sultan who was able to realize for Egypt a revenue of $2.5 billion from tourism in 1992. Minister Sultan encouraged the private sector to invest in tourism, thus giving it a great boost. He was also the first man to call for specialization in the tourism sector. Sultan is a well-known banker who is acknowledged for his capability. What many do not know is that the new minister of tourism has a doctorate in economics and another in political science. With his experience in information, Dr. al-Biltaji has mastered the art of dealing with domestic and foreign media people as a result of long years of work (17 years) that have tied him to these people. Such a man is needed now, especially since Egyptian tourism is experiencing a deep crisis that has reduced tourism revenues from $2.5 billion to $2.1 billion. This crisis has resulted from the terrorist acts that have been perpetrated in Egypt. The Western media has played a major role in exaggerating these acts. As a consequence, tourism firms have excluded Egypt from their program for this year. However, there is an $42-million plan to make up for these losses, according to Dr. al-Biltaji. Following is the text of the interview: [Shalash] Since you assumed responsibility of the Egyptian Ministry of Tourism, you have been declaring that this ministry seeks to turn tourism into the locomotive pulling Egypt's development and that you will enhance tourism, which has been in a crisis as a result of two consecutive blows: the Kuwait liberation war and the terrorist acts of the fall and winter of 1992--acts which persist to this day. So, how do you envision accomplishing these goals, and how will tourism become the development locomotive in a country with a population of 60 million people? [al-Biltaji] When I said that tourism is the locomotive that pulls development in Egypt, I was fully aware of what I was saying. I still say the same thing and I work for its implementation. I mean by this that tourism isn't just a railroad car in the development train but the locomotive that pulls the entire train, without replacing any of its cars. The foreign currency revenue basket is supplied by three elements, namely: the Suez Canal, remittances from expatriate workers, and tourism. Tourism possesses characteristics that make it eligible to outdistance and surpass other small elements of foreign revenue, because tourism is an immediately exportable product. Consequently, the element of time is, in this case, immediately embodied economically and financially. In other words, I can export tourism immediately, because the product is ready. This is the first thing. Second, tourism, remittances from expatriate Egyptians, Suez Canal revenues, and oil revenues constitute altogether the four elements of which the big-four assembly consists. The difference is that tourism is not depletable, has no ceiling, and isn't susceptible to labor market fluctuations. Third, tourism is a labor-intensive industry, meaning that one tourist creates work opportunities for 1.7 citizens. There is also the so-called tourism multiplier. This multiplier is a very large group of industries and crafts that develop and grow the more active tourism becomes. Tourism isn't just hotels, restaurants, airplane tickets, and buses, but also an integrated number of industries: moquette, rugs, chinaware, bed covers, tables, spare parts, soap, and detergents. This means laborers, carpenters, boatmen, smelters, plumbers, machinists, drivers, cooks, and employees. [Shalash] What are the true losses that have emanated from the crisis Egyptian tourism is experiencing? [al-Biltaji] Last year, 1993, we lost $1.5 billion. In 1992, revenues were $2.5 billion. Perhaps the serious nature of the terrorist acts and their reverberations in the Western media have intensified the crisis of Egyptian tourism and resulted in a big drop in the demand for Egyptian tourist sites. This crisis has motivated some tour organizers and international tourist firms to exclude Egypt from their marketing programs. If demand continues to be low, Egypt will continue to be excluded from international marketing programs (group tours), and this would harbor serious harbingers of future demand, and even of future investment in the Egyptian tourism sector. Subsequently, the other sectors tied to the tourism sector, such as vocational, industrial, commercial, and banking activities, will also be affected. [Shalash] What is your plan to boost tourism in the coming phase under the canopy of attacks that continue to be committed against tourists in Upper Egypt? [al-Biltaji] Terrorist acts against tourists are few if compared with other countries where similar incidents occur. To date, only three tourists have been hurt. I blame the Western media, but not all of them, for the way they describe the incidents. I have actually met with foreign reporters in Egypt and explained to them the dimensions of what has happened. There is a demand on the international media to make the scoop and to be the front runner in reporting developments. If information isn't supplied to the media, they will gather it from any source that may misinterpret the information and may misdirect it. Every media person has an urgent need for information, and one can either provide him with the information or he will gather it any way he can. The plan to boost tourism that we have drafted for 1994 is based on increasing demand and on promoting the investment and development opportunities in our tourist areas. The plan also offers projects in these area to likely investors all over the world, meaning that it promotes the demand side and exerts efforts for the supply side in the tourism equation. The plan devotes concerted attention to boosting demand in six major international markets that export tourists to Egypt, namely the United States, Germany, Italy, France, and Japan [no sixth market mentioned]. [Shalash] What is this plan's total budget? [al-Biltaji] It is estimated at $42 million. [Shalash] How will this sum be secured? [al-Biltaji] From the state's public treasury, the Tourism Fund, and the private tourism sector. The government has actually agreed to supply the full sum, and implementation of the plan has already started. By the end of 1994, the plan seeks to achieve the peak revenue of 1992, i.e., $2.1 billion instead of the $1.3 billion achieved in 1993. [Shalash] What will be the focus of activity in the targeted markets? [al-Biltaji] To amend Egypt's image; to put terrorist acts within their correct context and dimensions; to appeal to the consumer directly through television and through specialized and unspecialized major press and news agencies; to strengthen the bond with conventional channels of distribution, such as tour organizers, travel agents, incentive-offering houses, conference organizers, and airline associations and companies; to enhance the standard of materials used to boost sales; to implement a program to market the Egyptian tourist product; to utilize the system of tourist convoys; to participate in international conferences; to draft a well-studied program to invite leaders in the field of tourism; and to establish a mechanism for periodic followup. [Shalash] Where does Arab tourism fall on the Egyptian tourism-boosting map? Has Arab tourism been affected by the latest terrorist acts, and has the Arab media performed the same role performed by some Western media? [al-Biltaji] The Arab market has its special characteristic and it is an important market in exporting tourists to Egypt. The plan takes into account the need to exert concerted efforts in this market, using the proper instruments, such as tourist convoys and host programs. The plan also takes into account intensified contacts with official and professional circles and increased reliance on the satellite television channel and on Egyptian radio and press. At the same time, the plan disregards some high-cost promotion instruments, such as television commercials, press advertisements, and tourism-promotion offices. This is why we have decided to shut down the Egyptian Tourism Office in Kuwait. Arab tourism to Egypt represents 40 percent of the international tourist traffic coming into our country. The effect on Arab tourism has been slight when compared to the drop in other markets. The Egyptian minister asserted that the importance of Arab tourism to Egypt surpasses economic and social considerations. Tourism is a main element that bolsters solidarity and understanding, and "we urge Egyptian citizens to go for tourism in the Arab countries, because an Arab tourist in Egypt and an Egyptian tourist in the Arab world is a citizen primarily. An Arab tourist in Egypt is a first-class citizen and a tourist who comes to his history and his environment and who deals with a society that favors and welcomes him. As for the Arab media, they have been committed to the truth since the start of the terrorist acts, except for a few. I meet with Arab reporters in Cairo, and I have been tied to them by good relations, since I was head of the Information Authority throughout recent years. [Shalash] You have signed an agreement with Israel and Turkey to establish the East Mediterranean Tourism Organization. But there are fears that Israel will deal a blow to Egyptian tourism in particular. Fears abound these days among ordinary Egyptians that Israel has had a role in the latest developments [terrorist acts], especially since the success of ASTA [American Society of Travel Agents] 1992 and Egypt's excellent rise on the world's tourism map have disturbed many of the region's tourist countries? [al-Biltaji] There is absolutely no fear of cooperation with Israel in this regard, because Egypt's tourism resources are unrivaled. Egypt possesses one-third of the world's antiquities, and it possesses natural elements, such as sun, air, shores, and hospitable people, that are rarely found in another country. [Shalash] What is tourism's position in the political leadership's mind? [al-Biltaji] President Mubarak devotes great attention to tourism, and he goes personally to tourist sites in Luxor and the Red Sea to encourage greatly tourism investors visiting Egypt. [Shalash] Tourism development activity in new tourist sites was at the peak of success prior to 1993. Has investment and development activity declined by the same degree as tourist numbers and tourism revenues? [al-Biltaji] Investment activity hasn't been affected by the latest developments. The government has issued a number of laws and regulations that ensure that the wheel of development keeps on turning and that encourage the private sector to participate effectively in this area. Incentives include free foreign exchange transactions and unrestricted remittance of profits to the outside world; the right of non-Egyptians to fully own investment projects; tax exemptions for profits emanating from tourist project expansions; and exemption from the proportionate revenue tax, from registration, documentation, and announcement fees for all contracts connected with the project. The incentives also include the levying of a uniform customs fee amounting to 5 percent of the value of goods and equipment imported for a project. Moreover, the incentives make it impermissible to seize or confiscate the assets of investment firms and give these firms the right to re-export their full capital. The above incentives come on top of other facilities, such as sale and lease to investors at token prices, the investor's freedom to determine the price of his services and his profits without intervention by the government, and the easy and prompt acquisition of approvals and permits for tourist projects. [Shalash] The Ministry of Aviation has been separated from the Ministry of Tourism in the latest Cabinet. The Civil Aviation Authority has been placed under the control of the Ministry of Transport; Cairo Airport and Air Egypt have been placed under Cabinet control. Moreover, tourist companies and hotels have, under the canopy of the new specialization laws, been placed under the control of the public business sector. Will this result in lack of coordination between these sectors, even though they all serve the same thing, namely tourism, or is there coordination among you? [al-Biltaji] Coordination is extant and ongoing. We all cooperate for what is in the interest of Egypt and its prosperity. When a problem develops, we do actually form a joint aviation-tourism committee to examine it. [Shalash] Give me an example. [al-Biltaji] There is the "chartered" flights problem that developed recently when the Civil Aviation Authority refused to permit tourist-carrying "chartered" flights to land in al-Ghardaqah on the grounds that laws don't empower it to permit such landings. I intervened immediately and the flights were permitted to land because the interest of tourism comes first. The committee we formed of the Ministry of Tourism, the Aviation Authority, and Air Egypt drafted rules to regulate "chartered" flight activity in a way that ensures the national company's right, i.e., Air Egypt's right, and the rights of the Egyptian and foreign private sector companies. I believe in the policy of open skies. [Shalash] It seems from this interview that you are more optimistic than you should. [al-Biltaji] Yes, I am optimistic. Egyptian tourism activity will regain its normal rates soon.

text:what text:new text:invent text:or text:scientif text:discoveri text:have text:been text:made
Serendipity: Accidental Discoveries in Science by Royston M. Roberts (John Wiley & Sons: $18.95; $12.95, paperback; 288 pages) The future, it is said, always comes from around a corner where you weren't looking. This fact has been observed for centuries and stated in many ways. It is true of professional life and personal life and may be truest of all in the area of scientific research, where myriad discoveries have been made essentially by accident. "Serendipity" by Royston M. Roberts is the story of several dozen of such discoveries -- ones you know about, like penicillin, and ones that are less well known, like electromagnetism. In each case, researchers were looking for one thing and discovered another. Or perhaps they were looking for nothing in particular but noticed something unusual and pursued it.  Difference in Discovery Roberts, a professor of chemistry at the University of Texas, distinguishes between what he calls "true serendipity" -- a completely accidental discovery that no one was looking for -- and "pseudo-serendipity" -- an accidental discovery of something that someone was looking for. Here's the difference: "Charles Goodyear discovered the vulcanization process for rubber when he accidentally dropped a piece of rubber mixed with sulfur onto a hot stove. For many years Goodyear had been obsessed with finding a way to make rubber useful. Because it was an accident that led to the successful process so diligently sought for, I call this a pseudo-serendipitous discovery. In contrast, George deMestral had no intention of inventing a fastener (Velcro) when he looked to see why some burs stuck tightly to his clothing." It's an interesting and useful distinction, which, like many distinctions, tends to blur at the meeting point. But the fact that the categories are not completely distinct does not deprive them of meaning.  Overflowing Bath To be sure, the history of science contains many completely accidental (truly serendipitous) discoveries -- such as the discovery of oral contraceptives -- as well as many that were only pseudo-serendipitous -- such as Archimedes' discovery of how to measure the volume of an irregular object, which came to him while sitting in the bath. Archimedes had been thinking about the problem, and realized the solution when he saw water overflowing from his tub. By contrast, the discoverers of oral contraceptives, Russell Marker and Carl Djerassi, weren't looking for oral contraceptives at all. In either case, someone making an accidental discovery has to be alert to it. As Louis Pasteur said, "Chance favors the prepared mind." If Alexander Fleming had discarded the contaminated petri dish in his laboratory (as many researcher undoubtedly would have done), penicillin would not have been discovered -- at least not then and not by him. That's one important difference between a truly serendipitous and a merely pseudo-serendipitous discovery. If a would-be truly serendipitous discovery passes unnoticed, it is gone. But if a researcher fails to notice a would-be pseudo-serendipitous discovery, there's always a chance that he may come upon it again. At least he's working on that problem.  History of Science "Serendipity" is a straightforward history of science, told in an anecdotal, personal style. There does not appear to be much original research here. Roberts has collected his stories from existing works and sometimes quotes from published accounts by the scientists who made the discoveries. For the discovery of LSD, for example, we have the laboratory notebook of Albert Hofmann, the Swiss chemist who accidentally made some in 1938 and then ingested it. Roberts' book has the tone of the histories of science we used to read in high school. Paul de Kruif's "Microbe Hunters" comes to mind. It's the textbook story of science: researchers in their laboratories motivated by the quest for truth. That is certainly the story scientists like to tell about themselves and their work, and it is certainly part of the picture. (As many other authors have told us in recent decades, it is not the whole picture of how science operates.) But these stories may help inspire young people to pursue careers in scientific research. There is a great thrill in finding things out, which Roberts' book makes clear. It also makes clear that you don't always discover what you were trying to and that you must be constantly alert to new paths and new possibilities as they arise. That lesson extends far beyond science.

text:what text:step text:ar text:be text:taken text:by text:govern text:or text:corpor text:to text:elimin text:abus text:of text:child text:labor
Response: We have not adopted the commenters' suggestion, because section 6211(h)(1)(B) of OBRA 89 deletes the definition of ``active labor'' in section 1867(e)(2) of the Act. However, the concepts contained in that definition have now been clarified and included in the definition of ``emergency medical condition'' defined in section 1867(e)(1) of the Act. Comment: One commenter asked us to make it clear that even though it may be difficult to state whether delivery is imminent, a woman would be in ``active labor'' as that term is defined in section 1867(e)(2) of the Act (as added by COBRA), if there was either inadequate time to effect safe transfer to another hospital before delivery or if a transfer might pose a threat to the health and safety of the woman or the unborn child. Response: We agree. The proposed regulation restated the statutory definition, and, hence, reiterated that the transfer of a woman in labor is subject to the provisions of section 1867 of the Act if any of the following three conditions pertain: (a) delivery is imminent; (b) there is inadequate time to effect safe transfer to another hospital prior to delivery; or (c) a transfer may pose a threat to the health and safety of the woman or the unborn child. Section 6211(h)(2) of OBRA 89 amended section 1867(e) of the Act by deleting both the term ``active labor'' and the part of the definition that covers women in labor where delivery is imminent. The definition of ``emergency medical condition'', however, was expanded to include a woman who is having contractions when there is inadequate time to effect safe transfer to another hospital before delivery or a woman who is having contractions where the transfer may impose a threat to the health or safety of the woman or the unborn child. The OBRA 89 amendments clarified the scope of the statutory protections. We have amended 489.24(b) accordingly. In addition, the statute also refers to women in labor. We have defined the term ``labor'' in 489.24(b). Comment: Two commenters wanted the regulations to emphasize that the ``active labor'' definition applies only in prenatal situations in which no other prenatal emergency is present and that a pregnant woman with an emergency medical condition should be admitted even if not yet in active labor. Response: The regulations that apply to emergency medical conditions apply equally to a pregnant woman whose emergency condition does not involve active labor. As noted above, OBRA 89 changes eliminated the term ``active labor'' and included pregnant women within the meaning of the term ``emergency medical condition.'' Emergency Medical Condition Comment: Many commenters recommended that we adopt the definition of ``emergency'' used by the American College of Emergency Physicians (ACEP), standards that are already widely applied in the profession. Response: We believe that the ACEP definition is not suitable for purposes of requirements under section 1867 of the Act because it is designed to assure that cases in which the patient believes that an emergency medical condition exists are, in fact, emergencies. We believe that section 1867 of the Act only applies to actual emergencies as determined by appropriate medical screening. Therefore, we have not adopted this recommendation. Comment: One commenter asked us to cite the court cases from which the phrases ``serious impairment to bodily function'' and ``serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part'' emanated. Response: These phrases are taken directly from the definitions in section 1867(e)(1) of the statute. There is no legislative history that indicates that Congress took them from reported court decisions. Comment: One commenter wanted the phrase ``placing the patient's health in serious jeopardy'' removed from the definition of emergency medical condition because it is not a result or an outcome from not providing emergency medical treatment but rather is only speculation. Response: We do not agree to delete the phrase ``placing the patient's health in serious jeopardy.'' The definition parallels the statute and as such reflects Congressional intent. All of the phrases contained in the definition of emergency medical condition describe outcomes that are likely to result from the denial of immediate attention upon the exercise of medical judgment to predict what would happen to the individual if appropriate medical attention was not provided immediately. Comment: Nine commenters wanted the definition to include psychiatric emergency; one commenter wanted the definition to include acute alcohol or drug intoxication. Response: We believe that the statutory definition already encompasses these types of cases. However, for clarification purposes, we have revised 489.24(b) to add acute alcohol or drug intoxication (substance abuse) and psychiatric manifestations as sufficiently severe medical symptoms to warrant the label ``emergency medical condition.''

text:how text:do text:you text:prevent text:and text:treat text:lyme text:diseas
DISEASE-MONGERS by Lynn Payer John Wiley Dollars 22.95, 292 pages AND YOU thought the NHS was bad. Here is a chilling new book from the US which reveals a conspiracy by the money-grubbing health care industry to convince basically healthy folks that they are ill, and slightly ill people that they are at death's door. Lynn Payer, the former medical correspondent for the International Herald Tribune, has written what is sure to be a controversial best-seller. It is mandatory reading for Americans, but there are some lessons for Europeans, too. Ms. Payer's thesis is that the public is being over-diagnosed, over-medicated, and over-operated upon, because tests, drugs, and surgical procedures are big business. Since the demand for 'health' is infinite, the industry (doctors, hospitals, pharmaceutical companies) can sell ever more drugs and services, whether or not they are really needed. But to do this, people must be frightened into believing they are not healthy (or could be healthier). Ms. Payer calls this 'disease-mongering'. The book cites a plethora of examples, including 'Lyme' Disease, Chronic Fatigue Syndrome, chronic candidiasis, depression and 'stress tests'. In each case, she documents how the problem has been hyped and exaggerated out of proportion. Healthy people become unwell just by worrying whether their tiredness is 'Chronic Fatigue Syndrome', which is itself simply a fancy name for being tired. And doctors order huge numbers of tests and then prescribe drugs for problems which could, in most cases, be cured by the body's own processes. Ms. Payer criticises the 'medicalisation' of normal events, such as menopause and short height. As a result of huge media hype, Premarin (a female hormone replacement drug) is the fourth most prescribed medicine in the US. This drug may reduce the risk of osteoporosis and heart attacks, but it also may increase the risk of cancer. Women are being told they are crazy to refuse hormone replacement, even though many would rather die of heart attacks than of breast cancer. And similar panic has caused many children of below-average height to be treated with growth hormones. But there is no evidence that these treatments produce a taller adult; and some of those treated before 1985 developed terrible side effects later in life. The book also blasts the 'diseasing' of risk factors, such as high cholesterol and blood pressure. As Ms. Payer points out, these conditions are not diseases but indications of risks for heart disease. People with slightly high cholesterol and no other risk factors may suffer more from taking cholesterol-lowering drugs than they would from eating bacon. Another scam: promoting mammography as a cure-all for breast cancer when it does not even detect cancer in young women's' dense breast tissue. Why is disease-mongering so successful? Ms. Payer offers several reasons. Too many doctors (44 per cent more than in 1980) are competing for too few insured patients. Doctors and hospitals are reimbursed for procedures, not for outcomes. Fear of malpractice lawsuits encourages doctors to prescribe too many diagnostic tests. The pharmaceutical industry has incentives to develop and promote more drugs, especially for chronic and marginal ailments. US advertising law permits drug companies to market products directly to consumers. Popular health magazines hype risks with headlines such as '80 per cent of US males at risk for premature death', and rely on drug companies for advertising revenues. According to the author, disease-mongering is responsible for much of America's rocketing health care costs. Medical testing is a definite villain. 'The only two mammals to remove blood regularly from other mammals are vampire bats and humans,' says the book: the US spends Dollars 27bn (Pounds 15.70bn) per year on 5bn to 10bn medical tests. Even more troubling is the human cost of unnecessary treatment. Ms Payer describes numerous cases in which perfectly healthy people fell ill and died as a result of the side-effects of medical tests or inappropriate medication. This book will compel any reader to see that common sense, and the old 'ounce of prevention is worth a pound of cure' philosophy, is right - most of the time. It should also arouse a healthy scepticism of the health care industry and the unholy alliance of interests in America. However, the book suggests that the core problem is due to the health care system being too business-like. I would argue quite the opposite: if this were a business, the focus would be on catering to the patient-as-customer. Which would produce better and more affordable care, prompt treatment and a more humane system.

text:find text:account text:of text:selfless text:heroic text:act text:by text:individu text:or text:small text:group text:for text:the text:benefit text:of text:other text:or text:a text:caus
Language: Chinese Article Type:BFN [Second of seven installments: Report on interview with Hu Angang [5170 7254 6921] and Kang Xiaoguang [1660 2556 0342] specialists of the Group for Analyzing the National Situation, under the Chinese Academy of Sciences, by staff reporter Liu Lu (0491 7216); place, date not given: "Economic Conversion and System Defects Cause Corruption; Obstacles to Anticorruption Drive Come From Within CPC"] [Text] I asked Hu Angang and Kang Xiaoguang: What are the root causes of corruption in China's realities? They answered: "The national situation report `Thoroughly Eliminating Corruption Through Institutional Innovation' makes it clear that current corruption is mainly the corruption of the system. The main root causes of corrupt phenomena are the defects of the existing systems in the period of the market-oriented economic restructuring. In the process of transforming the economy into a market economy, differences exist between market prices and official prices. The larger the differences, the stronger the motivations for giving and taking bribes will become, and the more serious the corrupt phenomena will become. In the past, officials often were assumed to be "selfless." This assumption can hardly become true in economic society. As defects exist in the systems, honest people may rapidly become corrupt once they have power. The only solution is system innovation. In addition, the corruption activities also are related to the government's excessive interference in the market. If there were no market distortion and no special monopoly position caused by the government's excessive interference, there would be no foundation for the giving and taking of bribes. Hu Angang and Kang Xiaoguang said: "In our report, we also point out explicitly that the obstacles to the anticorruption drive on the Chinese mainland come primarily from with the CPC, and find their main expression in special interest groups of various types led by the Communists. The Communist Party is not a monolith, nor does everyone inside the party share the same interests and act in unison. Inside the party and within the state apparatus various special and independent economic interest groups and political interest groups have appeared. This is one of the most important characteristics of the prominent changes in the Chinese social structure since the beginning of reform. The report summarizes the main characteristics of the special interest groups into following points: -- Having the motivation of seeking and expanding their own interests to the maximum, and taking this as their purpose. They care only about increasing their own groups' gains and do not consider the losses in the aggregate social wealth. -- Having the attributes of benefit-sharing groups, as they participate in the distribution of social resources and profits. Although they account for only a very small proportion of the population, they always are able to gain a much larger proportion of economic resources. -- Having the character of being exclusive and holding a monopoly position. They exclude other groups from the benefit-sharing activities, block the free movement of economic factors, oppose the participation of other competitive rivals, and strive to increase their monopoly in society. When resisting external threats and rectification, they also may collaborate in order to protect each other, thus forming complex connection networks. -- Having strong influence and causing "government ineffectiveness." They try to influence government policies, and even the top-level policy-making body, by every possible means. They demand excessive government interference or even direct interference by top decision-makers in order to obtain certain economic prerogatives or favorable policies. They also try by every possible means to oppose and obstruct the adoption of some reform measures that favor fair competition. -- The vested interests are rather "rigid." That is, they can only increase and must not decrease the absolute interests they have gained, and the shares they gain can only increase and must not decrease. Hu and Kang said: The above-mentioned characteristics determine that any major measure for reforming the existing systems inevitably will encounter strong opposition from the special interest groups. For example, many interest groups opposed the measures to lower import tariffs, lift import controls, and remove the foreign trade monopoly system. The difficulties in market-oriented reforms lie in the handling of such special interest groups.

text:what text:is text:the text:extent text:of text:u. (text:govern text:and text:privat) text:invest text:in (((+text:sub +text:saharan) text:sub saharan)) text:africa
A TREBLING of private investment is required in sub-Saharan Africa if the region is to achieve long-term economic recovery, Mr William Ryrie, executive vice president of the International Finance Corporation (IFC), said in London this week. Mr Ryrie, speaking at a conference chaired by Mr Babacar Ndiaye, president of the African Development Bank, said achieving the target figure of 15 per cent of GDP was 'doubtful at best'. 'In most countries, even with the best will and the best policies, it will probably be the first decade of the 21st century before we begin to see real results - that is to say steadily rising private investment, sustained higher rates of growth and job creation', he added. Mr Ryrie said the IFC, the private sector arm of the World Bank, was investing approximately Dollars 200m a year in about 35 companies in sub-Saharan Africa. He estimated that projects in which the IFC had recently participated accounted for around 10 per cent of total private investment, domestic and foreign, in the region. Much of the IFC finance has gone into a few large investments, he acknowledged. 'What is lacking is a flow of medium-sized investments in manufacturing businesses,' Mr Ryrie said. He said private investment in sub-Saharan Africa has been running at about Dollars 8bn a year, with foreign private investment contributing less than Dollars 1bn a year. Net official development assistance to the region between 1980-89 had been Dollars 105bn, or about Dollars 30 per capita each year. He said the flow of aid had 'no parallel in history' but standards of living had continued to fall.

text:what text:ar text:the text:potenti text:us text:for text:supercrit text:fluid text:as text:an text:environment text:protect text:measur
Additionally, the shifts in proportions of chemicals used in the formulation result in less waste than is normally generated through the traditional manufacturing process, resulting in a lower probability of overall adverse effects to the general population. The Agency also investigated the production of waste before and after the actual cleaning process and found that waste generation at these points in the production process would not be greater than what is seen with CFC&hyph;113 or MCF use. This acceptability listing also applies to water-removable fluxes and inert gas soldering. (c) Straight organic solvent cleaning. Straight organic solvent cleaning is an acceptable substitute for CFC&hyph;113 and MCF in the electronics cleaning sector. This acceptability determination extends to organic solvents used as individual chemicals as well as in combinations. The Agency's justification for this decision is described in the section on acceptable substitutes for metals cleaning. (d) Other chlorinated solvents. Trichloroethylene (TCE), perchloroethylene (perc) and methylene chloride (meth) are all acceptable substitutes for CFC&hyph;113 and MCF in the electronics cleaning sector. The reasons for this decision are described in the metals cleaning discussion. Although these solvents have not received as much commercial interest for electronics cleaning as for metals cleaning applications, the Agency did receive a request to review these chemicals for electronics cleaning. Although the Agency's risk screen focused on use of these chemicals in metals cleaning operations, the screen suggests that release profiles for these chemicals in electronics cleaning will be either the same or lower. As a result, the Agency has reached the same conclusion with respect to electronics cleaning as in the metals cleaning analysis, namely that any risks due to the inherent toxicity of these chemicals could be controlled by existing and future regulatory standards. (e) Supercritical fluid cleaning, plasma cleaning, UV-ozone cleaning. Supercritical fluid cleaning, plasma cleaning, UV-ozone cleaning are all acceptable as substitutes for CFC&hyph;113 and MCF in electronics cleaning. The Agency did not identify any environmental issues associated with use of these substitutes. While ozone is hazardous to human health, OSHA has already set standards for use of this compound in the workplace. (f) Volatile methyl siloxanes (dodecamethylcyclohexasiloxane, hexamethyldisiloxane, octamethyltrisiloxane, decamethyltetrasiloxane). The volatile methyl siloxanes dodecamethylcyclohexasiloxane, hexamethyldisiloxane, octamethyltrisiloxane, and decamethyltetrasiloxane are acceptable substitutes for CFC&hyph;113 and MCF in the electronics cleaning sector. The Agency's risk screen for these chemicals indicated that exposure to these substitutes are generally below levels that would raise concern for health risks. Two of the volatile methyl siloxanes, octamethylcyclotetrasiloxane and decamethylcyclopentasiloxane, have low company-set exposure limits, and these chemicals will be handled under a separate rule-making. (3) Precision cleaning. (a) Semi-aqueous/aqueous cleaners. Semi-aqueous and aqueous cleaners are acceptable substitutes for CFC&hyph;113 and MCF in precision cleaning. The reasons for this decision are the same as those described in the metals cleaning section. Each of these alternatives has the potential to service approximately 65 percent of the precision cleaning market. This figure may overestimate the technical potential for water-based cleaners in this sector, since this end use sector faces the greatest technical constraints in implementing new cleaning alternatives. The Agency did not specifically examine risks from water-based formulations used in precision cleaning since the processes are typically either similar to those used in metals cleaning or have lower throughputs and therefore fewer discharges. Therefore, the analysis assumed that these risks from precision cleaning would be either comparable to or less than risks associated with use of water-based formulations for metals cleaning. (b) Other chlorinated solvents. Other chlorinated solvents are acceptable substitutes for CFC&hyph;113 and MCF in precision cleaning. The reasons for this decision are described in the section on metals cleaning. For the analysis of risks from these substitutes in the precision cleaning end use sector, the Agency made the same assumptions as in its analysis for electronics cleaning applications of water-based formulations, namely that exposures would be equal to or less than exposures in the metals cleaning sector since the processes for precision cleaning are similar or even of lower emissions than those for metals cleaning. Consequently, the Agency believes that risks would also be either equivalent or lower. (c) Straight organic solvent cleaning. Straight organic solvent cleaning is an acceptable substitute for CFC&hyph;113 and MCF in precision cleaning. This acceptability determination extends to organic solvents used as individual chemicals as well as in combinations. The Agency's justification for this decision is described in the section on acceptable substitutes for metals cleaning. (d) Supercritical fluid cleaning, plasma cleaning, UV-ozone cleaning. Supercritical fluid cleaning, plasma cleaning, UV-ozone cleaning are all acceptable as substitutes for CFC&hyph;113 and MCF in precision cleaning. The Agency did not identify any environmental issues associated with use of these substitutes. While ozone is hazardous to human health, OSHA has already set standards for use of this compound in the workplace. (e) Volatile Methyl Siloxanes (dodecamethylcyclohexasiloxane, hexamethyldisiloxane, octamethyltrisiloxane, decamethyltetrasiloxane). The volatile methyl siloxanes dodecamethylcyclohexasiloxane, hexamethyldisiloxane, octamethyltrisiloxane, and decamethyltetrasiloxane are acceptable substitutes for CFC&hyph;113 and MCF in the precision cleaning sector. The Agency's risk screen for these chemicals indicated that exposure to these substitutes are generally below levels that would raise concern for health risks. Two of the volatile methyl siloxanes, octamethylcyclotetrasiloxane and decamethylcyclopentasiloxane, have low company-set exposure limits, and these chemicals will be handled under a separate rule-making. b. Substitutes acceptable subject to use conditions. (None).

text:what text:other text:countri text:besid text:the text:unit text:state text:ar text:consid text:or text:have text:approv text:women text:as text:clergi text:person
It happened 43 years ago, but Nicholas Royce is not about to forget the day he was inducted into the Army at Ft. Mead outside Baltimore. That was the day he learned about the tri-faith syndrome. "Are you Catholic, Protestant or Jewish?" the induction officer asked him. "None of them," Royce responded. "I told him I was Greek Orthodox," he recalled, "but the officer kept insisting that I had to fit into one of the three categories because that was all they recognized. Or I could be classified as an 'other.' That really irked me. "Eastern Orthodox Christians had died in World War II in defense of the Constitution, yet here we were being denied our constitutional rights of freedom of religion." By his own admission Royce, a 63-year-old former professional dancer turned film distribution executive, takes any slight of his religion as a personal affront. But the North Hollywood resident does far more than just stew over his hurts. His Army experience prompted him to start a nine-year lobbying effort that ended in 1955 when the Pentagon agreed to permit Orthodox Christians to have their own chaplains and official classification. Church leaders say Royce's effort also prompted Dwight D. Eisenhower to invite an Orthodox archbishop to participate in his 1957 presidential inauguration, the first time such an invitation had been extended. Since then, Royce has engaged in a nonstop, one-man campaign to raise public awareness and gain official recognition for Orthodox Christianity. He continues to pester politicians into giving Orthodox clergy equal time at ceremonial occasions, arranges for Orthodox representatives to appear on radio and television religion talk shows and makes sure that Orthodox viewpoints are included in interfaith activities. He cajoles and, he also admits, sometimes annoys. But he's also persistent and his efforts have gained him wide recognition within his church and the interfaith community as well. "If it was not for Nick, Orthodoxy really wouldn't be recognized in the United States. His work has been to that extent," said the Rev. James T. Adams, dean of St. Sophia Greek Orthodox Cathedral in Los Angeles. "Nick gave the church visibility before anyone else in the church was even aware of the need for that." "Nick is my connection with the religious Greek community," added Robert M. Jones, Southern California regional executive director for the National Conference of Christians and Jews. "He's an excellent champion of his faith in the community." Royce works independently of his church's hierarchy. He holds no official position and receives no financial support from the church, even though he said that each year he spends "several thousand dollars" of his money on behalf of his faith. "I like to work alone," he said. "You have to satisfy too many people if you work on committees. That's why I could never be a priest." Royce's outspokenness is also directed at his church, which he believes is stuck in its ethnic past, and reluctant to accommodate American mores and face the social problems of the day. "Orthodoxy needs to be made relevant if it is to satisfy the real spiritual needs of our thoroughly Americanized congregants," he said. "Having a bishop look great in beautiful vestments isn't enough. He's got to be streetwise. "Our clergy believe in apostolic succession. So let them start to act like apostles and mix with the people." Statements like that have earned Royce the status of "church gadfly," said Andrew T. Kopan, a professor of education at De Paul University in Chicago and a founder of Orthodox Christian Laity, a national body of lay Orthodox. "He doesn't go through formal channels, and that doesn't endear you to the conservative elements in the church," Kopan said. "There are some members of the hierarchy who see Nick as a threat because he demands accountability." Despite that, Royce was awarded Greek Orthodoxy's highest honor accorded to lay people. In 1985, he traveled to New York where Archbishop Iakovos, the highest Greek Orthodox official in the Western Hemisphere, personally bestowed upon Royce the rank of Archon of the Ecumenical Patriarchate of the Order of St. Andrew. Royce, slightly built, white-haired and passionate when talking about his church, was born in Bethlehem, Pa., where his Greek immigrant parents ran a restaurant. When he was 6, the family moved to Baltimore and it was there that he encountered ethnic and religious prejudice. "I heard a lot of 'Go back to Greece,' yet I was born in America. It tore me apart and I went home crying a lot," Royce said. "But my reaction to this was to immerse myself in the Greek Orthodox religion and Greek culture." Greek Orthodoxy is the largest of the various independent national branches of Eastern Orthodox Christianity that have taken root in the United States, accounting for about 40% of the nation's 5 million Orthodox believers (others include Russian, Ukrainian, Antiochian and Serbian Orthodox church members). About three-fourths of Southern California's 200,000 Orthodox Christians belong to the Greek church. Orthodox Christians, whose church split with Western Christianity in the 11th Century over political and theological differences, consider theirs the true church of the early apostles. Known for its incense-filled rituals and the beauty of its icons (painted images of Christ and the saints), Orthodoxy is a conservative faith bound in Old World traditions. Royce, however, is anything but traditional. Taught to dance by his older sister, he turned professional at age 14, despite family fears that show business would drain him of his culture and religion. "That's a problem we have in the Greek Orthodox world," he said. "There's a real fear that assimilation means the end for us as a people. I'm a perfect example of how untrue that is." Royce was known as "the Greek Fred Astaire in GI clothing" when the Army sent him on tours of military hospitals and bases. He appeared in nightclubs and theaters around the country with his own group, specializing in jazz and calypso dancing, and on the Ed Sullivan, Milton Berle and Kate Smith television shows. He settled in Los Angeles in the mid-1950s, ended his dancing career in 1960 and tried banking and hosting TV and radio talk shows before going into film distribution. He works in Hollywood for a religious film production company. Soon after moving here, he also took on the self-appointed task of shaking up his church when he realized his own spiritual needs were unfulfilled. "I wanted a church that was there for me seven days a week, not just on Sunday. I needed a forward-looking church that responded to issues and wasn't just a cocoon for immigrants," he said. At about the same time, he noticed that Orthodoxy never seemed to be mentioned in the popular media. "Having been in show business, I knew the value of publicity," Royce said. "Since no one else was doing it, I just started contacting the media and sending out press releases and letters." At the time, though, neither the Greek or any of the other Orthodox churches had official public relations representatives. Not knowing who else to call, media people got in the habit of calling Royce. "Besides, I wasn't your typical passive priest," he explained. "I was outspoken and the media likes that. So they kept calling. Some of the clergy got quite upset with me. They said, 'Who is he to do that?' " "Nick was sort of a legend in the church back in the '50s," Kopan said in a telephone interview from Chicago. "Before there was any organized public relations for the church, Nick was speaking or writing about Orthodoxy to anybody who would listen." Royce's prime concerns within his church revolve around what he sees as the need for a "good" English translation of the Greek Orthodox liturgy and his upset over "unimaginative" responses to such pressing social issues as interfaith marriages, AIDS, the homeless, drugs, nuclear weapons and the role of women. "The church has a moral duty to participate in solving social problems," Royce said. "I'd like to see some of our bishops work in a soup kitchen and visit hospitals." "Nick believes the Orthodox churches should come right out with positions on social issues like other faiths often do," said St. Sophia's Father Adams. "He believes the church is too slow to respond, and sometimes he is right." Royce also is involved in an international effort on behalf of the Orthodoxy's spiritual leader, Archbishop Dimitrios I, the Ecumenical Patriarch of Constantinople (Istanbul). Orthodox officials have charged Muslim Turkey with harassing the archbishop, and Royce has fired off hundreds of letters to heads of state and international organizations in an attempt to pressure the Turkish government into allowing the archbishop more freedom. "This may be his greatest contribution to the church," said Nikki Stephanopoulos, chief spokesperson in New York for the Greek Orthodox Archdiocese of North and South America. "Nicholas was way ahead of everybody in getting people to understand the situation." Not all of Royce's causes involve his religion, however. Earlier this year, he became the first man to be accepted as a member of Women in Film, the third entertainment industry women's organization to grant him full membership. The others were American Women in Radio & TV (Royce was the first male to serve on the board of the Southern California chapter) and the Hollywood Women's Press Club. Noting that women are being accepted in formerly all-male organizations, Royce said he is simply doing his bit to demonstrate that turnabout is fair play. "I've always been an activist and maybe I'm a feminist. Besides, women have helped me during my life and I think I can help them by participating in their organizations," he said.

text:where text:ar text:tourist text:like text:to text:be text:subject text:to text:act text:of text:violenc text:caus text:bodili text:harm text:or text:death
(2) Deadly force. (i) Deadly force is any use of force that is likely to cause death or serious bodily harm. (ii) Deadly force may be used only when a designated immigration officer, as listed in paragraph (a)(2)(iii) of this section, has reasonable grounds to believe that such force is necessary to protect the designated immigration officer or other persons from the present danger of death or serious bodily harm. (iii) The following immigration officers who have successfully completed basic immigration law enforcement training are hereby authorized and designated to exercise the power conferred by section 287(a) of the Act to use deadly force should circumstances warrant it: (A) Border patrol agents, including aircraft pilots; (B) Special agents; (C) Deportation officers; (D) Detention enforcement officers; (E) Immigration inspectors; (F) Immigration examiners when in the uniform of an immigration inspector and performing inspections or supervising other immigration inspectors performing inspections; (G) Supervisory and managerial personnel who are responsible for supervising the activities of those officers listed above; and (H) Immigration officers who need the authority to use deadly force under section 287(a) of the Act in order to effectively accomplish their individual missions and who are designated, individually or as a class, by the Commissioner with the approval of the Deputy Attorney General. (b) Interrogation and detention not amounting to arrest. (1) Integration is questioning designed to elicit specific information. An immigration officer, like any other person, has the right to ask questions of anyone as long as the immigration officer does not restrain the freedom of an individual, not under arrest, to walk away. (2) If the immigration officer has a reasonable suspicion, based on specific articulable facts, that the person being questioned is, or is attempting to be, engaged in an offense against the United States or is an alien illegally in the United States, the immigration officer may briefly detain the person for questioning. (3) Information obtained from this questioning may provide the basis for a subsequent arrest, which must be effected only by a designated immigration officer, as listed in 287.5(c). The conduct of arrests is specified in paragraph (c) of this section. (c) Conduct of arrests. (1) Authority. Only designated immigration officers are authorized to make an arrest. The list of designated immigration officers varies depending on the type of arrest as listed in 287.5(c)(1) through (c)(5). (2) General procedures. (i) An arrest shall be made only when the designated immigration officer has reason to believe that the person to be arrested has committed an offense against the United States or is an alien illegally in the United States. (ii) A warrant of arrest shall be obtained whenever possible prior to the arrest. (iii) At the time of the arrest, the designated immigration officer shall, as soon as it is practical and safe to do so: (A) Identify himself or herself as an immigration officer who is authorized to execute an arrest; and (B) State that the person is under arrest and the reason for the arrest. (iv) With respect to an alien arrested and administratively charged with being in the United States in violation of law, the arresting officer shall adhere to the procedures set forth in 287.3 if the arrest is made without a warrant, and to the procedures set forth in 242.2(c)(2) of this chapter if the arrest is made with a warrant. (v) With respect to a person arrested and charged with a criminal violation of the laws of the United States, the arresting officer shall advise the person of the appropriated rights as required by law at the time of the arrest, or as soon thereafter as practicable. It is the duty of the immigration officer to assure that the warnings are given in a language the subject understands, and that the subject acknowledges that the warnings are understood. The fact that a person has been advised of his or her rights shall be documented on appropriate Service forms and made a part of the arrest record. (vi) Every person arrested and charged with a criminal violation of the laws of the United States shall be brought without unnecessary delay before a United States magistrate judge, a United States district judge or, if necessary, a judicial officer empowered in accordance with 18 U.S.C. 3041 to commit persons charged with such crimes. Accordingly, the immigration officer shall contact an Assistant United States Attorney to arrange for an initial appearance. (vii) The use of threats, coercion, or physical abuse by the designated immigration officer to induce a suspect to waive his or her rights or to make a statement is prohibited. (d) Transportation. (1) Vehicle transportation. All persons will be transported in a manner that ensures the safety of the persons being transported. When persons arrested or detained are being transported by vehicle, each person will be searched as thoroughly as circumstances permit before being placed in the vehicle. The person being transported shall not be handcuffed to the frame or any part of the moving vehicle or an object in the moving vehicle. The person being transported shall not be left unattended during transport unless the immigration officer needs to perform a law enforcement function.

text:what text:new text:develop text:and text:applic text:ar text:there text:for text:the text:stirl text:engin
In the public imagination, cryogenics conjures images of astronauts frozen for science fiction's interstellar voyages or of rich Californians put on ice until the secret of eternal life is discovered. Cryogenics - engineering at extremely low temperatures - is a serious business, however, with a range of applications in space and at a more down-to-earth level. Inside one of Carrier's air conditioning factories in Syracuse, upstate New York, is a tightly-guarded prototype manufacturing laboratory where the final touches are being made to a 'cryocooler', confidently expected to win a distinctly frosty reception. Carrier is among a number of companies and universities which have been developing cryocoolers during recent years. Much of the work has been based on adaptations of the Stirling cycle engine patented by the Rev James Stirling in 1816, which can be used as a refrigerator if the direction of rotation is reversed. Other advances in cryocooling were made by Philips of the Netherlands after the Second World War, while Oxford University's Department of Engineering Science has been developing cryocoolers for the past 14 years and was the first to produce a long-life maintenance-free cryocooler about 10 years ago. Oxford's Stirling cycle cryocoolers are used almost exclusively for cooling infra-red detectors to give clearer images - two of its machines are installed on satellites - and its machines are now licensed to four companies in the UK and US, with a fifth deal in prospect. The phenomenon that has galvanised Carrier into developing cryocoolers is slightly different. At extremely low temperatures, computer chips work much faster, because the resistance in the copper interconnects is reduced and the signals can travel more quickly. For reasons not yet clear, superconductors do not work at all unless kept very cold. At 77 Kelvin or - 321 deg F - CMOS (Complimentary Metal Oxide Semiconductor) chips used in mid-range computers are twice as fast as when used in a standard air-cooled environment. The 77 Kelvin benchmark is the boiling point of nitrogen, used because nitrogen has always been an inexpensive, convenient refrigerant, although the working gas in cryocooling is normally helium. The challenge for widespread commercial use of cryocoolers in electronics has been in getting them to work unattended for a long period and in making them cheaply, says Brian Hands, a research lecturer at Oxford. In conditions of some secrecy, Carrier, part of United Technologies (UTC), has been working with the computer industry and with the multi-disciplinary United Technologies Research Centre at Hartford, Connecticut, to solve the problem. In the past few weeks, it has unveiled the first 250W cryocooler with an estimated 'initial maintenance-free power-on time' of 50,000 hours. The Carrier cryocooler is designed to fit on the standard electronic equipment rack at the bottom of a computer unit. The CMOS chip sits on the cryocooler's six-inch copper plate cool head. Carrier has spent some tens of millions of dollars on its cryocooler, says Charles Lockerby, business development director of the Transicold division's advanced electronics cooling unit. Much of the effort has gone into improving reliability and reducing noise and vibration down to a total of 45 decibels, but Carrier has also had to work hard, says Lockerby, convincing computer manufacturers 'that it was going to be OK putting something mechanical inside the temple of the computer'. Carrier's hope is that mid-range computer manufacturers will buy the cryocooler in place of all the extra components currently used to make computers run faster. Once in volume production - which may not yet be for a year or two - the machines will cost about Dollars 20,000 (Pounds 10,500) when bought in quantity. Lockerby sees a market of at least 10 to 15 years for cryocooled CMOS chips. The big question, however, is whether conventional developments in chip design will yield the faster speeds anyway. Hands sees more potential for cryocoolers in superconductors, where the availability of reliable, inexpensive systems will assist in the development of high Tc (critical temperature) applications. The availability of mass-produced cryocoolers may well depend on their success in the much bigger computer market. There are many other possible applications. Carrier is beginning to develop a cryocooler for magnetic resonance imaging machines which use low Tc superconductors - MRI is used widely in medicine as an alternative to X-rays -and also sees uses for cryocooled superconductors in space and defence. At very low temperatures, superconductors have zero resistance, but they can also repel an external magnetic field, in such a way that a spinning magnet can be held in a levitated position. Known as the Meisner effect, this creates opportunities for cryocoolers in magnetically levitated transport (Maglev) and for levitating flywheels to store cheap energy for electric cars, says Lockerby. 'We'd love to put one in every electric car,' he adds. At Oxford, there is particular interest in developing Stirling cycle 'green' refrigerators - using nitrogen rather than ozone-damaging CFCs as the refrigerant. The cool head of a cryocooler is very localised, requiring a fan to distribute the cold and thus necessitating a complete redesign. 'The biggest problem,' says Hands, 'is persuading the fridge manufacturers that it's a good idea. They want a 'drop-in' replacement to CFCs.' Carrier's forthcoming entry into the emerging, fragmented market for cryocoolers could be very significant, although mass-production will have to wait until the computer industry is ready to incorporate the machines in their designs. The project has been given a high priority within Carrier and UTC, and Carrier wants to use its global marketing and distribution network to support what is eventually intended to be a very broad range of cryocoolers, says Lockerby.

text:identifi text:instanc text:in text:which text:weather text:wa text:a text:main text:or text:contribut text:factor text:in text:the text:loss text:of text:a text:ship text:at text:sea
BFN [Vladimir Maryukha report: "How Is the Black Sea Fleet To Be Divided?"] [Text] Will the Agreement on the Phased Settlement of Black Sea Fleet Problems give a boost to cooperation or will it undermine relations between Russia and Ukraine? The 10-day period provided for in the Agreement on the Phased Settlement of Black Sea Fleet Problems, which was signed 15 April, is expiring implacably, but there is still no mechanism of splitting the fleet in new proportions. Ukraine, however, continues to interpret unilaterally the document approved at the highest level, something that does not contribute to the attainment of accord. For instance, Ukrainian sailors and politicians have put forward an idea of setting up an Ukrainian naval base in Sevastopol so as to start talks on leasing it to Russia afterward. Given the agreement that the Black Sea Fleet and Ukrainian Navy ships will be based separately, the Black Sea Fleet will effectively lose for some time, if not forever, its main base. At the same time, in Sevastopol, local residents and the city administration stand for handing all Black Sea Fleet units and formations deployed in Crimea over to Russia and for Russian jurisdiction over the fleet's main base. To all appearances, difficulties are also bound to emerge when specific shares of the two sides are calculated. First, because 15-20 percent of Black Sea Fleet ships are by no means a specific value. Second, Ukraine is not going to take into account in the negotiating process the part of the fleet it has already seized unilaterally, including a number of Black Sea Fleet ships and facilities. Despite the appeal by Vice Admiral Vladimir Bezkorovaynyy, commander of the Ukrainian Navy, to refrain during the expert talks from the "Ukrainization" of Black Sea Fleet units, pressure on Black Sea Fleet sailors in garrisons far-flung from Sevastopol continues with no sign of letup. The Ukrainian Defense Ministry, for instance, plans to set up a Ukrainian Navy Water Area Protection brigade on the basis of an Izmail-based brigade of small naval combatants as early as by 1 June.

text:what text:ha text:caus text:the text:current text:ineffect text:of text:antibiot text:against text:infect text:and text:what text:is text:the text:prognosi text:for text:new text:drug
A virulent new strain of cholera emerges from India. Diphtheria strikes at the heart of European Russia. Hantavirus starts killing Navajo Indians in the south-western US. Drug resistance fuels a resurgence of the world's two biggest killers, tuberculosis and malaria. And the global Aids epidemic sweeps on. The current spate of stories about plague and pestilence may hasten the end of what the US Institute of Medicine calls an 'era of complacency' - a period of about 30 years, during which the medical profession and general public assumed that they had won the war on acute infections and focused instead on chronic degenerative disorders such as cancer, heart disease and mental illness. 'We claimed victory too soon,' said Dr Robert Shope, professor of epidemiology at Yale University and co-chairman of the institute's committee on emerging infections. 'The danger posed by infectious diseases has not gone away. It's worsening.' Changes in the environment, in human behaviour and in the microbes themselves are interacting in a complex way to set the stage for new diseases to emerge and old ones to reappear. The main factors include: Poverty and population growth. Diseases thrive in overcrowded third world cities with inadequate sanitation and unclear water. An alarming example is a new strain of cholera now spreading fast through the Indian sub-continent; meanwhile the previous cholera epidemic, which originated in Indonesia in 1961 and reached South America in 1991, is still killing thousands of people a year. Development of forests. The rapid human intrusion into tropical forests is exposing people to new reservoirs of infection in animals and insects. Several 'new' diseases are probably caused by old monkey viruses, including Aids, Ebola and Marburg fever. In the eastern US, the rapid increase in Lyme disease is due mainly to housing development close to wooded areas; the bacteria responsible are carried by ticks from woodland mice and deer - their normal hosts - to people living nearby. International travel and commerce. Increased mobility can spread a new disease rapidly around the globe wherever it arises. Aids, for example, probably took hold first in tropical Africa, travelled along the Mombasa-Kinshasa highway with truck drivers, soldiers and prostitutes - and reached the western hemisphere by air. Farming and food processing. Intensive animal rearing can transfer germs from animals to humans. Microbiologists believe that the most dangerous strains of influenza arise in south China where integrated pig-duck farming is practiced; the animals act as genetic 'mixing vessels' in which genes from different flu viruses are recombined. Today's record levels of salmonella food poisoning in Europe and north America are linked to large-scale poultry production. Civil unrest and political instability. Pestilence has been linked with warfare throughout history; a current example is the epidemic of Kala-Azar, a virulent form of leishmaniasis, a disease spread by sandflies which has killed an estimated 50,000 people as a result of the prolonged civil war in southern Sudan. Political disruption can also lead to disease, as the current outbreak of diphtheria in Russia shows; its principal cause seems to be a breakdown of the immunisation system in the former Soviet Union. Drug resistance. Misuse of antibiotics has produced drug-resistant strains of many bacteria. In western industrialised countries, thousands of people die every year from antibiotic-resistant infections which they pick up while in hospital for other reasons. Tuberculosis, which kills 3m people a year worldwide, is beginning to acquire antibiotic resistance. And the fight against malaria, now responsible for 2m deaths a year, is hampered both by drug-resistance in the microscopic parasite that causes the disease and by pesticide-resistance in the mosquitoes that carry it. Many microbes can undergo genetic changes at frightening speed - either random mutations or responses to environmental forces. As Mr Robert Walgate of the World Health Organisation's tropical diseases research unit put it, 'one can see the 20th century, subjecting micro-organisms to so many pressures, as the most ambitious short-term experiment in evolution in the history of the world'. Under those circumstances, it is not surprising that some unpleasant new forms of viruses and bacteria arise. For example the latest cholera strain, known officially as 0139 Bengal, causes similar symptoms to its predecessor -diarrhoea, vomiting and severe dehydration - but appears to last longer in the environment and may be more difficult to eradicate from water supplies. Microbiologists advocate a four-pronged strategy to contain the threat of infectious diseases. Surveillance. 'Global infectious disease surveillance is the most urgently needed first step to protect ourselves,' said Dr Stephen Morse, a virology professor at New York's Rockefeller University. WHO and the Federation of American Scientists are sponsoring a conference next month in Geneva, to lay the foundations of an international network of monitoring centres, located mainly in the tropics. The global network would use the latest genetic and computer technology to spot emerging diseases, rather as the Centres for Disease Control does in the US. CDC was quick to identify the cause of a mysterious fever that has killed at least 20 people in the south-western states this year; the fever was a new Hantavirus spread by mice. Vaccines. One disease has already been eradicated by mass vaccination: smallpox in the 1970s. Several others that exist only in humans, with no animal reservoirs, could be wiped out in the same way and WHO says its campaign to eradicate polio by 2000 is on target. But prevention of many other diseases, including malaria and Aids, will require new vaccine technology. Drugs. Doctors must learn to be more sparing in their use of antibiotics, prescribing them only for known bacterial infections; doctors must also stop contributing to drug resistance by giving broad-spectrum antibiotics to patients with ill-defined symptoms who are unlikely to benefit. At the same time, pharmaceutical researchers need to develop not only new classes of antibiotic but also drugs against viruses and parasitic diseases such as malaria. Sanitation and hygiene. As Dr Hiroshi Nakajima, WHO director-general, put it, 'cholera is the litmus-test of a country's socio-economic well-being. For as long as there is lack of proper sanitation facilities and safe drinking water, epidemics of cholera are bound to return, time and again'. In our present dirty world, with its inadequate drugs, vaccines and surveillance, is there a threat of more serious epidemics than those raging today? The apocalyptic nightmare would be a new microbe combining extreme virulence -quickly killing a high proportion of those infected - with high transmissibility, passing easily from person to person through normal social contact in an otherwise healthy population. Fortunately the human virus that came closest to that combination of virulence and transmissibility is the one already eradicated, smallpox. Some microbiologists say there are theoretical reasons for believing that the chances of anything similar arising again are extremely low. Viruses introduced from animals may cause lethal fevers but they do not pass easily between humans. But Dr Shope warns against complacency. 'The most disastrous emerging event might be another pandemic of influenza, like the 1918-19 pandemic that killed 20m people worldwide,' he says. 'But we don't know what the next event is likely to be and we must prepare to be surprised.'

text:how text:signific text:a text:figur text:over text:the text:year text:wa text:the text:late text:jordanian text:king text:hussein text:in text:further text:peac text:in text:the text:middl text:east
The Arab-Israeli peace process gathered pace yesterday as the US announced the first public summit between the Israeli and Jordanian leaders and as Israel made substantial overtures to Syria on the eve of a Middle East peace shuttle by Mr Warren Christopher, US secretary of state. President Bill Clinton said Mr Yitzhak Rabin, Israeli prime minister, would meet King Hussein of Jordan in Washington on July 25. The two neighbouring states have technically been at war since 1948. The announcement, confirmed by Mr Rabin's office, came after Mr Shimon Peres, Israeli foreign minister, said the Jewish state recognised the sovereignty of Syria over the Israeli-occupied Golan Heights. Mr Peres made the remarks in an apparent attempt to break the deadlock in talks before Mr Christopher arrived in the region on his third shuttle this year. Taken together, the two moves represent a significant further step in Arab-Israeli negotiations. Mr Clinton said the summit would be 'another step toward the achievement of a comprehensive and lasting peace in the Middle East'. The US plans to lay on a full ceremonial fanfare for the occasion. Mr Clinton said that in addition to their meeting, Mr Rabin and King Hussein would be invited to address a joint session of Congress. They will also attend a formal dinner at the White House. In Israel the Rabin-Hussein meeting is expected to bolster both the government and public support for the peace process. The summit will be seen as one of the first concrete benefits from peace talks with Palestinians and a step to ending Israel's regional isolation despite a 13-year-old 'cold peace' with Egypt. For Jordan the move marks the determination of King Hussein not to be left out of the unfolding Middle East peace process and to press Jordan's interests ahead of wider Arab co-ordination, particularly with Syria. As an inducement to Jordan to move ahead in its peace talks with Israel, the US is discussing possible debt relief measures as well as the supply of new military equipment. The announcement of the Rabin-Hussein summit came after Jordanian and Israeli officials ended technical talks yesterday to prepare for formal negotiations next Monday. The preparatory talks also laid the groundwork for a meeting in Jordan on Wednesday between Mr Christopher, Mr Peres and the Jordanian foreign minister to focus on economic relations and regional integration projects. Progress in peace talks between Israel and Jordan will marginalise Damascus and put pressure on Syrian President Hafez al-Assad to compromise in talks over the Golan Heights. Israeli officials said yesterday that Mr Peres' acceptance of Syrian sovereignty over the Heights marked a 'far-reaching' concession to Damascus. Israel annexed the strategic plateau in 1981. They said Mr Peres had attempted to offer a ground-breaking opening in the talks which have been stalled by Israeli refusal to say how much land it would return and Damascus' refusal to specify whether it would agree to a full peace including open borders, trade and embassies. Mr Christopher will also meet Mr Yassir Arafat, chairman of the Palestine Liberation Organisation, to review the implementation of the Israel-PLO peace agreement. He said he would discuss 'the steps that I feel he must undertake to establish the accountability necessary to reassure the donor community'. Mr Clinton said the Rabin-Hussein meeting was 'another step' on the long road to an era of Middle East peace. 'I will do everything I can to make sure the peoples of the region realise the blessings of peace that have been denied too long to them.'

